JRSIS Health Care Corp 10-K Mar. 29, 2017  7:46 AM | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»JRSIS Health Care Corp (JRSS)FORM 10-K | Annual ReportMar. 29, 2017  7:46 AM|About: JRSIS Health Care Corp (JRSS)View as PDF

 JRSIS HEALTH CARE Corp (Form: 10-K, Received: 03/29/2017 07:48:42) 









	 


	UNITED STATES


	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



	Washington, D.C.20549



	 


	(Mark One)


	 



	FORM10-K



	 







	þ



	ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15 (d) OF THE SECURITIES
	EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934




	 


	For the fiscal
	year ended December 31, 2016


	 


	or


	 







	¨



	TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
	SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934




	 


	For the transition period from

	                       

	to

	                       



	 


	Commission file number:

	333-194359



	 





	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION







	 






	(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)  


	 






	Florida






	46-4562047







	State or other jurisdiction
	of




	(I.R.S. Employer






	Incorporation or
	organization




	Identification No.)






	 


	1st – 7th Floor, Industrial
	and Commercial Bank Building,


	Xingfu Street, Hulan Town,
	Hulan District, Harbin City,


	Heilongjiang Province, China
	150025




	 






	(Address of principal executive offices)
	(Zip Code)


	 


	Registrant’s telephone number,
	including areacode

	0086-451-56888933



	 



	Securities registered
	pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:



	 






	Title of Each Class






	Name of Each Exchange on Which Registered







	None




	Not Applicable





	 



	Securities registered
	pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:



	 






	Title of Each Class






	Name of Each Exchange on Which Registered







	Common Stock, $0.001 par value




	Not Applicable





	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known
	seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule405 of the Securities Act.

	¨

	Yes
	No

	þ



	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required
	to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.

	¨

	Yes
	No

	þ



	 


	Indicate by check mark whether
	the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15 (d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during
	the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject
	to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes

	þ

	No

	¨



	 


	Indicate by check
	mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive Data File
	required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding
	12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files). Yes

	þ

	No

	¨



	 


	Indicate by check mark if disclosure
	of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (§ 229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein, and will
	not be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference
	in Part III of this Form10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K.

	þ



	 


	Indicate by check mark whether
	the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See
	the

	Definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer” and “smaller
	reporting company” in Rule12b-2 of the Exchange Act.



	 



	Large
	accelerated filer Accelerated filer


	¨



	Non-accelerated filer (Do not check
	if a smaller reporting company) Smaller reporting company

	þ



	 


	Indicate by check
	mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule12 b-2 of the Act). Yes

	¨

	No

	þ



	 


	APPLICABLE ONLY TO REGISTRANTS INVOLVED
	IN BANKRUPTCY


	PROCEEDINGS DURING THE PRECEDING FIVE YEARS:


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant
	has filed all documents and reports required to be filed by Section 12, 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 subsequent
	to the distribution of securities under a plan confirmed by a court. 



	¨


	Yes          


	¨


	No



	 


	(APPLICABLE ONLY TO CORPORATE REGISTRANTS)


	 


	Indicate the number of shares outstanding
	of each of the registrant’s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date.


	 


	As of March 29, 2017, there were 13,915,000
	shares of the registrant’s common stock outstanding.


	 


	DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE


	 


	List hereunder the following documents
	if incorporated by reference and the Part of the Form 10-K (e.g., Part I, Part II, etc.) into which the document is incorporated:
	(1) Any annual report to security holders; (2) Any proxy or information statement; and (3) Any prospectus filed pursuant to Rule
	424(b) or (c) under the Securities Act of 1933. The listed documents should be clearly described for identification purposes (e.g.,
	annual report to security holders for fiscal year ended December 24, 1980).


	 


	None


	 



	 






	 


	 


	 






	 



	Table of Contents



	 




	 


	 



	Page





	 





	PART I









	 


	 


	 





	Item 1.





	Business





	4





	 


	 


	 





	Item 1A.





	Risk Factors





	8





	 


	 


	 





	Item 2.





	Properties.





	19





	 


	 


	 





	Item 3.





	Legal Proceedings.





	19





	 


	 


	 





	Item 4.





	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders





	19





	 


	 


	 




	 





	PART II





	 




	 


	 


	 





	Item 5.





	Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities.





	20





	 


	 


	 





	Item 6.





	Selected Financial Data





	21





	 


	 


	 





	Item 7.





	Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.





	21





	 


	 


	 





	Item 7A.





	Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk.





	31





	 


	 


	 





	Item 8





	Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.





	31





	 


	 


	 





	Item 9.





	Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.





	32





	 


	 


	 





	Item 9A.





	Controls and Procedures.





	32





	 


	 


	 





	Item 9B.





	Other Information.





	32





	 


	 


	 




	 





	PART III





	 




	 


	 


	 





	Item 10.





	Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance.





	33





	 


	 


	 





	Item 11.





	Executive Compensation.





	35





	 


	 


	 





	Item 12.





	Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.





	36





	 


	 


	 





	Item 13.





	Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.





	37





	 


	 


	 





	Item 14.





	Principal Accountant Fees and Services.





	37





	 


	 


	 




	 





	PART IV





	 




	 


	 


	 





	Item 15.





	Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules.





	38





	 






	 



	3



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	PART I



	 



	Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward
	Looking Statements



	 


	The discussion contained in this Annual
	Report on Form 10-K contains “forward-looking statements” within the meaning of Section 27A of the United States Securities
	Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Act, and Section 21E of the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended,
	or the Exchange Act. Any statements about our expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance
	are not historical facts and may be forward-looking. These statements are often, but not always, made through the use of words
	or phrases like “anticipate,” “estimate,” “plans,” “projects,” “continuing,”
	“ongoing,” “target,” “expects,” “management believes,” “we believe,”
	“we intend,” “we may,” “we will,” “we should,” “we seek,” “we
	plan,” the negative of those terms, and similar words or phrases.

	   

	 We base these forward-looking
	statements on our expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about our business and the industry in which we operate
	as of the date of this Form 10-K. These forward-looking statements are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties that cannot
	be predicted, quantified or controlled and that could cause actual results to differ materially from those set forth in, contemplated
	by, or underlying the forward-looking statements. Statements in this Form 10-K describe factors, among others, that could
	contribute to or cause these differences. Actual results may vary materially from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected
	should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect. Because the factors
	discussed in this Form 10-K could cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those expressed in any forward-looking
	statement made by us or on our behalf, you should not place undue reliance on any such forward-looking statement. New factors emerge
	from time to time, and it is not possible for us to predict which will arise. In addition, we cannot assess the impact of each
	factor on our business or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially
	from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Except as required by law, we undertake no obligation to publicly revise
	our forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances that arise after the date of this Form 10-K or the date of documents
	incorporated by reference herein that include forward-looking statements.


	 











	Item 1.




	Business





	 



	History



	 


	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Company Limited
	(“Jiarun Hospital”) was established in Harbin in the Province of Heilongjiang of the People’s Republic of China
	(“PRC”) by the owner Junsheng Zhang on February 17, 2006.


	 


	Jiarun is a private hospital serving patients
	on a municipal and county level and providing both Western and Chinese medical practices to the residents of Harbin. Jiarun specializes
	in the areas of Pediatrics, Dermatology, ENT, Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM), Ophthalmology, Internal Medicine Dentistry, General
	Surgery, Rehabilitation Science, Gynecology, General Medical Services, etc.


	 


	On November 20, 2013, the officer of Jiarun
	Hospital established JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION, a Florida corporation (“JHCC” or the “Company”). On
	February 25, 2013, the officer of Jiarun Hospital established JRSIS HEALTH CARE LIMITED ("JHCL"), a wholly owned subsidiary
	of the Company. On September 17, 2012, the officer of Jiarun Hospital established Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”),
	a wholly owned subsidiary of JHCL. Runteng, a Hong Kong registered Investment Company, holds a seventy percent (70%) ownership
	interest in Harbin Jiarun Hospital Company Ltd, a Heilongjiang registered company.


	 


	On December 20, 2013, the Company acquired
	One Hundred Percent (100%) of the issued and outstanding capital stock of JRSIS Health Care Limited, a privately held Limited Liability
	Company registered in the British Virgin Islands (“JHCL”) for Twelve Million (12,000,000) shares of our common stock.
	JHCL, through its wholly owned subsidiary, Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”), holds majority ownership in
	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd, a company duly incorporated, organized and validly existing under the laws of China (“Jiarun”).
	As the parent company, JHCC relies on Jiarun Hospital to conduct One Hundred Percent (100%) of our businesses and operations.


	 






	 



	4



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	Item 1.




	Business - 


	continued






	 




	Corporate Structure



	 


	Our present corporate
	structure is as follows:


	 


Click to enlarge



	 




	Our Business



	 


	We operate Jiarun Hospital, a private hospital
	with 650 open beds. Jiarun Hospital offers patients care and sale of medicine in the areas of both Western and Chinese medical
	practices to the residents of Harbin. Jiarun specializes in the areas of Pediatrics, Dermatology, Ears, Nose and Throat (ENT),
	Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM), Ophthalmology, Internal Medicine Dentistry, General Surgery, Rehabilitation Science, Gynecology,
	General Medical Services, etc. Our ambulances are open 24 hours a day.


	 


	As a hospital in China, we must register
	with and maintain an operating license from the local Administration of Health.


	 


	As is common in China, we generate revenues
	from providing both patients services and the sale of medicine, these two areas respectively making up 56% and 44% of the total
	revenues for the year ended December 31, 2016, 54% and 46% of the total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2015.


	 


	We generate revenues from medicine revenue
	and patient services:


	 




	Medicine




	Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine.


	 


	Given the nature of this revenue source
	of the Company’s business, and the applicable rules guiding revenue recognition, the revenue recognition practices for the
	sale of medicine do not contain estimates that materially affect results of operations nor any policy for return of products.


	 


	The Company is serving patients on both
	Western and Traditional Chinese medicines to the citizens of Harbin.



	 





	Patient Services




	In accordance with the medical licenses
	of Jiarun, the approved medical patient service scope of the Company includes medical consulting, surgery, obstetrics and gynecology,
	pediatrics, anesthesia, clinic laboratory, medical imaging, and traditional Chinese medicine, etc.


	 


	Patient service revenue is recognized when
	it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has
	been provided to the patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	The Company provides services to both patients
	covered by social insurance and patients who are not covered by social insurance. The Company charges the same rates for patient
	services regardless of the coverage by social insurance.


	 






	 



	5



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	Item 1.




	Business - 


	continued





	 


	Patients who are not covered
	by social insurance are liable for the total cost of medical treatment.


	 







	l




	For out-patient medical services, revenue
	is recognized when the Company provides medical service to the patient. The Company collects payment when the patient checks out
	from the hospital, which is the same day the services are provided.





	 







	l




	For in-patient medical services, the Company
	estimates the approximate fee the patients will spend in the hospital based on patients’ symptom. This is when the patients
	check in to the hospital. At that time, the Company collects the estimated fees from the patient and records the payment as deposits
	received.





	 


	During the in-patient services
	period, the Company recognizes revenue when the patient service is provided and deducts the cost of service from the deposit received.
	The Company records these transactions based on daily reports generated by the respective medical department. When medical services
	exceed patient deposits received, the Company records revenue and accounts receivable when the patient services are provided.


	 


	When patients check out from the
	hospital, the Company calculates and determines the remaining deposit, if any, and refunds the unused portion of the deposit to
	the patients. In the case where the patients have a balance in accounts receivable during the in-patient period, accounts receivable
	are required to be paid in full at checkout.


	 


	Patients covered by social insurance
	will receive a portion or full medical services reimbursed or paid by the social insurance agencies via prepaid cards or the insurance
	claim settlement process.


	 


	 For the recent two years, the Company’s
	revenue has been growing at a compound rate of approximately 73% annually. We have secured a new, much larger location to allow
	for our fast organic growth. Our operations moved into the new building in December of 2014.


	 


	The hospital building, which was put into
	use in December 2014, is being constructed by Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd (“the Leasor”), which is
	owned by Junsheng Zhang, a related party. The Company leases from the Leasor by financial leasing, the price of leasing agreement
	referred to the local market price and audited by the auditor. The Leasing terms consist of 30 payments. Each payment will be made
	on an annual basis when RMB7,000,000 per payment will be paid upfront for each leasing period. The first payment was made on September
	1st, 2014. At the end of the leasing period, a final payment will be made to settle the total leasing amount. Both parties agreed
	for the Leasee to pay 3 million RMB as deposit at the execution of the Leasing Agreement, which will be deducted from the final
	rental settlement. The lending interest rate was calculated at 6.55%, which is the benchmark interest rate announced from The People’s
	Bank of China. After the completion of all payments, the ownership of the leased property will be transferred to Jiarun.


	 


	After our operations were moved into the
	new hospital building in December 2014, JHCC established an Intensive Care Unit and a Hemodialysis Center department.


	 


	JHCC also plans to acquire other hospitals
	and companies involved in the healthcare industry in the PRC using cash and shares of our common stock. Substantial capital may
	be needed for these acquisitions and we may need to raise additional funds through the sale of our common stock, debt financing
	or other arrangements. We do not have any commitments or arrangements from any person to provide us with any additional capital.
	Additional capital may not be available to us, or if available, on acceptable terms, in which case we would not be able to acquire
	other hospitals or businesses in the healthcare industry.


	 



	Regulations pertaining to our Business



	 


	According to the PRC Regulation of Healthcare
	Institutions, hospitals shall register with the Administration of Health of the local government to obtain the necessary business
	license for the provision of hospital services. We received our business license from Harbin City government in February of 2006.
	Other existing regulations having material effects on our business include those dealing with physician's licensing, usage of medicine
	and injection, public security in health and medical advertising.


	 






	 



	6



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	Item 1.




	Business - 


	continued






	 




	Customers



	 


	The Company has successfully marketed our
	value proposition to a large number of corporate customers as well as individual customers. We are in direct competition with two
	government-owned hospitals in the Hulan district of Harbin City. Management believes we are able to offer a more comprehensive
	examination menu at competitive prices, and provide an affordable “one-stop” service to our corporate customers who
	contract us to provide healthcare services to their employees and clients across the country. We are also able to provide our customers
	with satisfying experiences by providing customized services, streamlined processes, access to advanced equipment, a comfortable
	environment, customer services-oriented staff and greater privacy, characteristics which are highly valued by our corporate and
	individual customers.


	 



	Suppliers



	 


	Over the years of operations, we have developed
	a solid and reliable image and reputation with the general public and the medical academia and industry. Leveraging our positive
	track record and brand name, we have established supplier relationships with a number of well-known local and international healthcare
	and financial companies and medical academia. The following are some of the most recognized supplier’s name the hospitals
	have established working relationships with:


	 








	Company




	 




	Content of cooperation







	Jilin kaixin Electronic Technology Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment






	Harbin ChengYe Economic and Trade Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment






	Heilongjiang Dahua Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	Shenyang MuXiang trading Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment






	Otis Elevator (China) Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Equipment






	Hebei Wanrui Medical Devices Co., Ltd



	 



	Supplier of Equipment






	De Yi Lin Medical Equipment (Shanghai) Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment






	Harbin BaoYue medical equipment sales co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment and reagent






	Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	Harbin Shengtai Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Chinese Herbal Medicine






	Harbin Zhengda Longxiang Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	General Electric Medical Systems Trade and development (Shanghai) Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment






	Harbin Huitongyuan Economic and Trade Co., Ltd



	 



	Supplier of Medical reagent






	Changchun LangHuawei Biological Technology Co., Ltd



	 



	Supplier of Medical reagent and healthcare material






	Sinopharm Heilongjiang Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	Harbin Pharmaceutical Group



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	Heilongjiang Haishuo Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	Zhejiang Fengan Biopharmaceuticals Co., Ltd



	 



	Supplier of Medical and healthcare material






	Heilongjiang XinLong Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical






	Heilongjiang RunJia Medical Equipment Co., Ltd.



	 



	Supplier of Medical Equipment






	Harbin Zhongpeng Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd



	 



	Supplier of Medical





	 


	 


	 






	 




	Competition



	 


	We compete with two government-owned hospitals
	in the city of Harbin. We believe that we will be able to effectively compete with them because we:


	 







	l





	Extensive marketing tactics will reach
	a large segment of customers






	Extensive marketing tactics will reach a large
	segment of customers, such as our especial "Mobile clinics free medical service " program, which provide free medical
	services around Jiarun Hospital community and neighboring towns, more as an expanded customer base and expand the influence of
	the marketing plan.


	 







	l




	Provide advanced medical facilities and comfortable
	environments





	 







	l




	Maintain the highest level of professional
	healthcare





	 







	l




	Offer competitive prices for medical treatment and
	drugs and medications.





	 



	Marketing



	 


	To increase our visibility, in April 2014,
	Jiarun purchased a clinicar. This mobile clinic will promote the business by providing free clinical services in Jiarun Hospital’s
	local community. With the new hospital building in use, Jiarun is able to further improve its healthcare services ability and expand
	its service coverage area to additional communities and towns. We also planning to send out our experts and medical team to communities
	to provide free public services including consultation and medical services to attract customers.  


	 


	In the future, we plan to further strengthen
	our marketing efforts and improve our brand awareness through advertising on newspapers, magazines and television. We will continue
	to focus on community medical service by maintaining good relationship with our communities, and providing quality medical service
	to the neighborhood residents. We will set up our marketing department and team to focus on specific market and patients. We understand
	that the key to success is to provide quality services.


	 



	PRC Laws and Regulations Affecting Our
	Business



	 


	Healthcare providers in China are required
	to comply with many laws and regulations at the national and local government levels. These laws and regulations include the following:


	 







	n




	We must register with and maintain an
	operating license from the local Administration of Health. We are subject to review by the local Administration of Health at an
	annual inspection.





	 







	n




	Personnel and employees directly performing
	medical services in medical institutions are required to obtain qualification certificates.





	 







	n




	Pursuant to the Interim Provisions on
	the Administration of Medical Examinations, or the Medical Examination provisions, issued in August 2009 by the NHFPC, the NHFPC
	or its local branches are responsible for the regulation of medical examination activities. Medical institutions that plan to operate
	medical examination businesses should apply to the NHFPC or its local branches for the approval of such medical examination business
	and register such business with the NHFPC or its local branches by including the business in their medical institution practicing
	licenses.





	 







	n




	Pursuant to the Rules on Administration of
	Radiation-related Diagnose and Treatment issued in January 2006 by the NHFPC, medical institutions that plan to conduct radiation-related
	diagnosis and treatment businesses should apply to the NHFPC or its local branches and obtain radiation-related diagnosis and treatment
	licenses. JHCC, which engages in radiation-related diagnosis and treatment business, has obtained radiation-related diagnosis and
	treatment licenses.





	 







	n




	All waste materials from our hospital must
	be properly collected, sterilized, deposited, transported and disposed of. We are required to keep records of the origin, type
	and amount of all waste materials generated by our hospital.





	 







	n




	We must have at least 20 beds and at least
	14 medical professionals on staff, including three doctors and five nurses.





	 







	n




	We must establish and follow protocols to
	prevent medical malpractice. The protocols require us to:





	 




	 



	o




	insure that patients are adequately informed before they consent to medical operations or procedures;





	 


	 


	 




	 



	o




	maintain complete medical records which are available for review by the patient, physicians and the courts;





	 


	 


	 




	 



	o




	voluntarily report any event of malpractice to a local government agency;





	 


	 


	 




	 



	o




	support the medical services we provide in any administrative investigation or litigation.





	 


	If we fail to comply with applicable laws
	and regulations, we could suffer penalties, including the loss of our license to operate.


	 


	Before we can acquire a hospital or a company
	in the healthcare field in the PRC, we will be required to submit an application to the PRC Ministry of Commerce. As part of the
	application we must submit a number of documents, including:


	  






	 



	7



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	Item 1.




	Business - 


	continued





	 






	·


	Our financial statements and the financial statements
	of the company we propose to acquire,




	 






	·


	A copy of the business license of the company we propose
	to acquire,




	 






	·


	Evidence that the shareholders of the company
	we propose to acquire have approved the transaction, and




	 






	·


	An appraisal, conducted by an independent party, of the
	value of the company we propose to acquire.




	 



	Taxes



	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC, income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt
	from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006. The
	tax exempt status will remain effective until notification from the tax bureau.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income tax of $4,059
	and $2,604 for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively to the local tax bureau.


	 



	Employees



	 


	As of December 31, 2016, we have
	499 employees, consisting of 149 licensed doctors and 35 surgeons and 3 dentists, 37 drug management staff, 218 nurses, supported
	by 57 non-medical employees. None of our employees are represented by a labor union or similar collective bargaining organization.



	 











	Item 1A.




	Risk Factors.





	 


	An investment in our common stock involves
	a high degree of risk. You should carefully consider the following risk factors and other information in this 10K before deciding
	to invest in our Company. If any of the following risks actually occur, our business, financial condition and results of operations
	for growth could be seriously harmed. As a result, the trading price of our common stock could decline and you could lose all or
	part of your investment.


	 



	Risks Related to Our Business



	 




	If we fail to properly manage the employment
	of our doctors and nurses, we may be subject to penalties including fines, loss of licenses, or an order to cease practice against
	our medical centers, which could materially and adversely affect our business.




	 


	The practicing activities of doctors and
	nurses are strictly regulated under the PRC laws and regulations. Doctors and nurses who practice at medical institutions must
	hold practicing licenses and may only practice within the scope and at the specific medical institutions for which their practicing
	licenses are registered.


	 


	In practice, it usually takes four to nine
	weeks for doctors and nurses to transfer their practicing licenses from one medical institution to another or add another medical
	institution to their permitted practicing institutions. Some of our recently hired doctors have submitted applications to transfer
	their practicing licenses from their previous employers to our medical centers but have not finished the process. We cannot assure
	you that these doctors will complete the transfer of their practicing licenses or the government procedures timely, or at all.
	Our failure to properly manage the employment of our doctors and nurses may subject us to administrative penalties including fines,
	loss of licenses, or, in the worst case scenario, an order to cease practice against our medical centers, which could materially
	and adversely affect our business.


	 






	 



	8



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	Our business exposes us to liability
	risks that are inherent in the operation of complex medical equipment, which may experience failures or cause injury either because
	of defects, faulty maintenance or repair, or improper use.




	 


	Our business exposes us to liability risks
	that are inherent in the operation of complex medical equipment, which may experience failures or cause injury either because of
	defects, faulty maintenance or repair, or improper use. Extended downtime of our medical equipment could result in lost revenues,
	dissatisfaction on the part of customers and damage to our reputation. Any injury caused by our medical equipment in our medical
	centers due to equipment defects, improper maintenance or improper operation could subject us to liability claims. Regardless of
	their merit or eventual outcome, such liability claims could result in significant legal defense costs for us, harm our reputation,
	and otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations.


	 


	We primarily rely on equipment manufacturers
	or third-party service providers to maintain and repair the complex medical equipment used in our medical centers. If any of these
	manufacturers or third-party service providers fails to perform its contractual obligations to provide such services, or refuses
	to renew these service agreements on terms acceptable to us, or at all, we may not be able to find a suitable alternative service
	provider or establish our own maintenance and repair team in a timely manner. Similarly, any failure of or significant quality
	deterioration in such service providers’ services could materially and adversely affect customer experience. We also rely
	on both equipment manufacturers and our own internal expertise to provide technical training to our staff on the proper operation
	of such equipment. If such medical technicians are not properly and adequately trained, or if they make errors in the operation
	of the complex medical equipment even if they are properly trained, they may misuse or ineffectively use the complex medical equipment
	in our medical centers. Such failure could result in unsatisfactory medical examination results, diagnosis, treatment outcomes,
	patient injury or possibly death, any of which could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition, results
	of operations and prospects.


	 




	Financial projections included with
	this 10k may prove to be inaccurate.




	 


	Any projections are based on certain assumptions
	which could prove to inaccurate and which would be subject to future conditions, which may be beyond our control, such as general
	industry conditions. We may experience unanticipated costs, or anticipated revenues may not materialize, resulting in lower operating
	results than forecasted. We cannot assure that the results illustrated in any financial projections will in fact be realized by
	us. Any financial projections would be prepared by our management and would not be examined or compiled by independent certified
	public accountants. Counsel to us has had no participation in the preparation or review of any financial projections prepared by
	us. Accordingly, neither the independent certified public accountants nor our counsel would be able to provide any level of assurance
	on them. We cannot assure that we will be able to raise capital in this placement of common stock, or that we will have sufficient
	capital to expand our business operations. We cannot assure that we could obtain additional financing or capital from any source,
	or that such financing or capital would be available to us on terms acceptable to us.


	 




	We may not be able to compete against
	companies with substantially greater resources.




	 


	The hospital industry is intensely competitive
	and we expect competition to intensify further in the future. This is a very capital intensive business and companies with greater
	resources may have advantages that make our model weaker in comparison.


	 




	Our business is subject to various government
	regulations.




	 


	We are subject to various federal, state
	and local laws affecting medical products in China. The State Food and Drug Administration (“SFDA”), Ministry of Health
	of The People’s Republic of China (“MoHPRC”) and equivalent state agencies regulate healthcare services made
	by businesses in the offering of service, which apply to us. We are also subject to government laws and regulations governing health,
	safety, working conditions, employee relations, wrongful termination, wages, taxes and other matters applicable to businesses in
	general. Any such new regulation, or the application of laws or regulations from jurisdictions whose laws do not currently apply
	to our business, could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, and financial condition.


	 






	 



	9



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	We cannot assure that we will earn a
	profit or that our products will be accepted by consumers.




	 


	Our business is speculative and reliant
	on acceptance of our brand name by local communities, physicians, patients and advertisers. Our operating performance is also heavily
	dependent on our ability to earn a profit from our services. We cannot assure as to whether we will be successful or earn any revenue
	or profit, or that investors will not lose their entire investment.




	 






	We may incur uninsured losses.




	 


	Although we maintain vehicle insurance
	and basic Chinese social insurances and related insurance, we cannot assure that we will not incur uninsured liabilities and losses
	as a result of the conduct of our business. Should uninsured losses occur, the holders of our common stock and debt could lose
	their invested capital.


	 




	Like most providers of medical services,
	we are subject to potential litigation.




	 


	We are exposed to the risk of litigation
	for a variety of reasons, including service liability lawsuits, employee lawsuits, commercial contract disputes, government enforcement
	actions, and other legal proceedings. We cannot assure that future litigation in which we may become involved will not have a material
	adverse effect on our financial condition, operating results, business performance, and business reputation.


	 


	We do not maintain any business liability
	insurance. Insurance companies in China offer limited business insurance products. While business liability insurance is available
	to a limited extent in China, we have determined that the risks, cost of such insurance and the difficulties associated with acquiring
	such insurance on commercially reasonable terms make it impractical for us to purchase such insurance. Product or medical malpractice
	liability or uninsured damage to any of our medical centers or the medical equipment in our medical centers could result in significant
	disruption to the operation of our medical centers and result in a material adverse effect to our business, financial condition
	and results of operations.


	 




	We may incur cost overruns in the distribution
	of our various services.




	 


	We may incur substantial cost overruns
	in the distribution of our services. Unanticipated costs may force us to obtain additional capital or financing from other sources,
	or may cause us to lose our entire investment if we are unable to obtain the additional funds necessary to implement our business
	plan. We cannot assure that we will be able to obtain sufficient capital to successfully continue the implementation of our business
	plan. If a greater investment in the business is required due to cost overruns, the probability of earning a profit or a return
	of the shareholders’ investment in us diminishes.


	 




	Directors and officers have limited
	liability.




	 


	Our bylaws provide that we will indemnify
	and hold harmless our officers and directors against claims arising from our activities, to the maximum extent permitted by business
	laws of the State of Florida. If we were called upon to perform under our indemnification agreement, then the portion of our assets
	expended for such purpose would reduce the amount otherwise available for our business. We have no executed indemnification agreement.


	 




	If we are unable to hire, retain or
	motivate qualified personnel, consultants, independent contractors, and advisors, we may not be able to grow effectively.




	 


	Our performance will be largely dependent
	on the talents and efforts of highly skilled individuals. Future success depends on our continuing ability to identify, hire, develop,
	motivate and retain highly qualified personnel for all areas of our organization. Competition for such qualified employees is intense.
	If we do not succeed in attracting excellent personnel or in retaining or motivating them, we may be unable to grow effectively.
	In addition, all future success depends largely on our ability to retain key consultants and advisors. We cannot assure that any
	skilled individuals will agree to become an employee, consultant, or independent contractor of JRSIS. Our inability to retain their
	services could negatively impact our business and our ability to execute our business strategy. From our past experiences, we have
	never had difficulties hiring or retaining qualified personnel, independent contractors or advisors.


	 






	 



	10



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	Risks Related to the Company’s Corporate
	Structure



	 




	The failure to comply with PRC regulations
	relating to mergers and acquisitions of domestic enterprises by offshore special purpose vehicles may subject us to severe fines
	or penalties and create other regulatory uncertainties regarding our corporate structure.




	 


	On August 8, 2006, the PRC Ministry of
	Commerce (“MOFCOM”), joined by the China Securities Regulatory Commission (the “CSRC”), the State-owned
	Assets Supervision and Administration Commission of the State Council (the “SASAC”), the State Administration of Taxation
	(the “SAT”), the State Administration for Industry and Commerce (the “SAIC”), and the State Administration
	of Foreign Exchange (“SAFE”), jointly promulgated regulations entitled the Provisions Regarding Mergers and Acquisitions
	of Domestic Enterprises by Foreign Investors (the "M&A Rules"), which took effect as of September 8, 2006. This regulation,
	among other things, has certain provisions that require offshore special purpose vehicles (“SPVs”) formed for the purpose
	of acquiring PRC domestic companies and controlled directly or indirectly by PRC individuals and companies, to obtain the approval
	of MOFCOM prior to engaging in such acquisitions and to obtain the approval of the CSRC prior to publicly listing their securities
	on an overseas stock market. On September 21, 2006, the CSRC published on its official website a notice specifying the documents
	and materials that are required to be submitted for obtaining CSRC approval.


	 


	The application of the M&A Rules with
	respect to our corporate structure and to this offering remains unclear, with no current consensus existing among leading PRC law
	firms regarding the scope and applicability of the M&A Rules. We believe that the MOFCOM and CSRC approvals under the M&A
	Rules were not required in the context of our share exchange transaction because at such time the share exchange was a foreign
	related transaction governed by foreign laws, not subject to the jurisdiction of PRC laws and regulations. However, we cannot be
	certain that the relevant PRC government agencies, including the CSRC and MOFCOM, would reach the same conclusion, and we cannot
	be certain that MOFCOM or the CSRC may deem that the transactions effected by the share exchange circumvented the M&A Rules,
	and other rules and notices, and that prior MOFCOM or CSRC approval is required for this offering. Further, we cannot rule out
	the possibility that the relevant PRC government agencies, including MOFCOM, would deem that the M&A Rules required us or our
	entities in China to obtain approval from MOFCOM or other PRC regulatory agencies in connection with JRSIS’s control of Jiarun.


	 


	If the CSRC, MOFCOM, or another PRC regulatory
	agency subsequently determines that CSRC, MOFCOM or other approval was required for the share exchange transaction and/ or the
	VIE arrangements between JRSIS and Jiarun, or if prior CSRC approval for this offering is required and not obtained, we may face
	severe regulatory actions or other sanctions from MOFCOM, the CSRC or other PRC regulatory agencies. In such event, these regulatory
	agencies may impose fines or other penalties on our operations in the PRC, limit our operating privileges in the PRC, delay or
	restrict the repatriation of the proceeds from this offering into the PRC, restrict or prohibit payment or remittance of dividends
	to us or take other actions that could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations
	and reputation, as well as the trading price of our common stock. The CSRC or other PRC regulatory agencies may also take actions
	requiring us, or making it advisable for us, to delay or cancel this offering, to restructure our current corporate structure,
	or to seek regulatory approvals that may be difficult or costly to obtain.


	 


	The M&A Rules, along with certain foreign
	exchange regulations discussed below, will be interpreted or implemented by the relevant government authorities in connection with
	our future offshore financings or acquisitions, and we cannot predict how they will affect our acquisition strategy. For example,
	our operating companies' ability to remit dividends to us, or to engage in foreign-currency-denominated borrowings, may be conditioned
	upon compliance with the SAFE registration requirements by such Chinese domestic residents, over whom we may have no control.


	 




	SAFE regulations relating to offshore
	investment activities by PRC residents may increase our administrative burdens and restrict our overseas and cross-border investment
	activity. If our shareholders and beneficial owners who are PRC residents fail to make any required applications, registrations
	and filings under such regulations, we may be unable to distribute profits and may become subject to liability under PRC laws.




	 


	SAFE has promulgated several regulations,
	including Notice on Relevant Issues Concerning Foreign Exchange Administration for PRC Residents to Engage in Financing and Inbound
	Investment via Oversea Special Purpose Vehicles, or "Circular No. 75," issued on October 21, 2005 and effective as of
	November 1, 2005 and certain implementation rules issued in recent years, requiring registrations with, and approvals from, PRC
	government authorities in connection with direct or indirect offshore investment activities by PRC residents and PRC corporate
	entities. These regulations apply to our shareholders and beneficial owners who are PRC residents, and may affect any offshore
	acquisitions that we make in the future.


	 






	 



	11



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	SAFE Circular No. 75 requires PRC residents,
	including both PRC legal person residents and/or natural person residents to register with the local SAFE branch before establishing
	or controlling any company outside of China for the purpose of equity financing with assets or equities of PRC companies, referred
	to in the notice as an "offshore special purpose company." In addition, any PRC resident who is a direct or indirect
	shareholder of an offshore company is required to update his registration with the relevant SAFE branches, with respect to that
	offshore company, in connection with any material change involving an increase or decrease of capital, transfer or swap of shares,
	merger, division, equity or debt investment or creation of any security interest. Moreover, the PRC subsidiaries of that offshore
	company are required to coordinate and supervise the filing of SAFE registrations by the offshore company's shareholders who are
	PRC residents in a timely manner. If a PRC shareholder with a direct or indirect stake in an offshore parent company fails to make
	the required SAFE registration, the PRC subsidiaries of such offshore parent company may be prohibited from making distributions
	of profit to the offshore parent and from paying the offshore parent proceeds from any reduction in capital, share transfer or
	liquidation in respect of the PRC subsidiaries, and the offshore parent company may also be prohibited from injecting additional
	capital into its PRC subsidiaries. Furthermore, failure to comply with the various SAFE registration requirements described above
	may result in liability for the PRC shareholders and the PRC subsidiaries under PRC law for foreign exchange registration evasion.


	 


	Although we have requested our PRC shareholders
	to complete the SAFE Circular No. 75 registration, we cannot be certain that all of our PRC resident beneficial owners will comply
	with the SAFE regulations. The failure or inability of our PRC shareholders to receive any required approvals or make any required
	registrations may subject us to fines and legal sanctions, restrict our overseas or cross-border investment activities, prevent
	us from transferring the net proceeds of this offering or making other capital injection into our PRC subsidiaries, limit our PRC
	subsidiaries' ability to make distributions or pay dividends or affect our ownership structure, as a result of which our acquisition
	strategy and business operations and our ability to distribute profits to you could be materially and adversely affected.


	 


	Under Operating Rules on the Foreign Exchange
	Administration of the Involvement of Domestic Individuals in the Employee Stock Ownership Plans and Share Option Schemes of Overseas
	Listed Companies, issued and effective as of March 28, 2007 by the State Administration of Foreign Exchange, or "SAFE"
	("Circular No. 78"), the employee stock option plan or share incentive plan should be registered with the SAFE or its
	local branches and complete certain other procedures related to the share option or other share incentive plan through the PRC
	subsidiary of such overseas listed company or any other qualified PRC agent before such grants are made. We believe that all of
	our PRC employees who are granted share options are subject to SAFE No. 78. In addition, PRC residents who are granted shares or
	share options by an overseas listed company according to its employee share option or share incentive plan are required to obtain
	approval from the SAFE or its local branches. We intend to grant our PRC employees stock options pursuant to an employee stock
	option plan. We will request our PRC management, personnel, directors and employees who are to be granted stock options to register
	them with local SAFE pursuant to Circular No.78. However, we cannot assure you that each of these individuals will successfully
	comply with all the required procedures above. If we or our PRC security holders fail to comply with these regulations, we or our
	PRC security holders may be subject to fines and legal sanctions. Further, failure to comply with the various SAFE registration
	requirements described above could result in liability under PRC law for foreign exchange evasion and we may become subject to
	a more stringent review and approval process with respect to our foreign exchange activities.


	 



	Risks Related to Doing Business in China



	 




	We depend upon the acquisition and maintenance
	of licenses to conduct our business in the PRC.




	 


	In order to conduct business, especially
	in chemical production activities in the PRC, we are required to maintain various licenses from the appropriate government authorities,
	including general business licenses and licenses and/or permits specific to our pharmaceutical product retail and distribution
	operations. We are required to maintain valid safety service licenses and other relevant licenses and permits to conduct our activities.
	The applicable licenses are subject to periodic renewal. An application for renewal needs to be submitted at least 30 days before
	the expiration date and the extension will be approved if the applicant satisfies all applicable requirements and pays appropriate
	resource fee. The PRC government may amend relevant laws and discontinue approval of renewal of pharmaceutical related licenses.
	Further, fees for such licenses may increase in the future. Our failure to obtain or maintain these licenses and any change of
	the relevant PRC laws to our disadvantage will have a material adverse impact on our ability to conduct our business and on our
	financial condition. No assurance can be given regarding the timing or magnitude of these types of government actions or that the
	same will not have a negative impact on our operations.


	 






	 



	12



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	Changes in current policies of the PRC
	government could have a significant impact upon the business we conduct in the PRC and the profitability of our operations.




	 


	Current policies adopted by the PRC government
	indicate that it seeks to encourage a market oriented economy. We believe that the PRC government will continue to develop policies
	that strengthen its economic and trading relationships with foreign countries and as a consequence, business development in the
	PRC will follow current market forces. While we believe that this trend will continue, we cannot assure you that such beneficial
	policies will not change in the future. A change in the current policies of the PRC government could result in confiscatory taxation,
	restrictions on currency conversion, or the expropriation or nationalization of private enterprises, all of which would have a
	negative impact on our current corporate structure and our operations. The PRC laws and regulations governing our current business
	operations are sometimes vague and uncertain. Any changes in such PRC laws and regulations may have a material and adverse effect
	on our business.


	 


	There are substantial uncertainties regarding
	the interpretation and application of PRC laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, those laws and regulations governing
	our business and those relating to the enforcement and operation of our contractual arrangements. At this time, we believe that
	the relevant PRC laws and regulations validate our current contractual arrangements and that our corporate structure is in keeping
	with such laws. However, no assurance can be given that PRC court rulings to be decided in the future will be consistent with our
	current interpretations. Further, new laws or regulations may be enacted which could have a negative impact on foreign investors.
	We cannot predict what effect the interpretation of existing or new PRC laws or regulations may have on our business and no assurance
	can be given that our operations will not be affected by such laws and/or regulations.


	 




	The PRC government exerts substantial
	influence over the manner in which companies in China must conduct their business activities.




	 


	The PRC only recently has permitted greater
	provincial and local economic autonomy and private economic activities. The government of the PRC has exercised and continues to
	exercise substantial control over virtually every sector of the Chinese economy through regulation and state ownership. Government
	actions in the future, including any decision not to continue to support recent economic reforms and to return to a more centrally
	planned economy or regional or local variations in the implementation of economic policies, could have a significant effect on
	economic conditions in the PRC or particular regions thereof. If this were to occur, we may be required to divest the interests
	we then control in Chinese properties. Any such developments could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations,
	financial condition and prospects.


	 




	Future inflation in China may inhibit
	economic activity and adversely affect our operations.




	 


	The Chinese economy has experienced periods
	of rapid expansion in recent years which has led to high rates of inflation and deflation. This has caused the PRC government to,
	from time to time, enact various corrective measures designed to restrict the availability of credit or regulate growth and contain
	inflation. While inflation has subsided since 1995, high inflation may in the future cause the PRC government to once again impose
	controls on credit and/or prices, or to take other action, which could inhibit economic activity in China. Any action on the part
	of the PRC government that seeks to control credit and/or prices may adversely affect our business operations.


	 




	A slowdown or other adverse developments
	in the PRC economy may materially and adversely affect our customers, demand for our products and our business.




	 


	We are a holding company and of our operations
	are entirely conducted in the PRC. In addition, all of our revenues are currently generated from sales in the PRC. Although the
	PRC economy has grown at a remarkable pace in recent years, we cannot assure you that such growth will continue. A slowdown in
	overall economic growth, an economic downturn or recession or other adverse economic developments in the PRC may materially reduce
	the demand for our products and have a materially adverse effect on our business.






	 



	13



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	We may be restricted from freely converting
	the Renminbi to other currencies in a timely manner.




	 


	At the present time, the RMB is not a freely
	convertible currency. We receive all of our revenue in RMB, which may need to be converted to other currencies, primarily U.S.
	dollars, in order to be remitted outside of the PRC. Effective July 1, 1996, foreign currency “current account” transactions
	by foreign investment enterprises are no longer subject to the approval of State Administration of Foreign Exchange (“SAFE,”
	formerly, “State Administration of Exchange Control”), but need only a ministerial review, according to the Administration
	of the Settlement, Sale and Payment of Foreign Exchange Provisions promulgated in 1996 (the “FX regulations”). “Current
	account” items include international commercial transactions, which occur on a regular basis, such as those relating to trade
	and provision of services. Distributions to joint venture parties also are considered “current account transactions.”
	Other non-current account items, known as “capital account” items, remain subject to SAFE approval. Under current regulations,
	we can obtain foreign currency in exchange for RMB from swap centers authorized by the government. While we do not anticipate problems
	in obtaining foreign currency to satisfy our requirements; however, no assurance can be given that foreign currency shortages or
	changes in currency exchange laws and regulations by the PRC government will not restrict us from freely converting RMB in a timely
	manner.


	 




	Governmental control of currency conversion
	may affect the value of your investment.




	 


	The PRC government imposes controls on
	the convertibility of Renminbi into foreign currencies and, in certain cases, the remittance of foreign currency out of the PRC.
	We receive all of our revenues in Renminbi, which is currently not a freely convertible currency. Shortages in the availability
	of foreign currency may restrict our ability to remit sufficient foreign currency to pay dividends, or otherwise satisfy foreign
	currency denominated obligations. Under existing PRC foreign exchange regulations, payments of current account items, including
	profit distributions, interest payments and expenditures from the transaction, can be made in foreign currencies without prior
	approval from the PRC State Administration of Foreign Exchange by complying with certain procedural requirements. However, approval
	from appropriate governmental authorities is required where Renminbi is to be converted into foreign currency and remitted out
	of the PRC to pay capital expenses such as the repayment of bank loans denominated in foreign currencies.


	 


	Further, the PRC government may also restrict
	access to foreign currencies for current account transactions. If the foreign exchange control system prevents us from obtaining
	sufficient foreign currency to satisfy our currency demands, we may not be able to pay certain of our expenses as they come due.


	 




	Fluctuations in the exchange rate could
	have an adverse effect upon our business and reported financial results.




	 


	We conduct our business in Renminbi (“RMB”),
	thus our functional currency is the RMB, while our reporting currency is the U.S. dollar. The value of the RMB against the U.S.
	dollar and other currencies may fluctuate and is affected by, among other things, the political situation as well as economic policies
	and conditions. On July 21, 2005, the PRC government changed its decade old policy of pegging its currency to the U.S. currency.
	Under that policy, the RMB is permitted to fluctuate within a narrow and managed band against a basket of certain foreign currencies.
	This change in policy has resulted in an approximate 21% appreciation of the RMB against the U.S. dollar between 2005 and 2008.
	However, the PRC government decided to re-peg the RMB to U.S. dollars in response to the financial crisis in 2008. On June 19,
	2010, China ended the pegging of the RMB to the U.S. dollar, allowing for a greater flexibility of its exchange rate. There remains
	significant international pressure on the significant appreciation of the RMB against the U.S. dollar. To the extent any of our
	future revenues are denominated in currencies other than the United States dollar, we would be subject to increased risks relating
	to foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations which could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and operating
	results since operating results are reported in United States dollars and significant changes in the exchange rate could materially
	impact our reported earnings.


	 




	Changes in PRC State Administration
	of Foreign Exchange (“SAFE”) Regulations regarding offshore financing activities by PRC residents may increase the
	administrative burden we face and create regulatory uncertainties that could adversely affect the implementation of our acquisition
	strategy.




	 


	In 2005, SAFE promulgated regulations which
	require registrations with, and approval from, SAFE on direct or indirect offshore investment activities by PRC legal person resident
	and/or natural person resident. The SAFE regulations require that if an offshore company formed by or controlled by PRC legal person
	resident and/or natural person resident, whether directly or indirectly, intends to acquire a PRC company, such acquisition shall
	be subject to strict examination and registration with SAFE. Without such registration, the PRC entity cannot remit any of its
	profits out of the PRC, whether as dividends or otherwise. As such, the failure by our shareholders who are PRC residents to make
	any required applications, filings or registrations pursuant to such SAFE regulations may prevent us from being able to distribute
	profits and could expose us, as well as our PRC resident shareholders to liability under PRC law.


	 






	 



	14



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	Because our principal assets are
	located outside of the United States and most of our directors and officers reside outside of the United States, it may be difficult
	for an investor to enforce any right founded on U.S. Federal Securities Laws against us and/or our officers and directors, or to
	enforce a judgment rendered by a United States court against us or our officers and directors.




	 


	Our operation and principle assets are
	located in the PRC, and our officers and directors are non-residents of the United States. Therefore, it may be difficult to effect
	service of process on such persons in the United States, and it may be difficult to enforce any judgments rendered against us or
	our officers and/or directors. As a result, it may be difficult or impossible for you to bring an action against us or against
	these individuals in China in the event that you believe that your rights have been infringed under the securities laws or otherwise.
	Even if you are successful in bringing an action of this kind, the laws of the PRC may render you unable to enforce a judgment
	against our assets or the assets of our directors and officers. As a result of all of the above, our shareholders may have more
	difficulty in protecting their interests through actions against our management, directors or major shareholders compared to shareholders
	of a corporation doing business entirely within the United States.


	 



	Regulatory Risks



	 




	State and Local Regulation




	 


	The Company may be subject to the separate
	regulations pertaining to commercial private lenders, specific property types or specific types of borrowers in each particular
	state, county, municipality or country. The Company may fail to comply with all of such regulations, or may incur significant costs
	in complying with such regulations.


	 




	Usury Laws




	 


	Although the Company intends for the Company’s
	debt to be fully compliant with law, the terms of such debts may be determined by a court to be usurious.


	 



	Risks Relating to Our Common Stock



	 




	We are an emerging growth company and,
	as a result of the reduced disclosure and governance requirements applicable to emerging growth companies, our common stock may
	be less attractive to investors.




	 


	We are an emerging growth company, as defined
	in the JOBS Act, and we are eligible to take advantage of certain exemptions from various reporting requirements applicable to
	other public companies, but not to emerging growth companies, including, but not limited to, a requirement to present only two
	years of audited financial statements, an exemption from the auditor attestation requirement of Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley
	Act, reduced disclosure about executive compensation arrangements pursuant to the rules applicable to smaller reporting companies
	and no requirement to seek non-binding advisory votes on executive compensation or golden parachute arrangements, although some
	of these exemptions are available to us as a smaller reporting company (i.e. a company with less than $75 million of its voting
	equity held by affiliates).  We have elected to adopt these reduced disclosure requirements.  We cannot predict
	if investors will find our common stock less attractive as a result of our taking advantage of these exemptions.  If
	some investors find our common stock less attractive as a result of our choices, there may be a less active trading market for
	our common stock and our stock price may be more volatile.


	 


	Pursuant to Section 107(b) of the JOBS
	Act, we have elected to use the extended transition period for complying with new or revised accounting standards under Section
	102(b)(2) of The JOBS Act. This election allows us to delay the adoption of new or revised accounting standards that have different
	effective dates for public and private companies until those standards apply to private companies. As a result, our financial statements
	may not be comparable to companies that comply with public company effective dates. The decision to opt out is irrevocable.


	 






	 



	15



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	Because the worldwide market value of our
	common stock held by non-affiliates, or public float, is below $75 million, we are also a “smaller reporting company”
	as defined under the Exchange Act. Some of the foregoing reduced disclosure and other requirements are also available to us because
	we are a smaller reporting company and may continue to be available to us even after we are no longer an emerging growth company
	under the JOBS Act but remain a smaller reporting company under the Exchange Act. As a smaller reporting company we are not required
	to:


	 







	·




	have
	an auditor report on our internal control over financial reporting pursuant to Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act; and





	 







	·




	present
	more than two years of audited financial statements in our registration statements and annual reports on Form 10-K and present
	any selected financial data in such registration statements and annual reports filings made by the Company on the EDGAR Company
	Search page of the Securities and Exchange Commission's Web site, the address for which is www.sec.gov. The public may read and
	copy any materials the Company files with the SEC at the SEC's Public.





	 




	Because we are subject to “penny
	stock” rules, the level of trading activity in our stock may be reduced.




	 


	Broker-dealer practices in connection with
	transactions in “penny stocks” are regulated by penny stock rules adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission.
	Penny stocks generally are equity securities with a price of less than $5.00 (other than securities registered on some national
	securities exchanges). The penny stock rules require a broker-dealer, prior to a transaction in a penny stock not otherwise exempt
	from the rules, to deliver a standardized risk disclosure document that provides information about penny stocks and the nature
	and level of risks in the penny stock market. The broker-dealer also must provide the customer with current bid and offer quotations
	for the penny stock, the compensation of the broker-dealer and its salesperson in the transaction, and, if the broker-dealer is
	the sole market maker, the broker-dealer must disclose this fact and the broker-dealer’s presumed control over the market,
	and monthly account statements showing the market value of each penny stock held in the customer’s account. In addition,
	broker-dealers who sell these securities to persons other than established customers and “accredited investors” must
	make a special written determination that the penny stock is a suitable investment for the purchaser and receive the purchaser’s
	written agreement to the transaction. Consequently, these requirements may have the effect of reducing the level of trading activity,
	if any, in the secondary market for a security subject to the penny stock rules. If a trading market does develop for our common
	stock, these regulations will likely be applicable, and investors in our common stock may find it difficult to sell their shares.


	 




	FINRA sales practice requirements
	may limit a stockholder’s ability to buy and sell our stock.




	 


	FINRA has adopted rules that require that
	in recommending an investment to a customer, a broker-dealer must have reasonable grounds for believing that the investment is
	suitable for that customer. Prior to recommending speculative low priced securities to their non-institutional customers, broker-dealers
	must make reasonable efforts to obtain information about the customer’s financial status, tax status, investment objectives
	and other information. Under interpretations of these rules, FINRA believes that there is a high probability that speculative low
	priced securities will not be suitable for at least some customers. FINRA requirements make it more difficult for broker-dealers
	to recommend that their customers buy our common stock, which may have the effect of reducing the level of trading activity in
	our common stock. As a result, fewer broker-dealers may be willing to make a market in our common stock, reducing a stockholder’s
	ability to resell shares of our common stock.


	 


	 




	Our insiders beneficially own a significant
	portion of our stock, and accordingly, may have control over stockholder matters, the Company’s business and management.




	 


	The percentage ownership information shown
	in the table below is calculated based on 13,915,000 shares of our common stock issued and outstanding as of December 31, 2016.
	We do not have any outstanding options, warrants or other securities exercisable for or convertible into shares of our common stock.


	 






	 



	16



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 






	 


	 


	 


	 


	Amount and

	Nature


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Title of


	 


	 


	 


	of Beneficial


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Class


	 


	Name of Beneficial Owner


	 


	Ownership


	 


	 


	Percentage


	 




	Common Stock


	 


	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	11,160,000


	 


	 


	 


	80.2


	%




	 


	 


	President, Chairman of the board.


	 


	 



	Direct



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common Stock


	 


	Sujuan Peng


	 


	 


	252,000


	 


	 


	 


	1.81


	%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 



	Direct



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common Stock


	 


	Yanhua Xing


	 


	 


	588,000


	 


	 


	 


	4.23


	%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 



	Direct



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	All Officers and Directors as a Group


	 


	 


	12,000,000


	 


	 


	 


	86.24


	%





	 


	As a result, our executive officers, directors
	and affiliated persons will have significant influence to:


	 







	·




	Elect
	or defeat the election of our directors;





	 




	 



	·




	Amend or prevent amendment of our articles of incorporation or bylaws;





	 




	 



	·




	Effect or prevent a merger, sale of assets or other corporate transaction; and





	 




	 



	·




	Affect tome of any other matter submitted to the stockholders for vote.





	 


	Moreover, because of the significant ownership
	position held by our insiders, new investors will not be able to effect a change in the Company’s business or management,
	and therefore, shareholders would be subject to decisions made by management and the majority shareholders.


	 


	In addition, sales of significant amounts
	of shares held by our directors and executive officers, or the prospect of these sales, could adversely affect the market price
	of our common stock. Management’s stock ownership may discourage a potential acquirer from making a tender offer or otherwise
	attempting to obtain control of us, which in turn could reduce our stock price or prevent our stockholders from realizing a premium
	over our stock price.


	 




	The sale of securities by us in any
	equity or debt financing could result in dilution to our existing stockholders and have a material adverse effect on our earnings.




	 


	We are authorized to issue up to 100,000,000
	shares of common stock, of which 13,915,000 shares are issued and outstanding. Our Board of Directors has the authority to cause
	us to issue additional shares of common stock, and to determine the rights, preferences and privilege of such shares, without consent
	of any of our stockholders. Any sale of common stock by us in a future private placement offering could result in dilution to the
	existing stockholders as a direct result of our issuance of additional shares of our capital stock. In addition, our business strategy
	may include expansion through internal growth by acquiring complementary businesses, acquiring or licensing additional brands,
	or establishing strategic relationships with targeted customers and suppliers. In order to do so, or to finance the cost of our
	other activities, we may issue additional equity securities that could dilute our stockholders’ stock ownership. We may also
	assume additional debt and incur impairment losses related to goodwill and other tangible assets, and this could negatively impact
	our earnings and results of operations.


	 




	If securities or industry analysts
	do not publish research or reports about our business, or if they downgrade their recommendations regarding our common stock, our
	stock price and trading volume could decline.




	 


	The trading market for our common stock
	may be influenced by the research and reports that industry or securities analysts publish about us or our business. If any of
	the analysts who cover us downgrade our common stock, our common stock price would likely decline. If analysts cease coverage of
	our company or fail to regularly publish reports on us, we could lose visibility in the financial markets, which in turn could
	cause our common stock price or trading volume to decline.


	 






	 



	17



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	If we continue to fail to maintain
	an effective system of internal controls, we might not be able to report our financial results accurately or prevent fraud; in
	that case, our stockholders could lose confidence in our financial reporting, which could negatively impact the price of our stock.




	 


	Effective internal controls are necessary
	for us to provide reliable financial reports and prevent fraud. In addition, Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002,
	or the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, requires us to evaluate and report on our internal control over financial reporting for all our current
	operations. The process of implementing our internal controls and complying with Section 404 will be expensive and time -
	consuming, and will require significant attention of management. We cannot be certain that these measures will ensure that we implement
	and maintain adequate controls over our financial processes and reporting in the future. Even if we conclude, and our independent
	registered public accounting firm concurs, that our internal control over financial reporting provides reasonable assurance regarding
	the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
	accepted accounting principles, because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent
	or detect fraud or misstatements. Failure to implement required new or improved controls, or difficulties encountered in their
	implementation, could harm our operating results or cause us to fail to meet our reporting obligations. If we or our independent
	registered public accounting firm discover a material weakness or a significant deficiency in our internal control, the disclosure
	of that fact, even if quickly remedied, could reduce the market’s confidence in our financial statements and harm our stock
	price. In addition, a delay in compliance with Section 404 could subject us to a variety of administrative sanctions, including
	ineligibility for short form resale registration, action by the Securities and Exchange Commission, and the inability of registered
	broker-dealers to make a market in our common stock, which could further reduce our stock price and harm our business.


	 




	Because we do not intend to pay any
	dividends on our common stock, holders of our common stock must rely on stock appreciation for any return on their investment.




	 


	There are no restrictions in our Articles
	of Incorporation or Bylaws that prevent us from declaring dividends. The Florida Revised Statutes, however, do prohibit us from
	declaring dividends where, after giving effect to the distribution of the dividend we would not be able to pay our debts as they
	become due in the usual course of business; or our total assets would be less than the sum of our total liabilities plus the amount
	that would be needed to satisfy the rights of shareholders who have preferential rights superior to those receiving the distribution.
	We paid dividends on our common stock in 2013. We do not anticipate paying any such dividends for the foreseeable future. Accordingly,
	holders of our common stock will have to rely on capital appreciation, if any, to earn a return on their investment in our common
	stock.


	 




	The requirements of being a public
	company may strain our resources, divert management’s attention and affect our ability to attract and retain qualified members
	for our Board of Directors.




	 


	As a public company, we will be subject
	to the reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), and the Sarbanes-Oxley
	Act. The requirements of these rules and regulations increase our legal, accounting and financial compliance costs, may make some
	activities more difficult, time-consuming and costly and may also place undue strain on our personnel, systems and resources.


	 


	In order to maintain and improve the effectiveness
	of our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting, we will need to expend significant resources
	and provide significant management oversight. We have a substantial effort ahead of us to implement appropriate processes, document
	our system of internal control over relevant processes, assess their design, remediate any deficiencies identified and test their
	operation. As a result, management’s attention may be diverted from other business concerns, which could harm our business,
	operating results and financial condition. These efforts will also involve substantial accounting-related costs.


	 


	As a result of these and other factors,
	our operating results may not meet the expectations of investors or public market analysts who choose to follow our company. Our
	failure to meet market expectations would likely result in decreases in the trading price of our common stock.


	 






	 



	18



	 










	 


	 


	 






	 











	Item 2.




	Properties.





	 


	We lease our new hospital building from
	Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd, which is owned by Junsheng Zhang, a related party. The property was leased from
	the related party by financial leasing. The price of the leasing agreement referred to the local market price and audited by the
	auditor. The Leasing terms consist of 30 payments. Each payment will be made on an annual basis when 7 million RMB per payment
	will be paid upfront for each leasing period. The first payment was made on September 1

	st

	, 2014. At the end of the leasing
	period, a final payment will be made to settle the total leasing amount. Both parties agreed for the leasee to pay 3 million RMB
	as deposit at the execution of the Leasing Agreement, which will be deducted from the final rental settlement. The lending interest
	rate was calculated at 6.55%, which is the benchmark interest rate announced from The People’s Bank of China. After the completion
	of all payments, the ownership of the lease item will be transferred to the Leasee (Jiarun hospital). We are using the new hospital
	building now, having moved into it in December of 2014.



	 











	Item 3.




	Legal Proceedings.





	 


	We are currently not involved in any litigation
	that we believe could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or results of operations. There is no action, suit,
	proceeding, inquiry or investigation before or by any court, public board, government agency, self-regulatory organization or body
	pending or, to the knowledge of the executive officers of our company or any of our subsidiaries, threatened against or affecting
	our company, our common stock, any of our subsidiaries or of our companies or our subsidiaries’ officers or directors in
	their capacities as such, in which an adverse decision could have a material adverse effect.




	 












	Item 4.




	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders





	 


	None


	 






	 



	19



	 











	 


	 


	 






	 







	PART II



	 







	Item 5.           
	Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities.



	 




	Market Information




	 


	Our shares of common stock are currently
	listed for trading on the OTC Bulletin Board. On October 23, 2015 the FINRA cleared the shares of JRSIS Health Care Corporation’s
	common stock to commence trading on the OTC Bulletin Board under the symbol “JRSS.” and approved for DTC Eligibility
	on December 21, 2015.


	 




	Holders of Securities




	 


	As of March 29, 2017, we had
	101 recorded shareholders and 13,915,000 outstanding shares of common stock, par value $0.001. We have 1,589,000 plus the
	326,000 shares registered pursuant to the S-1, which of our outstanding shares are eligible for sale pursuant to Rule
	144.


	 


	In general, under Rule 144 as currently
	in effect, a person who is not one of our officers, directors, or principal shareholders, and who has owned their shares for at
	least six months, may sell their shares without limitation in the public market.




	 






	Dividends




	 


	We have not declared or paid any cash dividends
	on our common stock since our inception, and our board of directors currently intends to retain all earnings for use in the business
	for the foreseeable future. Any future payment of dividends will depend upon our results of operations, financial condition, cash
	requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our board of directors. There are currently no restrictions that limit our ability
	to declare cash dividends on its common stock and we do not believe that there are any that are likely to do so in the future.


	 




	Recent Sales of Unregistered Securities




	 


	None






	 



	20



	 










	 


	 


	 






	 











	Item 6.




	Selected Financial Data.





	 


	Smaller reporting companies
	are not required to provide information required under this item.



	 











	Item 7.




	Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
	Condition and Results of Operations





	 


	The following discussion and analysis of
	our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our consolidated financial statements and the notes thereto included
	elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted
	in the United States. The preparation of such financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the
	reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. On an ongoing basis, we evaluate these estimates, including those
	related to useful lives of real estate assets, bad debts, impairment, contingencies and litigation. We base our estimates on historical
	experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form
	the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources.
	There can be no assurance that actual results will not differ from those estimates. The analysis set forth below is provided pursuant
	to applicable SEC regulations and is not intended to serve as a basis for projections of future events. See “Cautionary Statement
	Regarding Forward Looking Statements” above.


	 



	Overview



	 


	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Company Limited
	(“Jiarun Hospital”) was established in Harbin in the Province of Heilongjiang of the People’s Republic of China
	(“PRC”) by the owner Junsheng Zhang on February 17, 2006


	 


	Jiarun is a private hospital serving patients
	on a municipal and county level and providing both Western and Chinese medical practices to the residents of Harbin. Jiarun specializes
	in the areas of Pediatrics, Dermatology, ENT, Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM), Ophthalmology, Internal Medicine Dentistry, General
	Surgery, Rehabilitation Science, Gynecology, General Medical Services, etc.


	 






	 



	21



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	On November 20, 2013, Junsheng Zhang, the
	officer of Jiarun Hospital established JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION, a Florida corporation (“JHCC” or the “Company”).
	On February 25, 2013, the officer of Jiarun Hospital established JRSIS HEALTH CARE LIMITED ("JHCL"), a wholly owned subsidiary
	of the Company. On September 17, 2012, the officer of Jiarun Hospital established Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”),
	a wholly owned subsidiary of JHCL. Runteng, a Hong Kong registered Investment Company, holds a seventy percent (70%) ownership
	interest in Harbin Jiarun Hospital Company Ltd, a Heilongjiang registered company.


	 


	On December 20, 2013, the Company acquired
	One Hundred Percent (100%) of the issued and outstanding capital stock of JRSIS Health Care Limited, a privately held Limited Liability
	Company registered in the British Virgin Islands (“JHCL”) for Twelve Million (12,000,000) shares of our common stock.
	JHCL, through its wholly owned subsidiary, Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”), holds majority ownership in
	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd, a company duly incorporated, organized and validly existing under the laws of China (“Jiarun”).
	As the parent company, JHCC relies on Jiarun Hospital to conduct One Hundred Percent (100%) of our businesses and operations.


	 


	We have two sources of patient revenues:
	in-patient service revenues and out-patient service revenues. In addition to provide services to our patients, we also sell pharmaceutical
	medicines to our patients. Revenues from such sales are included in either our in-patient service revenues or our out-patient service
	revenues. Our revenues come from individuals as well as third-party payers, including PRC government programs and insurance providers,
	under which the hospital is paid based upon local government established charges. Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine. Patient service revenue is recognized when it is both earned and
	realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has been provided to the
	patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	 






	 



	22



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	Plan of Operation



	 


	Over the next twelve
	months, we will concentrate on the following four areas to grow our operations:


	 







	●




	Capital
	and Funding – Seek to obtain capital from all available sources to complete our hospital expansion and acquisition targets.





	 







	●




	Advertising
	and Marketing – Work with several marketing companies to develop brand identity, marketing materials, and update our web
	site. Utilize all available marketing venues and public relations opportunities to promote the Company and its medicine and services.





	 



	Critical Accounting Policies and Management Estimates



	 


	Our discussion and analysis of our financial
	condition and results of operations relates to our consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with
	the United States generally accepted accounting principles ("U.S. GAAP"). The consolidated financial statements include
	the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All significant inter-company accounts and transactions have been eliminated
	in consolidation.



	 




	Principles of Consolidation



	 


	The consolidated financial statements include
	the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All inter-company transactions and balances have been eliminated in consolidation.
	Non-controlling interests represent the equity interest in Jiarun that is not attributable to the Company. Non-controlling interest
	is reported in the consolidated financial position within equity, separately from the Company’s equity and that net income
	or loss and comprehensive income or loss are attributable to the Company’s and the non-controlling interest.


	 






	 



	23



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	Use of Estimates



	 


	The preparation of audited consolidated
	financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported
	amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and
	the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. Management makes these estimates using the best information
	available at the time the estimates are made; however actual results could differ from those estimates. Significant items subject
	to such estimates and assumptions include valuation allowances for receivables and recoverability of carrying amount and the estimated
	useful lives of long-lived assets. These estimates are often based on complex judgments and assumptions that management believes
	to be reasonable but are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Actual results could differ from these estimates.


	 



	Revenue Recognition




	 



	The Company recognizes revenue when the
	amount of revenue can be reliably measured, it is probable that economic benefits will flow to the entity and specific criteria
	have been met for each of the Company's activities as described below.


	 


	Medicine sales


	 


	Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company's policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine.


	 


	Given the nature of this revenue source
	of the Company's business and the applicable rules guiding revenue recognition, the revenue recognition practices for the sale
	of medicine do not contain estimates that materially affect results of operations nor any policy for return of products.


	 


	Patient services


	 


	In accordance with the medical licenses
	of Jiarun, the approved medical patient service scope of the Company include medical consulting, surgery, obstetrics and gynecology,
	pediatrics, anesthesia, clinic laboratory, medical imaging, and traditional Chinese medicine, etc.


	 


	Patient service revenue is recognized when
	it is both earned and realized. The Company's policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has been
	provided to the patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	 


	The Company provides services to both patients
	covered by social insurance and patients who are not covered by social insurance. The Company charges the same rates for patient
	services regardless of the coverage by social insurance.


	 


	Patients who are not covered by social
	insurance are liable for the total cost of medical treatment.


	 







	·




	For
	out-patient medical services, revenue is recognized when the Company provides medical service to the patient. The Company collects
	payment when the patient checks out from the hospital, which is the same day the services are provided





	 







	·




	For
	in-patient medical services, the Company estimates the approximate fee the patients will spend in the hospital based on patients'
	symptom. This is when the patients check in to the hospital. At that time, the Company collects the estimated fees from the patient
	and records the payment as deposits received.





	 


	During the in-patient services period,
	the Company recognizes revenue when the patient service is provided and deducts the cost of service from the deposit received.
	The Company records these transactions based on daily reports generated by the respective medical department. When medical services
	exceed patient deposits received the Company records revenue and accounts receivable when the patient services are provided.


	 






	 



	24



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	When patients check out from the hospital,
	the Company calculates and determines the remaining deposit, if any, and refunds the unused portion of the deposit to the patients.
	In the case where the patients have a balance in accounts receivable during the in-patient period, accounts receivable are required
	to be paid in full at checkout.


	 


	Patients covered by social insurance will
	receive a portion or full medical services reimbursed or paid by the social insurance agencies via prepaid cards or the insurance
	claim settlement process.



	 





	Settlement process




	 


	The Company is a registered medical service
	vendor under the state social insurance system for various social insurance agencies; the insurance agencies include “Social
	Medical Insurance funded by PRC and Heilongjiang Province” and “Heilongjiang Province New Rural Cooperative Medical
	Care System”. The Company utilizes an online system maintained by the social insurance agencies for patients’ who are
	covered by social insurance agencies.


	 







	·




	The
	Company records patients’ information in the social insurance system at check in. The system determines the covered portion
	and amounts based on the information input to the system.





	 







	·




	At
	the time of check out, the Company collects payment for services the patients are liable for and records accounts receivable from
	the social insurance agencies for the portion of services covered by the social insurances. In the case that the patients have
	made payment during the in-patient services period, the Company refunds any amount in excess of the portion they are liable for.





	 







	·




	The
	Company is responsible for submitting supporting documents of patient services provided to the social insurance agencies for their
	review. The Company also requires reconciling its records with the social insurance agencies once a month. Once the social insurance
	agencies approve the reconciliation, the insurance agencies will settle the accounts receivable balance in the next month following
	the approval.






	 




	Income Taxes and Uncertain Tax Positions



	 


	The Company adopts FASB ASC Topic 740,
	"Income Taxes," which requires the recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences
	of events that have been included in the financial statements or tax returns. Under this method, deferred income taxes are recognized
	for the tax consequences in future years of differences between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and their financial reporting
	amounts at each period end based on enacted tax laws and statutory tax rates applicable to the periods in which the differences
	are expected to affect taxable income. Valuation allowances are established, when necessary, to reduce deferred tax assets to the
	amount expected to be realized.


	 


	In July 2006, the FASB issued FIN 48(ASC
	740-10), Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes-An Interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109 (ASC 740), which requires income
	tax positions to meet a more-likely-than-not recognition threshold to be recognized in the financial statements. Under FIN 48(ASC
	740-10), tax positions that previously failed to meet the more-likely-than-not threshold should be recognized in the first subsequent
	financial reporting period in which that threshold is met. Previously recognized tax positions that no longer meet the more-likely-than-not
	threshold should be derecognized in the first subsequent financial reporting period in which that threshold is no longer met.


	 


	The application of tax laws and regulations
	is subject to legal and factual interpretation, judgment and uncertainty. Tax laws and regulations themselves are subject to change
	as a result of changes in fiscal policy, changes in legislation, the evolution of regulations and court rulings. Therefore, the
	actual liability may be materially different from our estimates, which could result in the need to record additional tax liabilities
	or potentially reverse previously recorded tax liabilities or deferred tax asset valuation allowance.


	 


	As a result of the implementation of FIN
	48 (ASC 740-10), the company made a comprehensive review of its portfolio of tax positions in accordance with recognition standards
	established by FIN 48 (ASC 740-10). The Company recognized no material adjustments to liabilities or shareholder's equity as a
	result of the implementation. The adoption of FIN 48 did not have a material impact on the Company's unaudited consolidated financial
	statements.


	 






	 



	25



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC, income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 


	Jiarun's medical sales and patient services
	have been exempt from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions, mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income tax of $4,059
	and $2,604 for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively to support the local tax bureau's economical obligations.
	 



	 




	Accounts Receivable



	 


	Accounts receivable are recorded at net
	realizable value consisting of the carrying amount less an allowance for uncollectible accounts as needed. The allowance for doubtful
	accounts is the Company's best estimate of the amount of probable credit losses in the Company's existing accounts receivable.
	The Company determines the allowance based on aging data, historical collection experience, customer specific facts and economic
	conditions. Account balances are charged off against the allowance after all means of collection have been exhausted and the potential
	for recovery is considered remote.



	 




	Property and Equipment



	 


	Property and equipment are stated at cost.
	Expenditures for maintenance and repairs are charged to operations when incurred, while additions and betterments are capitalized.
	Depreciation is recorded on a straight-line basis reflective of the useful lives of the assets. When assets are retired or disposed,
	the asset's original cost and related accumulated depreciation are eliminated from accounts and any gain or loss is reflected in
	income.


	 





	Buildings and improvement




	10-40 years






	Medical equipment




	5-15 years






	Transportation instrument




	5-10 years








	Office equipment




	5-10 years






	Electronic equipment




	5-10 years






	Software




	5-10 years






	 



	 




	Functional Currency and Foreign Currency
	Translations




	 



	JHCC and JHCL’s functional currency is the United States
	dollar (“US$”). Runteng’s functional currency is the Hong Kong dollar (“HK$”). The functional currency
	of Jiarun is the Renminbi (“RMB”).


	 


	The Company’s reporting currency is US$. Assets and liabilities
	of Runteng and Jiarun are translated at the current exchange rate at the balance sheet dates, revenues and expenses are translated
	at the average exchange rates during the reporting periods, and equity accounts are translated at historical rates. Translation
	adjustments are reported in other comprehensive income.


	 






	 



	26



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 





	Results of Operations for the Years
	Ended December 31, 2016 and 2015



	 


	The following table shows key components
	of the results of operations during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015: 


	 




	 


	 


	For the Year Ended

	December 31,


	 


	 


	Change


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	$


	 


	 


	%


	 




	Revenue:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Medicine


	 


	$


	7,998,195


	 


	 


	$


	5,503,971


	 


	 


	$


	2,494,224


	 


	 


	 


	45


	%




	Patient services


	 


	 


	10,120,550


	 


	 


	 


	6,368,432


	 


	 


	 


	3,752,118


	 


	 


	 


	59


	%




	Total revenue


	 


	 


	18,118,745


	 


	 


	 


	11,872,403


	 


	 


	 


	6,246,342


	 


	 


	 


	53


	%




	Operating costs and expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of medicine sold


	 


	 


	4,882,316


	 


	 


	 


	3,331,264


	 


	 


	 


	1,551,052


	 


	 


	 


	47


	%




	Medical consumables


	 


	 


	1,747,917


	 


	 


	 


	839,702


	 


	 


	 


	908,215


	 


	 


	 


	108


	%




	Salaries and benefits


	 


	 


	2,861,888


	 


	 


	 


	1,876,362


	 


	 


	 


	985,526


	 


	 


	 


	53


	%




	Office supplies


	 


	 


	378,691


	 


	 


	 


	351,353


	 


	 


	 


	27,338


	 


	 


	 


	8


	%




	Vehicle expenses


	 


	 


	56,605


	 


	 


	 


	36,013


	 


	 


	 


	20,592


	 


	 


	 


	57


	%




	Utilities expenses


	 


	 


	443,054


	 


	 


	 


	491,209


	 


	 


	 


	(48,155


	)


	 


	 


	(10


	%)




	Advertising and promotion expenses


	 


	 


	119,156


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	119,156


	 


	 


	 



	NA



	 




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	1,384,826


	 


	 


	 


	1,244,185


	 


	 


	 


	140,641


	 


	 


	 


	11


	%




	Professional fee


	 


	 


	140,059


	 


	 


	 


	200,904


	 


	 


	 


	(60,845


	)


	 


	 


	(30


	%)




	Depreciation


	 


	 


	1,081,123


	 


	 


	 


	871,948


	 


	 


	 


	209,175


	 


	 


	 


	24


	%




	Total operating costs and expenses


	 


	 


	13,095,635


	 


	 


	 


	9,242,940


	 


	 


	 


	3,852,695


	 


	 


	 


	42


	%




	Earnings from operations before other income and income taxes


	 


	 


	5,023,110


	 


	 


	 


	2,629,463


	 


	 


	 


	2,393,647


	 


	 


	 


	91


	%




	Other income


	 


	 


	934


	 


	 


	 


	9,321


	 


	 


	 


	(8,387


	)


	 


	 


	(90


	%)




	Earnings from operations before income taxes


	 


	 


	5,024,044


	 


	 


	 


	2,638,784


	 


	 


	 


	2,385,260


	 


	 


	 


	90


	%




	Income tax


	 


	 


	4,059


	 


	 


	 


	2,604


	 


	 


	 


	1,455


	 


	 


	 


	56


	%




	Net income


	 


	 


	5,019,985


	 


	 


	 


	2,636,180


	 


	 


	 


	2,383,805


	 


	 


	 


	90


	%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other comprehensive income:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Foreign currency translation adjustment


	 


	 


	(744,676


	)


	 


	 


	(392,923


	)


	 


	 


	(351,753


	)


	 


	 


	90


	%




	Comprehensive income


	 


	$


	4,275,309


	 


	 


	$


	2,243,257


	 


	 


	$


	2,032,052


	 


	 


	 


	91


	%





	 



	Revenue



	 


	Operating revenue for the year ended December
	31, 2016, which resulted primarily from medicine revenue and patient services revenue, was $18,118,745, an increase of 53% as compared
	with the operating revenue of $11,872,403 for the year ended December 31, 2015. The increase was primarily a result of the number
	of treated inpatients growing to 14,276 patients, 4,036 more than the 10,240 patients treated in the year ended December 31, 2015.


	 



	Costs and expenses



	 


	Total costs and expenses were $13,095,635
	for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $3,852,695 or 42% as compared to $9,242,940 for the same period of 2015. This
	increase was primarily due to significant increases cost of medicine supplies of approximately $1,551,052, and increase in medical
	consumables of $908,215 and increase in Depreciation and amortization of 209,175 and salaries and benefits of 985,526.


	 






	 



	27



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	Cost of medicine sold




	 



	Cost of medicine sold mainly consists of cost
	of Western medicine, Chinese medicine and herbal medicine. Total cost of medicine sold was $4,882,316 for the year ended December
	31, 2016, an increase of $1,551,052 or 47% as compared to $3,331,264 for the same period of 2015. This increase was primarily due
	to significant increases in cost of Western medicine and Chinese medicine of $1,495,534. For the year ended December 31, 2016,
	the cost of Western medicine and Chinese medicine were $4,764,468, as compared to $3,268,935 for the same period of 2015.


	 



	Medical consumables




	 



	Medical consumables mainly consist of materials
	expenses, medical film expenses and test reagent. Total medical consumables were $1,747,917 for the year ended December 31, 2016,
	an increase of $908,215 or 108% as compared to $839,702 for the same period of 2015. The increase was mainly a result of increase
	in materials expenses of $546,193 and increase in consultation expenses of $106,733, and increase in test reagent expense of $119,847.


	 



	Salaries and benefits




	 



	Salaries and benefits mainly consist of
	salaries expenses, and social insurance expenses. Total salaries and benefits were $2,861,888 for the year ended December 31, 2016,
	an increase of $985,526 or 53% as compared to $1,876,362 for the same period of 2015. The increase was mainly a result of increase
	in salaries expenses of $918,411 and increase in social insurance expenses of $67,187.


	 



	Depreciation and amortization



	 


	Total Depreciation and amortization was
	$1,081,123 for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $209,175 or 24% as compared to $871,948 for the same period of
	2015.The increase was mainly a result of increase in depreciation of 206,987.



	 




	Income taxes



	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC, income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt from enterprise income
	tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 






	 



	28



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievements of the
	hospital, they could not have been reached without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income
	tax voluntary of $4,059 and $2,604 for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively to support the local tax bureau's
	economical obligations.



	 




	Income from operations and net income



	 


	Income from Operations was $5,023,110 for
	the year ended December 31, 2016, as compared with operating income of $2,629,463 for the year ended December 31, 2015. The Company’s
	net income for the year ended December 31, 2016 was $5,019,985 representing an increase of $2,383,805 or 90%, over $2,636,180 for
	the year ended December 31, 2015. The increase of income from operations and net income for the year ended December 31, 2016 were
	primarily due to aforementioned changes in operating revenue and operating expenses.


	 





	Liquidity and Capital Resources



	 


	The accompanying financial statements have
	been prepared for the Company to continue as a going concern which contemplates, among other things, the realization of assets
	and satisfaction of liabilities in the ordinary course of business.


	 


	As of December 31, 2016, the Company had
	approximately $890,662 of cash and cash equivalents. 


	  


	We are presently able to meet our obligations
	as they come due. As of December 31, 2016, we had non-controlling interest of $5,052,518 and shareholders’ equity of
	$6,634,336.


	 


	We anticipate that our future liquidity
	requirements will arise from the need to fund our growth, pay current obligations and future capital expenditures. The primary
	sources of funding for such requirements are expected to be cash generated from operations and raising additional funds from the
	public offering and/or debt financing. However, we can provide no assurances that we will be able to generate sufficient cash flow
	from operations and/or obtain additional financing on terms satisfactory to us, if at all, to remain a going concern.


	 



	Cash Flows and Capital Resources

	 


	 


	We believe that we will generate cash flow
	from our business, which, along with our available cash, will provide sufficient liquidity and financial flexibility.


	 


	Our cash flows are summarized below: 


	 






	 


	 


	The Year Ended December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Net cash provided by operating activities


	 


	 


	4,986,466


	 


	 


	 


	2,531,639


	 




	Net cash used in investing activities


	 


	 


	(3,610,797


	)


	 


	 


	(4,532,655


	)




	Net cash used in (provided by) financing activities


	 


	 


	(776,198


	)


	 


	 


	1,335,318


	 




	Effect of exchange rate fluctuation on cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	(60,962


	)


	 


	 


	(28,634


	)




	Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	538,509


	 


	 


	 


	(694,332


	)




	Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period


	 


	 


	352,153


	 


	 


	 


	1,046,485


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, ending of period


	 


	$


	890,662


	 


	 


	$


	352,153


	 





	  






	 



	29



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	Net Cash Provided by Operating Activities




	 




	For
	the year ended December 31, 2016, we had positive cash flow from operating activities of $4,986,466, an increase of $2,454,827
	from the same period of 2015, during which we had cash flow from operating activities of $2,531,639. The net income for the year
	ended December 31, 2016 increase by $2,383,805 as compared to the year ended December 31, 2015. The increase in net cash provided
	by operating activities was also the result of several factors, mainly including:



	 


	·

	An increase of due to related parties’ items totaling $883,027, which was due to the decrease in payment to related parties.




	 





	·

	An increase of due to accounts payable items totaling $352,514, which was the increase in procurement of medicines and equipment.



	 



	Net Cash Used in Investing Activities




	 



	Net cash used in investing activities for
	the year ended December 31, 2016 was $3,610,797, compared to net cash used in investing activities of $4,532,655 for the year ended
	December 31, 2015. The cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2016, was mainly used for the purchase
	of medical equipment.


	 



	Net Cash Provided by Financing Activities




	 



	Net cash used in financing activities for
	the year ended December 31, 2016 was $776,198, as compared to net cash provided by financing activities of $1,335,318 for the year
	ended December 31, 2015. The cash used in financing activities increased for the year ended December 31, 2016 was mainly due to
	proceeds from finance lease decreased $2,350,085 and increased in payments on capital lease obligation $1,148,692.


	 



	Trends, Events and Uncertainties



	 


	The China Ministry of Health, as well as
	other related agencies, may change the prices we can charge for medical services, drugs and medications. We cannot predict the
	impact of these proposed changes since the changes are not fully defined and we do not know whether such changes will ever be implemented
	or when they may take effect.


	 


	In December 2014, our operations moved
	into the new building. We have finished most of the decoration of the new building, part of the expansion of medical facilities
	and purchases of new medical equipment. The hospital will need more medical facilities to update the medical equipment and acquire
	one pharmaceuticals wholesale and one medicine retail company. The new hospital building is being constructed by Harbin Baiyi Real
	Estate Development Co., Ltd, which is owned by Junsheng Zhang, a related party. The building was leased from the related party
	by financial leasing. The price of the Leasing Agreement referred to the local market price and audited by the auditor. The Leasing
	terms consist of 30 payments. Each payment will be made on an annual basis when 7 million RMB per payment will be paid upfront
	for each leasing period. The first payment was made on September 1

	st

	, 2014. At the end of the leasing period, a final
	payment will be made to settle the total leasing amount. Both parties agreed for the leasee to pay 3 million RMB as deposit at
	the execution of the Leasing Agreement, which will be deducted from the final rental settlement. The lending interest rate was
	calculated at 6.55%, which is the benchmark interest rate announced from The People’s Bank of China. After the completion
	of all payments, the ownership of the lease item will be transferred to the Jiarun.


	 


	We plan to acquire other hospitals and
	companies involved in the healthcare industry in the PRC using cash and shares of our common stock. Substantial capital may be
	needed for these acquisitions and we may need to raise additional funds through the sale of our common stock, debt financing or
	other arrangements. We do not have any commitments or arrangements from any person to provide us with any additional capital. Additional
	capital may not be available to us, or if available, on acceptable terms, in which case we would not be able to acquire other hospitals
	or businesses in the healthcare industry.


	 


	Other than the factors listed above we
	do not know of any trends, events or uncertainties that have had or are reasonably expected to have a material impact on our net
	sales or revenues or income from continuing operations. Our business is not seasonal in nature.


	 



	Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements



	 


	We do not have any off-balance sheet items
	reasonably likely to have a material effect on our financial condition.


	 






	 



	30



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	Recent Accounting
	Pronouncements



	 


	Recent accounting pronouncements issued
	by the FASB, the AICPA and the SEC did not, or are not believed by management to, have a material effect on the Company’s
	present or future consolidated financial statements.




	 











	Item 7A.




	Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market
	Risk.





	 


	Not applicable.



	 











	Item 8.




	Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.





	 


	 






	 



	31



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



	  




	 




	Page






	 


	 






	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	 




	 


	 






	Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm





	F -2





	 


	 






	Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2016 and 2015





	F -3





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Income and Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015





	F -4





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statement of Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015





	F -5





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015





	F- 6





	 


	 






	Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements





	F -7





	 






	 


	F-

	1



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC
	ACCOUNTING FIRM





	 


	To: the Board of Directors and Stockholders
	of JRSIS Health Care Corporation


	 


	We have audited the accompanying consolidated
	balance sheets of JRSIS Health Care Corporation and subsidiaries (“the Company”) as of December 31, 2016 and 2015 the
	related statements of operations, stockholders’ equity and cash flows for each of the years in the period ended December
	31, 2016 and 2015. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
	express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audit.


	 


	We conducted our audits in accordance with
	the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform
	the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. The company
	is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. Our audit included
	consideration of internal control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that are appropriate in the
	circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over
	financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion. An audit also includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting
	the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements, assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made
	by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable
	basis for our opinion.


	 


	In our opinion, the consolidated financial
	statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of JRSIS Health Care
	Corporation as of December 31, 2016 and 2015, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for the years then ended in
	conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.


	  


	 



	/s/ Centurion ZD CPA Limited



	Centurion ZD CPA Limited


	(fka DCAW (CPA) Limited)


	Certified Public Accountants


	 


	Hong Kong, China


	March 29, 2017




	 






	 


	F-

	2



	 










	 


	 


	 






	 







	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES)




	 





	 


	 


	December 31,


	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Assets:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents


	 


	$


	890,662


	 


	 


	$


	352,153


	 




	Accounts receivable, net


	 


	 


	3,335,500


	 


	 


	 


	2,009,469


	 




	Inventories


	 


	 


	801,240


	 


	 


	 


	499,080


	 




	Other receivables


	 


	 


	1,555


	 


	 


	 


	2,125


	 




	Prepayments


	 


	 


	518,722


	 


	 


	 


	201,542


	 




	Amount due from related parties


	 


	 


	1,804,987


	 


	 


	 


	1,080,236


	 




	Deferred expenses


	 


	 


	64,967


	 


	 


	 


	63,034


	 




	Total current assets


	 


	 


	7,417,633


	 


	 


	 


	4,207,639


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Property and equipment, net


	 


	 


	23,274,180


	 


	 


	 


	22,447,911


	 




	Long term deferred expenses


	 


	 


	164,676


	 


	 


	 


	252,138


	 




	Deposits for capital leases


	 


	 


	846,101


	 


	 


	 


	828,131


	 




	Total assets


	 


	$


	31,702,590


	 


	 


	$


	27,735,819


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Liabilities and shareholders’ equity


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	$


	743,660


	 


	 


	$


	352,789


	 




	Deposits received


	 


	 


	5,751


	 


	 


	 


	6,666


	 




	Amount due to related parties


	 


	 


	25,329


	 


	 


	 


	97,328


	 




	Other payable


	 


	 


	77,973


	 


	 


	 


	78,307


	 




	Payroll payable


	 


	 


	52,072


	 


	 


	 


	44,376


	 




	Capital lease obligations - current portion


	 


	 


	2,313,038


	 


	 


	 


	1,881,200


	 




	Total current liabilities


	 


	 


	3,217,823


	 


	 


	 


	2,460,666


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Capital lease obligations


	 


	 


	16,222,992


	 


	 


	 


	17,863,608


	 




	Other capital lease payable


	 


	 


	574,921


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Total liabilities


	 


	$


	20,015,736


	 


	 


	$


	20,324,274


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Shareholders’ equity


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common stock; $0.001 par value, 100,000,000 shares authorized; 13,915,000 and 13,915,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively


	 


	 


	13,915


	 


	 


	 


	13,915


	 




	Additional Paid-in capital


	 


	 


	1,132,423


	 


	 


	 


	1,132,423


	 




	Retained earnings


	 


	 


	6,274,052


	 


	 


	 


	2,802,184


	 




	Other comprehensive income


	 


	 


	(786,055


	)


	 


	 


	(260,669


	)




	Total shareholders’ equity of the Company


	 


	 


	6,634,335


	 


	 


	 


	3,687,853


	 




	Non-controlling interest


	 


	 


	5,052,519


	 


	 


	 


	3,723,692


	 




	Total shareholders’ equity


	 


	 


	11,686,854


	 


	 


	 


	7,411,545


	 




	Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity


	 


	$


	31,702,590


	 


	 


	$


	27,735,819


	 






	 




	See notes to consolidated
	financial statements

	 


	 






	 


	F-

	3



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME AND
	COMPREHENSIVE INCOME




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES)



	 




	 


	 


	For The Year Ended 

	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Revenue:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Medicine


	 


	$


	7,998,195


	 


	 


	$


	5,503,971


	 




	Patient services


	 


	 


	10,120,550


	 


	 


	 


	6,368,432


	 




	Total revenue


	 


	 


	18,118,745


	 


	 


	 


	11,872,403


	 




	Operating costs and expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of medicine sold


	 


	 


	4,882,316


	 


	 


	 


	3,331,264


	 




	Medical consumables


	 


	 


	1,747,917


	 


	 


	 


	839,702


	 




	Salaries and benefits


	 


	 


	2,861,888


	 


	 


	 


	1,876,362


	 




	Office supplies


	 


	 


	378,691


	 


	 


	 


	351,353


	 




	Vehicle expenses


	 


	 


	56,605


	 


	 


	 


	36,013


	 




	Utilities expenses


	 


	 


	443,054


	 


	 


	 


	491,209


	 




	Advertising and promotion expenses


	 


	 


	119,156


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	1,384,826


	 


	 


	 


	1,244,185


	 




	Professional fee


	 


	 


	140,059


	 


	 


	 


	200,904


	 




	Depreciation


	 


	 


	1,081,123


	 


	 


	 


	871,948


	 




	Total operating costs and expenses


	 


	 


	13,095,635


	 


	 


	 


	9,242,940


	 




	Earnings from operations before other income and income taxes


	 


	 


	5,023,110


	 


	 


	 


	2,629,463


	 




	Other income


	 


	 


	934


	 


	 


	 


	9,321


	 




	Earnings from operations before income taxes


	 


	 


	5,024,044


	 


	 


	 


	2,638,784


	 




	Income tax


	 


	 


	4,059


	 


	 


	 


	2,604


	 




	Net income


	 


	 


	5,019,985


	 


	 


	 


	2,636,180


	 




	Less: net income attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	1,548,117


	 


	 


	 


	845,467


	 




	Net income attributable to the Company


	 


	$


	3,471,868


	 


	 


	$


	1,790,713


	 




	Other comprehensive income:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Foreign currency translation adjustment attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	(219,290


	)


	 


	 


	(118,209


	)




	Foreign currency translation adjustment attributable to the Company


	 


	 


	(525,386


	)


	 


	 


	(274,714


	)




	Comprehensive income


	 


	$


	4,275,309


	 


	 


	$


	2,243,257


	 




	Less: Comprehensive income attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	1,328,827


	 


	 


	 


	727,258


	 




	Comprehensive income attributable to the Company


	 


	$


	2,946,482


	 


	 


	$


	1,515,999


	 




	Basic and diluted earnings per share


	 


	$


	0.2495


	 


	 


	$


	0.1293


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 


	 


	 


	13,850,244


	 





	 



	See notes to consolidated
	financial statements

	  


	 






	 


	F-

	4



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 







	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF SHARESHOLDERS’
	EQUITY




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES)



	 




	 


	 


	Common stock


	 


	 


	Retained


	 


	 


	Other

	comprehensive


	 


	 


	Additional

	paid-in


	 


	 


	Non-

	Controlling


	 


	 


	Total

	Shareholders’


	 




	 


	 


	Quantity


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	Earnings


	 


	 


	income


	 


	 


	capital


	 


	 


	Interest


	 


	 


	equity


	 




	Balance at December 31, 2014


	 


	 


	13,604,000


	 


	 


	$


	13,604


	 


	 


	$


	1,011,471


	 


	 


	$


	14,045


	 


	 


	$


	954,686


	 


	 


	$


	2,996,434


	 


	 


	$


	4,990,240


	 




	 Net income


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	1,790,713


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	845,467


	 


	 


	 


	2,636,180


	 




	 Stock Exchange Merger & Acquisition


	 


	 


	311,000


	 


	 


	 


	311


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	177,737


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	178,048


	 




	 Foreign currency translation adjustment


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(274,714


	)


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(118,209


	)


	 


	 


	(392,923


	)




	Balance at December 31, 2015


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 


	 


	$


	13,915


	 


	 


	$


	2,802,184


	 


	 


	$


	(260,669


	)


	 


	$


	1,132,423


	 


	 


	$


	3,723,692


	 


	 


	$


	7,411,545


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 Net income


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	3,471,868


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	1,548,117


	 


	 


	 


	5,019,985


	 




	 Stock Exchange Merger & Acquisition


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 Foreign currency translation adjustment


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(525,386


	)


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(219,290


	)


	 


	 


	(744,676


	)




	Balance at December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 


	 


	$


	13,915


	 


	 


	$


	6,274,052


	 


	 


	$


	(786,055


	)


	 


	$


	1,132,423


	 


	 


	$


	5,052,519


	 


	 


	$


	11,686,854


	 





	 



	See notes to consolidated financial statements



	 






	 


	F-

	5



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 








	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES)



	 




	 


	 


	For The Year Ended

	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Cash Flows From Operating Activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income


	 


	$


	5,019,985


	 


	 


	$


	2,636,180


	 




	Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Depreciation


	 


	 


	1,081,123


	 


	 


	 


	871,948


	 




	Interest


	 


	 


	1,384,826


	 


	 


	 


	1,244,185


	 




	Gain on disposal of fixed assets


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(12,370


	)




	Changes in operating assets and liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts receivable, net


	 


	 


	(1,523,067


	)


	 


	 


	(1,440,617


	)




	Inventories


	 


	 


	(349,866


	)


	 


	 


	(341,698


	)




	Amount due from related parties


	 


	 


	(827,802


	)


	 


	 


	(939,964


	)




	Prepayments and other current assets


	 


	 


	(173,064


	)


	 


	 


	491,212


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	 


	432,616


	 


	 


	 


	80,102


	 




	Amount due to related parties


	 


	 


	70,865


	 


	 


	 


	(812,162


	)




	Deposits received


	 


	 


	(502


	)


	 


	 


	501


	 




	Accrued expenses and other current liabilities


	 


	 


	(128,648


	)


	 


	 


	754,322


	 




	Net cash provided by operating activities


	 


	 


	4,986,466


	 


	 


	 


	2,531,639


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows From Investing Activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Purchases of fixed assets


	 


	 


	(3,475,536


	)


	 


	 


	(5,153,796


	)




	Prepayment for fixed assets acquisition (Proceed from sales buyback )


	 


	 


	(135,261


	)


	 


	 


	576,189


	 




	Proceeds from disposal of fixed assets


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	44,952


	 




	Net cash used in investing activities


	 


	 


	(3,610,797


	)


	 


	 


	(4,532,655


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows From Financing Activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Proceeds from shareholders


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	178,048


	 




	Payments on capital lease obligation


	 


	 


	(3,298,131


	)


	 


	 


	(2,149,439


	)




	Payments to related parties


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(1,099,730


	)




	Short-term bank loans


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(465,579


	)




	Proceeds from finance lease


	 


	 


	2,521,933


	 


	 


	 


	4,872,018


	 




	Net cash used in (provided by) financing activities


	 


	 


	(776,198


	)


	 


	 


	1,335,318


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Effect of exchange rate fluctuation on cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	(60,962


	)


	 


	 


	(28,634


	)




	Net (decrease)increase in cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	538,509


	 


	 


	 


	(694,332


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period


	 


	 


	352,153


	 


	 


	 


	1,046,485


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, ending of period


	 


	$


	890,662


	 


	 


	$


	352,153


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental disclosure of cash flow information


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash paid for income taxes


	 


	 


	(4,059


	)


	 


	 


	(2,604


	)




	Cash paid for interest


	 


	 


	(1,384,826


	)


	 


	 


	(1,244,185


	)






	 




	See notes to consolidated financial statements

	  


	 






	 


	F-

	6



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 






	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION






	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 




	NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF BUSINESS AND
	ORGANIZATION



	 


	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION (the “Company”
	or “JHCC”) was incorporated on November 20, 2013 under the laws of the United States and the State of Florida. The
	general nature of the business shall be to engage in any and all lawful business permitted under the laws of the United States
	and the State of Florida.


	 


	JRSIS HEALTH CARE LIMITED ("JHCL"),
	formally named China Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd, which is a privately held Limited Liability Company registered in British
	Virgin Island (“BVI”) on February 25, 2013. JHCL was authorized to issue 50,000 shares of a single class each with
	par value of $1.00 per share to its sole shareholder Ms. Yanhua Xing. On November 20, 2013, China Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd
	has changed its name to JRSIS HEALTH CARE LIMITED ("JHCL").


	 


	Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”)
	is a privately held limited liability company registered in Hong Kong on September 17, 2012. Runteng was authorized to issue up
	to 10,000 shares with par value of HK$1 per share to its sole shareholder Ms. Yanhua Xing.


	 


	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd (“Jiarun”)
	was a privately held, for-profit hospital, incorporated in Harbin city of Heilongjiang, China in February 2006. Jiarun is a private
	hospital serving patients on a municipal and county level and providing both Western and Chinese medical practices to the residents
	of Harbin. After a series of share exchanges mentioned here after in note 1, Jiarun became a 70% owned subsidiary of the Company.


	 


	JHCC, JHCL, Runteng and Jiarun are collectively
	referred as the “Group”.


	 




	Reorganization





	 



	On December 23, 2012, in accordance with
	the "Foreign Investment Enterprise Law" under the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”), Runteng and Jiarun
	entered into an agreement that Runteng and the original owner of Jiarun, Junsheng Zhang should invest a total of RMB50,000,000
	($7,936,508), in which Runteng and the original owner should contribute RMB35,000,000 ($5,555,556) or 70% and RMB15,000,000 ($2,380,952)
	or 30% of the total capital, respectively. According to the Joint Venture Investment Agreement, Runteng has the obligation to pay
	RMB35,000,000 ($5,555,556) within five years after the issuance of the joint venture business license. As of December 31, 2016,
	Jiarun has received $1,081,000 from Runteng.



	 



	On March 7, 2013, JHCL acquired all 100
	issued and outstanding shares of through share exchanges to obtain 100% controlling interests of Runteng. 


	 


	 


	On June 1, 2013, Junsheng Zhang, the owner
	of Jiarun, entered into a supplemental agreement with Runteng for the attribution of accumulated retained earnings of Jiarun. In
	which, the historical accumulated profit of Jiarun up to June 30, 2013 should be 100% attributed to Junsheng Zhang; the profit
	generated from Jiarun after July 1, 2013 should be attributed to Runteng and Junsheng Zhang on the basis of 70% and 30%, respectively.



	 







	 


	F-

	7



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 




	NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF BUSINESS AND
	ORGANIZATION (CONTINUED)



	 


	On July 29, 2013, the Joint Venture Investment
	Agreement between Runteng and Junsheng Zhang has been approved by the Development and Reform Commission of Hulan District, Harbin
	City and Harbin Investment Promotion Bureau. On the same date, Jiarun has obtained Certificate of Approval for Establishment of
	Enterprises with Investment of Taiwan, Hong Kong, Macao and Overseas Chinese in the People’s Republic of China; the Joint
	Venture prescribe duration of operation of Jiarun is twenty years.


	 


	On October 3, 2013, Ms. Yanhua Xing transferred
	23,275 JHCL shares to Mr. Junsheng Zhang, 23,225 JHCL shares to Ms. Chunlan Tang, and 1,050 JHCL shares to Mr. Weiguang Song.


	 


	On November 8, 2013, Ms. Chunlan Tang transferred
	all 23,225 JHCL shares to Mr. Junsheng Zhang, subsequently making Mr. Junsheng Zhang holdings 46,500 JHCL shares.


	  


	On December 20, 2013, a share exchange
	agreement was entered by and among JHCC, JHCL and the shareholders of JHCL, Junsheng Zhang, Yanhua Xing and Weiguang Song. JHCC
	desires to issue a total of 12,000,000 shares of its Common Stock (the “JHCC Shares”) to the Shareholders of JHCC,
	pro rata, in exchange for 100% of the JHCL Shares owned by the Shareholders. At the Closing, the Shareholders shall allot and deliver
	to JHCC a total of 50,000 shares of the ordinary share of JHCL which represents 100% of the issued and outstanding shares of JHCL.
	JHCL shall become a wholly-owned subsidiary of JHCC, and JHCC will effectively acquire all business and assets of JHCL as now or
	hereafter existing, including all business and assets of any and all subsidiaries of JHCL, including 70% ownership interest in
	Jiarun.


	 


	On July 8, 2014, Jiarun obtained joint
	venture business license. Runteng has already completed cooperation restructuring. Up to completion of the legal structures, Jiarun
	are compliance with the Company Law of People’s Republic of China and all other requirements imposed by PRC authorities.


	 


	Before and after the reorganization mentioned
	above, Junsheng Zhang continued to serve as chairman of Jiarun (the “Operating Subsidiary”), and together with the
	other management of the Company, continued to direct both day-to-day operation and management of the Operating Subsidiary, as well
	as its strategic direction. The reorganization effectively resulted in Junsheng Zhang continuing to bear the residual risks and
	rewards related to the Operating Subsidiary. Because of the reasons described above, the Company is substantively controlled by
	Junsheng Zhang, and the Company continued to consolidate the Operating subsidiary during the reorganization. And the reorganization
	transactions are considered as a series of transactions between the parties under common control and did not establish a new basis
	in the assets and liabilities of the Operating Subsidiary.


	 


	During the reorganization, JHCC, JHCL,
	Runteng and Jiarun were under common control of Junsheng Zhang. Therefore, the reorganization was effectively a legal recapitalization
	accounted for as transactions between entities under common control at the carry over basis, in a manner similar to pooling-of-interests
	accounting. The effect of the reorganization was applied retroactively to the prior years’ consolidated financial statements
	as if the current structure existed since inception.


	 


	30% of Jiarun hospital interest held by
	Junsheng Zhang is subjecting to non-controlling interest (“NCIs”), which was stated under ASC810-10-45, the ownership
	interest in the subsidiary that are held by owners other than the parent is a non-controlling interest. 70% held by Runteng is
	applying to its holding Runteng. According to the supplemental agreement signed between Junsheng Zhang and Runteng on June 1, 2013,
	the comprehensive income from Jiarun would be attributable to retained earnings and non-controlling interest for 70% and 30% respectively,
	from July 1, 2013.


	 






	 


	F-

	8



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	  



	NOTE 2. SUMMARIES OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING
	POLICIES



	 








	A.






	Basis
	of presentation






	 


	The consolidated financial statements have
	been prepared in accordance with the United States generally accepted accounting principles ("U.S. GAAP").


	 








	B.






	Principles
	of consolidation






	 


	The consolidated financial statements include
	the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All inter-company transactions and balances have been eliminated in consolidation.
	Non-controlling interests represent the equity interest in Jiarun that is not attributable to the Company. Non-controlling interest
	is reported in the consolidated financial position within equity, separately from the Company’s equity and that net income
	or loss and comprehensive income or loss are attributable to the Company’s and the non-controlling interest.


	 








	C.






	Use
	of estimates






	 


	The preparation of audited consolidated
	financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported
	amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements,
	and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. Management makes these estimates using the best
	information available at the time the estimates are made; however actual results could differ from those estimates. Significant
	items subject to such estimates and assumptions include valuation allowances for receivables and recoverability of carrying amount
	and the estimated useful lives of long-lived assets. These estimates are often based on complex judgments and assumptions that
	management believes to be reasonable but are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Actual results could differ from these
	estimates.


	 








	D.






	Functional
	currency and foreign currency translation






	 


	JHCC and JHCL’s functional currency
	is the United States dollar (“US$”). Runteng’s functional currency is the Hong Kong dollar (“HK$”).
	The functional currency of Jiarun is the Renminbi (“RMB”).


	 


	The Company’s reporting currency
	is US$. Assets and liabilities of Runteng and Jiarun are translated at the current exchange rate at the balance sheet dates, revenues
	and expenses are translated at the average exchange rates during the reporting periods, and equity accounts are translated at historical
	rates. Translation adjustments are reported in other comprehensive income.


	 








	E.






	Concentration
	of Credit Risk






	 


	Financial instruments that potentially
	subject the Company to concentrations of credit risk are cash, accounts receivable and other receivables arising from its normal
	business activities. The Company places its cash in what it believes to be credit-worthy financial institutions. The Company has
	a diversified customer base. The majority of sales are either cash receipt in advance or cash receipt upon delivery. For the years
	ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, no customer accounted for more than 10% of net revenue. As of December 31, 2016and 2015, 1 and
	1 customer accounted for more than 5% of net accounts receivable, respectively. For those credit sales, the Company routinely assesses
	the financial strength of its customers and, based upon factors surrounding the credit risk, establishes an allowance, if required,
	for uncollectible accounts and, as a consequence, believes that its accounts receivable credit risk exposure beyond such allowance
	is limited.


	 






	 


	F-

	9



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 








	F.






	Cash
	and cash equivalents






	 


	Cash and cash equivalents include all cash,
	deposits in banks and other liquid investments with initial maturities of three months or less.


	 








	G.






	Accounts
	receivable






	 


	Accounts receivable are recorded at net
	realizable value consisting of the carrying amount less an allowance for uncollectible accounts as needed. The allowance for doubtful
	accounts is the Company’s best estimate of the amount of probable credit losses in the Company’s existing accounts
	receivable. The Company determines the allowance based on aging data, historical collection experience, customer specific facts
	and economic conditions. Account balances are charged off against the allowance after all means of collection have been exhausted
	and the potential for recovery is considered remote. 


	 








	H.






	Inventories






	 


	Inventories, consisting principally of
	medicines, are stated at the lower of cost or market using the first-in, first-out method (“FIFO”). This policy requires
	the Company to make estimates regarding the market value of inventory, including an assessment of excess or obsolete inventory.
	The Company determines excess or obsolete inventory based on an estimate of the future demand and estimated selling prices for
	its products. 


	 








	I.






	Construction
	in progress






	 


	Construction in progress represents the
	new hospital painting and decoration costs. And all direct costs relating to the polishing and decoration are capitalized as construction
	in progress. No depreciation is provided in respect of construction in progress. 


	 








	J.






	Property
	and equipment






	 


	Property and equipment are stated at cost.
	Expenditures for maintenance and repairs are charged to operations when incurred, while additions and betterments are capitalized.
	Depreciation is recorded on a straight-line basis reflective of the useful lives of the assets. When assets are retired or disposed,
	the asset’s original cost and related accumulated depreciation are eliminated from accounts and any gain or loss is reflected
	in income.


	 





	Buildings and improvement




	10-40 years






	Medical equipment




	5-15 years






	Transportation instrument




	5-10 years








	Office equipment




	5-10 years






	Electronic equipment




	5-10 years






	Software




	5-10 years






	 








	K.






	Leases






	 



	Operating lease



	 


	Leases where substantially all the rewards
	and risks of ownership of assets remain with the lessor are accounted for as operating leases. Minimum lease payments, including
	scheduled rent increases, made under operating leases are charged to the consolidated statements of operations and other comprehensive
	income (loss) on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Contingent rentals are excluded from minimum lease payments, and are
	recognized as expense when the achievement of the specified target is considered probable.


	 






	 


	F-

	10



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 








	K.






	Leases(continued)






	 



	Capital lease



	 


	Leases which substantially transfer all
	of the benefits and risks inherent in ownership to the lessee are classified as capital leases. In a capital lease, assets and
	liabilities are recorded at the amount of the lesser of (a) the fair value of the leased asset at the inception of the lease or
	(b) the present value of the minimum lease payments (excluding executing costs) over the lease term. Recorded assets are depreciated
	over their estimated useful lives. During the lease term, each minimum lease payment is allocated between a reduction of the obligation
	and interest expense to produce a constant periodic rate of interest on the remaining balance of the obligation. Leasehold improvements
	are depreciated over the depreciable lives of the corresponding fixed asset or the related lease term, whichever is shorter.


	 








	L.






	Fair
	Value Measurement






	 


	The Company applies the provisions of ASC
	Subtopic 820-10, Fair Value Measurements, for fair value measurements of financial assets and financial liabilities and for fair
	value measurements of nonfinancial items that are recognized or disclosed at fair value in the financial statements. ASC 820 also
	establishes a framework for measuring fair value and expands disclosures about fair value measurements.


	 


	Fair value is defined as the price that
	would be received when selling an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at
	the measurement date. In determining the fair value for the assets and liabilities required or permitted to be recorded, the Company
	considers the principal or most advantageous market in which it would transact and it considers assumptions that market participants
	would use when pricing the asset or liability.


	 


	ASC 820 establishes a fair value hierarchy
	that requires an entity to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs when measuring fair
	value. ASC 820 establishes three levels of inputs that may be used to measure fair value. The hierarchy gives the highest priority
	to unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities (Level 1 measurements) and the lowest priority
	to measurements involving significant unobservable inputs (Level 3 measurements). The three levels of the fair value hierarchy
	are as follows:


	 


	Level 1: Unadjusted quoted prices
	in active markets that are accessible at the measurement date for identical, unrestricted assets or liabilities;


	Level 2: Quoted prices in markets
	that are not active, or inputs that is observable, either directly or indirectly, for substantially the full term of the asset
	or liability;


	Level 3: Prices or valuation
	techniques that require inputs that are both significant to the fair value measurement and unobservable (supported by little or
	no market activity).


	 


	There were no transfers between level 1,
	level 2 or level 3 measurements for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015.


	 


	Cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable,
	accounts payable and accrued liabilities are reflected in the accompanying consolidated financial statements at amounts that approximate
	fair value because of the short-term nature of these instruments. The fair value of the Company’s capital lease obligations
	also approximates carrying value as they bear interest at current market rates.


	 








	M.






	Segment
	and geographic information






	 


	The Company is operating in one segment
	in accordance with the accounting guidance FASB ASC topic 280, “Segment Reporting”. The company’s revenues are
	from customers in People’s Republic of China (“PRC”). All assets of the company are located in PRC.


	 






	 


	F-

	11



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 









	N.






	Revenue
	recognition






	 


	The Company recognizes revenue when the
	amount of revenue can be reliably measured, it is probable that economic benefits will flow to the entity and specific criteria
	have been met for each of the Company’s activities as described below.


	 


	 


	Medicine sales




	 


	Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine.


	 


	Given the nature of this revenue source
	of the Company’s business and the applicable rules guiding revenue recognition, the revenue recognition practices for the
	sale of medicine do not contain estimates that materially affect results of operations nor any policy for return of products.



	 





	Patient Services




	 


	In accordance with the medical licenses
	of Jiarun, the approved medical patient service scope of the Company include medical consulting, surgery, obstetrics and gynecology,
	pediatrics, anesthesia, clinic laboratory, medical imaging, and traditional Chinese medicine, etc.


	 


	Patient service revenue is recognized when
	it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has
	been provided to the patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	 


	The Company provides services to both patients
	covered by social insurance and patients who are not covered by social insurance. The Company charges the same rates for patient
	services regardless of the coverage by social insurance.


	 


	Patients who are not covered by social
	insurance are liable for the total cost of medical treatment.


	 







	·




	For
	out-patient medical services, revenue is recognized when the Company provides medical service to the patient. The Company collects
	payment when the patient checks out from the hospital, which is the same day the services are provided.





	 







	·




	For
	in-patient medical services, the Company estimates the approximate fee the patients will spend in the hospital based on patients’
	symptom. This is when the patients check in to the hospital. At that time, the Company collects the estimated fees from the patient
	and records the payment as deposits received.





	 


	During the in-patient services period,
	the Company recognizes revenue when the patient service is provided and deducts the cost of service from the deposit received.
	The Company records these transactions based on daily reports generated by the respective medical department. When medical services
	exceed patient deposits received the Company records revenue and accounts receivable when the patient services are provided.


	 


	When patients check out from the hospital,
	the Company calculates and determines the remaining deposit, if any, and refunds the unused portion of the deposit to the patients.
	In the case where the patients have a balance in accounts receivable during the in-patient period, accounts receivable are required
	to be paid in full at checkout.


	 


	Patients covered by social insurance will
	receive a portion or full medical services reimbursed or paid by the social insurance agencies via prepaid cards or insurance claim
	settlement process.


	 






	 


	F-

	12



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)









	N.






	Revenue
	recognition (continued)







	 





	Settlement process




	 


	The Company is a registered medical service
	vendor under the state social insurance system for various social insurance agencies; the insurance agencies include “Social
	Medical Insurance funded by PRC and Heilongjiang Province” and “Heilongjiang Province New Rural Cooperative Medical
	Care System”. The Company utilizes an online system maintained by the social insurance agencies for patients’ who are
	covered by social insurance agencies.


	 







	·




	The
	Company records patients’ information in the social insurance system at check in. The system determines the covered portion
	and amounts based on the information input to the system.





	 







	·




	At
	the time of check out, the Company collects payment for services the patients are liable for and records accounts receivable from
	the social insurance agencies for the portion of services covered by the social insurances. In the case that the patients have
	made payment during the in-patient services period, the Company refunds any amount in excess of the portion they are liable for.





	 







	·




	The
	Company is responsible for submitting supporting documents of patient services provided to the social insurance agencies for their
	review. The Company also requires reconciling its records with the social insurance agencies once a month. Once the social insurance
	agencies approve the reconciliation, the insurance agencies will settle the accounts receivable balance in the next month following
	the approval.





	 








	O.






	Income
	taxes







	 



	The Company adopts FASB ASC Topic 740,
	“Income Taxes,” which requires the recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences
	of events that have been included in the financial statements or tax returns. Under this method, deferred income taxes are recognized
	for the tax consequences in future years of differences between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and their financial reporting
	amounts at each period end based on enacted tax laws and statutory tax rates applicable to the periods in which the differences
	are expected to affect taxable income. Valuation allowances are established, when necessary, to reduce deferred tax assets to the
	amount expected to be realized.



	 



	In July 2006, the FASB issued FIN 48(ASC
	740-10), Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes-An Interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109 (ASC 740), which requires income
	tax positions to meet a more-likely-than-not recognition threshold to be recognized in the financial statements. Under FIN 48(ASC
	740-10), tax positions that previously failed to meet the more-likely-than-not threshold should be recognized in the first subsequent
	financial reporting period in which that threshold is met. Previously recognized tax positions that no longer meet the more-likely-than-not
	threshold should be derecognized in the first subsequent financial reporting period in which that threshold is no longer met.


	 


	The application of tax laws and regulations
	is subject to legal and factual interpretation, judgment and uncertainty. Tax laws and regulations themselves are subject to change
	as a result of changes in fiscal policy, changes in legislation, the evolution of regulations and court rulings. Therefore, the
	actual liability may be materially different from our estimates, which could result in the need to record additional tax liabilities
	or potentially reverse previously recorded tax liabilities or deferred tax asset valuation allowance.


	 


	As a result of the implementation of FIN
	48 (ASC 740-10), the company made a comprehensive review of its portfolio of tax positions in accordance with recognition standards
	established by FIN 48 (ASC 740-10). The Company recognized no material adjustments to liabilities or shareholder’s equity
	as a result of the implementation. The adoption of FIN 48 did not have a material impact on the Company’s unaudited consolidated
	financial statements.


	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC, income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 






	 


	F-

	13



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 


	 

	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 








	O.






	Income
	taxes (continued)






	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt
	from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions, mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income tax of $4,059
	and $2,604 for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively to support the local tax bureau's economical obligations.


	 








	P.






	Earnings
	per share






	 


	Basic earnings per common share is computed
	by using net income divided by the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding for the periods presented. Diluted
	earnings per share is computed by dividing net income by the weighted average number of shares of common stock, common stock equivalents
	and potentially dilutive securities outstanding for the periods presented.


	 








	Q.






	Reclassification






	 


	The comparative figures have been reclassified
	to conform to current year presentation.



	 









	R.






	Recently
	accounting pronouncements






	 


	In February 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-02,
	Leases (Topic 842), aimed at making leasing activities more transparent and comparable. The new standard requires substantially
	all leases be recognized by lessees on their balance sheet as a right-of-use asset and corresponding lease liability, including
	today’s operating leases. For public business entities, the standard is effective for fiscal years beginning after December
	15, 2018, including interim periods within those fiscal years. For all other entities, the standard is effective for fiscal years
	beginning after December 15, 2019, and interim periods within fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2020. Early application
	is permitted for all entities. The Company is currently evaluating the impact of the adoption of this guidance on its consolidated
	financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.


	 


	In March 2016, the FASB issued ASU No.
	2016-08, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Principal versus Agent Considerations (Reporting Revenue Gross versus
	Net). The amendment in this update affect entities with transactions included within the scope of Topic 606, The scope of that
	Topic includes entities that enter into contracts with customers to transfer goods or services (that are an output of the entity’s
	ordinary activities) in exchange for consideration. The amendments are intended to improve the operability and understandability
	of the implementation guidance on principal versus agent considerations. In April 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-10, The amendments
	in ASU 2016-10 provide more detailed guidance, including additional implementation guidance and examples in the following key areas:
	1) identifying performance obligations and 2) licenses of intellectual property. In May 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-12 a
	proposed Update, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Narrow-Scope Improvements and Practical Expedients, on September
	30, 2015. The amendments do not change the core principles of the standard, but clarify the guidance on assessing collectability,
	presenting sales taxes, measuring noncash consideration and certain transition matters. This update becomes effective concurrently
	with ASU No. 2014-09. The Company is currently evaluating the effect of this new standard, including the transition method, to
	determine the impact on the Company's consolidated financial position, results of operations, cash flows, or related disclosures.


	 


	In October 2016, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update No. 2016-16, Income Taxes – Intra-Entity Transfers of Assets Other Than Inventory (ASU 2016-16). The standard
	is intended to address diversity in practice and complexity in financial reporting, particularly for intra-entity transfers of
	intellectual property. ASU 2016-16 will be effective for the Company beginning with the interim periods of fiscal 2018 and requires
	the modified retrospective method of adoption. Early adoption is permitted. The Company is in the process of determining timing
	of adoption and assessing the impact of ASU 2016-16 on its consolidated financial statements.


	 


	In November 2016, the FASB issued ASU No.
	2016-18, Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230): Restricted Cash (“ASU No. 2016-18”). ASU No. 2016-18 requires that a
	statement of cash flows explain the change during the period in the total of cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted
	cash equivalents. Therefore, amounts generally described as restricted cash should be included with cash and cash equivalents when
	reconciling the beginning of period and end of period total amounts shown on the statement of cash flows. ASU No. 2016-18 is effective
	for annual periods beginning after December 15, 2017, including interim periods within those fiscal years. The Company elected
	to early adopt ASU No. 2016-18 for the reporting period ending December 31, 2016 and was applied retrospectively. As a result of
	adoption of ASU No. 2016-18, the Company no longer presents the changes within restricted cash in the consolidated statements of
	cash flows.


	 


	In January 2017, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Board Update No. 2017-01: Business Combinations (Topic 805) - Clarifying the Definition of a Business (“ASU
	2017-01”). The ASU clarifies the definition of business with the objective of adding guidance to assist entities with evaluating
	whether transactions should be accounted for as acquisitions (or disposals) of assets or businesses. ASU 2017-01 will be effective
	for the Company’s fiscal year beginning January 1, 2018 and subsequent interim periods with prospective application with
	impacts on the Company’s consolidated financial statements that may vary depending on each specific acquisition. Early adoption
	is conditionally permitted.


	 


	We do not believe other recently issued
	but not yet effective accounting standards, if currently adopted, would have a material effect on the consolidated financial position,
	statements of operations and cash flows.


	 






	 


	F-

	14



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 






	NOTE 3. Accounts Receivable, Net



	 




	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Accounts receivable


	 


	$


	3,359,619


	 


	 


	$


	2,035,271


	 




	Less: allowance for doubtful debts


	 


	 


	24,119


	 


	 


	 


	25,802


	 




	 


	 


	$


	3,335,500


	 


	 


	$


	2,009,469


	 





	 


	The Company experienced nil bad debts during
	the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015.


	 





	NOTE 4. Inventories




	 



	At December 31, 2016 and 2015, inventories
	consist of the following:



	 





	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Western medicine


	 


	$


	548,724


	 


	 


	$


	377,989


	 




	Chinese herbal medicine


	 


	 


	9,113


	 


	 


	 


	6,590


	 




	Medical material


	 


	 


	241,630


	 


	 


	 


	111,808


	 




	Other material


	 


	 


	1,773


	 


	 


	 


	2,693


	 




	 


	 


	$


	801,240


	 


	 


	$


	499,080


	 






	 






	NOTE 5. Prepayment




	 



	At December 31, 2016 and 2015, prepayment
	consists of the following:


	 




	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Deposits on medical equipment


	 


	$


	221,083


	 


	 


	$


	38,952


	 




	Heating fees


	 


	 


	86,515


	 


	 


	 


	92,535


	 




	Others


	 


	 


	211,124


	 


	 


	 


	70,055


	 




	 


	 


	$


	518,722


	 


	 


	$


	201,542


	 






	 






	NOTE 6. Property and Equipment



	 


	At December 31, 2016 and 2015, property and
	equipment, at cost, consist of:


	 




	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Transportation equipment


	 


	$


	715,646


	 


	 


	$


	765,592


	 




	Medical equipment


	 


	 


	9,282,026


	 


	 


	 


	7,047,404


	 




	Electrical equipment


	 


	 


	1,310,927


	 


	 


	 


	799,045


	 




	Office equipment and other


	 


	 


	93,283


	 


	 


	 


	87,110


	 




	Buildings


	 


	 


	13,982,919


	 


	 


	 


	14,958,817


	 




	Software


	 


	 


	137,028


	 


	 


	 


	87,957


	 




	Total fixed assets at cost


	 


	 


	25,521,829


	 


	 


	 


	23,745,925


	 




	Accumulated depreciation


	 


	 


	(2,247,649


	)


	 


	 


	(1,298,014


	)




	Total fixed assets, net


	 


	$


	23,274,180


	 


	 


	$


	22,447,911


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 






	 



	Depreciation expense was $1,081,123 and
	$871,948 for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively.



	 







	 


	F-

	15



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 




	NOTE 7. Long Term Deferred Expenses




	 



	On May 7, 2015, July 3, 2015 and October
	16, 2015, Jiarun entered into three lease agreements to lease medical equipment from Hair Finance Leasing (China) Co., Ltd.(“Hair”),
	a third party, for a five-year period, in which Jiarun is required to pay consulting fee to Hair for the services provided over
	the five years. The consulting fee paid but attributable to the current and subsequent accounting periods was accounted for as
	deferred expenses and long term deferred expenses. The current portion of the prepaid consulting fee was recorded as deferred expenses
	$64,967 and $63,034 as of December 31, 2016 and 2015. The long-term deferred expenses were $164,676 and 252,138 as of December
	31, 2016 and 2015.


	 


	The Company recorded consulting fee of
	$67,907 and $125,210 for the year ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively.



	 




	NOTE 8. Capital Lease Obligations and
	Deposit for Capital Leases




	 



	On June 5, 2013, Jiarun entered into a
	lease agreement to lease hospital building from Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd (“the Leasor”), which
	is owned by Junsheng Zhang, a related party. The Leasing terms consist of principal plus 30 payments. Each payment will be made
	on an annual basis when RMB7,000,000 per payment will be paid upfront for each leasing period. The first payment was made on September
	1, 2014. At the end of the leasing period, a final payment will be made to settle the total leasing amount. Both parties agreed
	for Jiarun to pay RMB3,000,000 as deposit at the execution of the Leasing agreement, which will be deducted from the final rental
	settlement. In accordance to accounting principles and treatment, this payment was booked as deposit in our accounts. The Leasor
	shall return the premium for lease to Jiarun at expiration of this Contract, or pledge this deposit as part of rents for the last
	period or periods in 2043. The lending interest rate was calculated at 6.55%, which is the benchmark interest rate announced from
	The People’s Bank of China. After the completion of all payments, the ownership of the lease item will be transferred to
	Jiarun.


	 


	The leasing agreement for our hospital
	building contains the following provisions:


	 







	·




	Rental
	payments of RMB7,000,000 (equivalent to $1,144,913) per year, payable at the beginning of September.





	 







	·




	An option allowing the lessor to extend
	the lease for thirty years beyond the last renewal option exercised by the company.





	 







	·




	A guarantee by the company that the lessor
	will realize $nil, from selling the asset at the expiration of the lease This lease is a capital lease because its term (30 years)
	exceeds 75% of the building’s estimated economic life. In addition, the present value ($15,185,032) of the minimum lease
	payments exceeds 90% of the fair value of the building ($15,721,295).





	 







	·




	Accumulated annual amounts resulting from
	applying an interesting rate 6.55% to the balance of the lease obligation at the beginning of each year. The lease obligation is
	increased by the amount of the prior year’s interest, the amount of the net rental payment at the beginning of each year;
	and this amount represents the guaranteed residual value at the end of the lease term.





	 


	On September 1, 2014, October 22, 2014,
	March 26, 2015, May 7, 2015, July 3, 2015, October 16, 2015, April 6, 2016 and April 13, 2016 and November 25, 2016 Jiarun entered
	into several lease agreements to lease medical equipment and elevator from three lease finance companies, which are all third parties,
	for three to five year periods, in which Jiarun is required to make monthly or quarterly payments toward the leases. The Company
	was also required to pay deposits up front, which deposits will later be used to offset against the last quarterly payment. The
	medical equipment and elevator will be transferred to Jiarun upon the completion of the agreement. 


	 


	These leases have been
	classified as capital leases. The cost of the medical equipment included in these leases is included in the consolidated balance
	sheets as property and equipment and construction in progress.


	 






	 


	F-

	16



	 









	 


	 


	 







	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 





	NOTE 8. Capital Lease Obligations and
	Deposit for Capital Leases (Continued)



	 


	The future minimum lease payments for annual
	capital lease obligation as of December 31, 2016 are as follows:


	 




	Year


	 


	Amounts


	 




	2017


	 


	$


	2,313,038


	 




	2018


	 


	 


	1,666,127


	 




	2019


	 


	 


	1,473,960


	 




	Thereafter


	 


	 


	13,082,905


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	18,536,030


	 





	 


	The Company recorded finance lease fees
	of $1,344,867 and $1,217,539 for the years ended December, 2016 and 2015, respectively.



	 




	NOTE 9. Short-term Bank Loans



	 


	As of December 31, 2016 and 2015, the short-term
	bank loans were $ nil and $ nil, respectively. The loans were primarily obtained from Harbin Bank with interest rate of 6.09% per
	annum, from December 25, 2015 to December 24, 2016, for working capital and capital expenditure purposes. The interest expenses
	were $26,212 and $33,967 for the year ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively. 


	 



	NOTE 10. Non-controlling Interests




	 



	Jiarun is the Company’s majority-owned
	subsidiary which is consolidated in the Company’s financial statements with a non-controlling interest recognized. The Company
	holds 70% interest of Jiarun as of December 31, 2016 and 2015.


	 


	As of December 31, 2016 and 2015, NCI in
	the consolidated balance sheet was $5,052,519 and $3,732,692, respectively. For the year ended December 31, 2016, the comprehensive
	income attributable to shareholders’ equity and NCI is $2,946,482 and $1,328,827 respectively. For the year ended December
	31, 2015, the comprehensive income attributable to shareholders’ equity and NCIs is $1,515,999 and $727,258, respectively.


	 





	NOTE 11. Revenue



	 


	The Company’s revenue consists of
	medicine sales and patient care revenue.


	 




	 


	 


	For the Year Ended December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Medicine:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Western medicine


	 


	$


	6,207,470


	 


	 


	$


	4,283,342


	 




	Chinese medicine


	 


	 


	1,493,283


	 


	 


	 


	1,057,953


	 




	Herbal medicine


	 


	 


	297,442


	 


	 


	 


	162,676


	 




	Total medicine


	 


	$


	7,998,195


	 


	 


	$


	5,503,971


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Patient services:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Medical consulting


	 


	$


	5,298,753


	 


	 


	$


	3,223,319


	 




	Medical treatment


	 


	 


	4,588,582


	 


	 


	 


	2,982,636


	 




	Others


	 


	 


	233,215


	 


	 


	 


	162,477


	 




	Total patient services


	 


	$


	10,120,550


	 


	 


	$


	6,368,432


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	$


	18,118,745


	 


	 


	$


	11,872,403


	 





	 






	 


	F-

	17



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 



	NOTE 12. Income Tax Expense



	 


	The Company uses the asset-liability method
	of accounting for income taxes prescribed by ASC 740 Income Taxes. The Company and its subsidiaries each files their taxes individually.


	 



	United States



	 


	JHCC is subject to the United States of
	America Tax law at tax rate of 34%. No provision for the US federal income taxes has been made as the Company had no US taxable
	income for the periods presented, and its earnings are permanently invested in PRC.


	 



	BVI



	 


	JHCL was incorporated in the BVI and, under
	the current laws of the BVI, it is not subject to income tax.


	 



	Hong Kong



	 


	Runteng was incorporated in Hong Kong
	and is subject to Hong Kong profits tax. Runteng is subject to Hong Kong taxation on its activities conducted in Hong Kong and
	income arising in or derived from Hong Kong. The applicable statutory tax rate is 16.5%.


	 



	PRC



	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt
	from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions, mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun has voluntarily paid income tax of $4,059 and $2,604
	for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively to support the local tax bureau's economical obligations.


	 






	 


	F-

	18



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 



	NOTE 13. Related Party Transactions



	 


	The following is the list of the related
	parties to which the Group has transactions with:


	 


	(a) Junsheng Zhang, the Chairman of the
	Company


	(b) Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development
	Co., Ltd, owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(c) Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine Wholesale
	Co., Ltd owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(d) Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy Co., Limited
	owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(e) Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical
	Equipment Company Limited owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(f) Jiarun Super Market Co., Ltd. owned
	by Junsheng Zhang


	(g) Harbin Qi-run pharmacy limited owned
	by Junsheng Zhang


	(h) Yanhua Xing and Weiguang Song, the
	former shareholder of JHCL



	 





	Amount due from related parties





	 



	Amount due from related parties consisted
	of the following as of the periods indicated: 


	 






	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	Name of related parties


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd,


	 


	$


	1,754,987


	 


	 


	$


	1,030,236


	 




	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	46,500


	 


	 


	 


	46,500


	 




	Yanhua Xing


	 


	 


	2,450


	 


	 


	 


	2,450


	 




	Weiguang Song


	 


	 


	1,050


	 


	 


	 


	1,050


	 




	 


	 


	$


	1,804,987


	 


	 


	$


	1,080,236


	 





	 


	Amount due from Baiyi was mainly represented
	the deposit for the new outpatient building which was constructed by Baiyi. The Company signed a purchase agreement with Baiyi
	to acquire the first to eight floor of a building which is under construction by Baiyi and expected to be completed in first-quarter
	of 2016. The total amount for the purchased property is approximately RMB63,900,000 ($9,579,894). The Company had paid a deposit
	of RMB10,000,000 ($1,439,932) was paid in 2016.



	 



	Amount due from Junsheng Zhang, Yanhua
	Xing and Weiguang Song, who are the prior shareholders of JHCL, was mainly for the paid-in capital to be paid.


	 




	Amount due to related parties




	 


	Amount due to related parties consisted
	of the following as of the periods indicated: 


	 






	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	Name of related parties


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine Wholesale Co., Ltd


	 


	$


	-


	 


	 


	$


	59,424


	 




	Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical Equipment Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	18,382


	 


	 


	 


	32,742


	 




	Harbin Qi-run pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	6,947


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	5,162


	 




	 


	 


	$


	25,329


	 


	 


	$


	97,328


	 





	 


	Amount due to Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine
	Wholesale Co., Ltd., Harbin Qi-run Pharmacy Co., Ltd. and Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical Equipment Company Limited were mainly
	for the balance for purchase of medicine and medical material from these three companies.


	 


	Amounts due to Junsheng Zhang represented
	the balance paid by Mr. Zhang for the daily operation of the company.


	 






	 


	F-

	19



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 



	NOTE 13. Related Party Transactions
	(Continued)



	 




	Related parties’ transactions




	 


	Purchase of medicine and medical material
	from related parties consisted of the following for the periods indicated:  


	 






	 


	 


	For the Year ended December 31,


	 




	Name of related parties


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine Wholesale Co., Ltd


	 


	$


	520,182


	 


	 


	$


	658,768


	 




	Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	170,638


	 


	 


	 


	281,588


	 




	Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical Equipment Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	55,821


	 


	 


	 


	173,662


	 




	Harbin Qi-run pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	26,273


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	$


	772,914


	 


	 


	$


	1,114,018


	 





	 


	 


	Deposits for capital leases
	and Capital lease obligations




	 


	On June 5, 2013, Jiarun entered into a
	Lease Agreement to lease new hospital building from Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd, which is owned by Junsheng Zhang,
	a related party. As of December 31, 2016, the company has balance of deposits for capital leases and capital lease obligations
	of $431,980 and $13,896,989 respectively. As of December 31, 2015, the company has balance of deposits for capital leases and capital
	lease obligations of $462,129 and $13,975,067 respectively.


	 






	 


	F-

	20



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 




	NOTE 14.  Basic and Diluted Earnings Per Share




	 


	Basic net income per share is computed
	using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the period. Diluted net income per share is computed using
	the weighted average number of common shares and, if dilutive, potential common shares outstanding during the period. Potential
	common shares comprise shares issuable upon the exercise of share based awards, using the treasury stock method. The reconciliation
	of the numerators and denominators of the basic and diluted earnings per share computations for income from continuing operations
	is shown as follows: 


	 






	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Numerator:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income available to common stockholders


	 


	$


	3,471,868


	 


	 


	$


	1,790,713


	 




	Denominator:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and diluted weighted-average number of shares outstanding


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 


	 


	 


	13,850,244


	 




	Net income per share:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and diluted


	 


	$


	0.2495


	 


	 


	$


	0.1293


	 





	 



	NOTE 15. Contingencies and Commitment



	 


	Certain conditions may exist as of the
	date the consolidated financial statements are issued, which may result in a loss to the Company but which will only be resolved
	when one or more future events occur or fail to occur. The Company’s management and legal counsel assess such contingent
	liabilities, and such assessment inherently involves an exercise of judgment. In assessing loss contingencies related to legal
	proceedings that are pending against the Company or unasserted claims that may result in such proceedings, the Company’s
	legal counsel evaluates the perceived merits of any legal proceedings or unasserted claims as well as the perceived merits of the
	amount of relief sought or expected to be sought. There was no contingency of this type as of December 31, 2016 and 2015.


	 


	If the assessment of a contingency indicates
	that it is probable that a material loss has been incurred and the amount of the liability can be estimated, then the estimated
	liability would be accrued in the Company’s financial statements. If the assessment indicates that a potential material loss
	contingency is not probable but is reasonably possible, or is probable but cannot be estimated, then the nature of the contingent
	liability, together with an estimate of the range of possible loss if determinable and material would be disclosed. There was no
	contingency of this type as of December 31, 2016 and2015.


	 


	Loss contingencies considered to be remote
	by management are generally not disclosed unless they involve guarantees, in which case the guarantee would be disclosed.


	 



	NOTE 16.



	 


	The Management of the Company determined
	that there were no reportable subsequent events to be disclosed.


	 






	 


	F-

	21



	 











	 


	 


	 







	 












	Item 9.




	Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting
	and Financial Disclosure.





	 


	None.



	 











	Item 9A.




	Controls and Procedures.





	 




	Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and
	Procedures




	 


	Our management maintains disclosure controls
	and procedures, as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange
	Act”), that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that the material information required to be disclosed by us in
	our periodic reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time
	periods specified in the SEC’s rules and forms.  Disclosure controls and procedures include, without limitation,
	controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we file or submit
	under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
	Officer, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.


	 


	As of December 31, 2016, our management,
	under the supervision of and with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, evaluated the effectiveness
	of our disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rules 13a-15(b) and 15d-15(b) under the Exchange Act.  Based
	upon this evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures
	were not effective as of December 31, 2016 as a result of the material weaknesses identified in our internal control over financial
	reporting.  These material weaknesses are discussed in “Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial
	Reporting” below.  Our management considers our internal control over financial reporting to be an integral part
	of our disclosure controls and procedures.


	 




	Management’s Report on Internal
	Control over Financial Reporting




	 


	The Company’s management is responsible
	for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over our financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)
	under the Securities Exchange Act. The Company’s management is also required to assess and report on the effectiveness of
	the Company’s internal control over financial reporting in accordance with Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002
	(“Section 404”). Internal control over financial reporting is a process to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
	reliability of the Company’s financial reporting for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting
	principles. Internal control over financial reporting includes policies and procedures that: (i) pertain to maintaining records
	that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the Company’s transactions; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that
	transactions are recorded as necessary for preparation of the Company’s financial statements and that receipts and expenditures
	of company assets are made in accordance with management authorization; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance that unauthorized
	acquisition, use or disposition of company assets that could have a material effect on our financial statements would be prevented
	or detected on a timely basis.


	 


	Because of its inherent limitations, internal
	control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future
	periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance
	with the policies and procedures may deteriorate.


	 


	As of December 31, 2016, our management,
	under the supervision of and with the participation of the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer, evaluated the
	effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as required by Rules 13a-15(c) and 15d-15(c) under the Exchange
	Act.  In making this assessment, Management used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations
	of the Treadway Commission (COSO) in 

	Internal Control – Integrated Framework

	, including the following five framework
	components: i) control environment, ii) risk assessment, iii) control activities, iv) information and communications, and v) monitoring.


	 


	This annual report does not include an attestation
	report of the Company’s registered public accounting firm regarding internal control over financial reporting. Management's
	report was not subject to attestation by the Company's registered public accounting firm as we are a smaller reporting company
	and not required to provide the report. 


	Our management will continue to
	monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of its disclosure controls and procedures, as well as its internal control over financial
	reporting, on an ongoing basis, and is committed to taking further action and implementing additional improvements, as necessary
	and as funds allow.  However, our management cannot guarantee that the measures taken or any future measures will remediate
	the material weaknesses identified or that any additional material weaknesses or significant deficiencies will not arise in the
	future due to a failure to implement and maintain adequate internal control over financial reporting. Notwithstanding the material
	weaknesses described above, our management believes that there are no material inaccuracies or omissions of material fact and,
	to the best of its knowledge, believes that the consolidated financial statements included in this annual report present fairly,
	in all material respects, our financial position, results of operations, and cash flows for the periods presented in conformity
	with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States.


	 




	Changes in Internal Control over Financial
	Reporting




	 


	No changes in the Company's internal control
	over financial reporting has come to management's attention during the Company's last quarter that have materially affected, or
	are likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.




	 












	Item 9B.




	Other Information.





	 


	None.


	 






	 



	32



	 











	 


	 


	 






	 







	PART III



	 











	Item 10.




	Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.





	 


	The following are our
	officers and directors as of the date of this prospectus.


	 


	The following table sets
	forth certain information concerning our directors and executive officers:


	 







	Name



	 


	 



	Position





	 


	 


	 


	 





	Junsheng Zhang



	 


	 



	President, Chairman of the Board and Director






	Lihua Sun



	 


	 



	Chief Executive Officer and Director






	Xuewei Zhang



	 


	 



	Chief Financial Officer and Director






	Yanhui Xing



	 


	 



	Director






	 



	Mr. Junsheng Zhang

	, is our President
	and Director. Mr. Zhang is one of the founders of JR Hospital. Founder of JR Hospital and JR Medical.


	 






	•


	Former General Manager of Dongtai Medical Ltd








	•


	Bachelor Degree in Traditional Chinese Medicine








	•


	EMBA degree from Peking University








	•


	More than 30 years working experience in China medical
	services industry.








	•


	Owning one full services hospital, one medical whole sell
	company and a few medicine retail shops.




	 


	Mr. Zhang does not, and has not served
	as an officer or director of any company required to file reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.


	 



	Ms. Lihua Sun

	, is our Chief Executive
	Officer and Director. Ms. Sun is one of the cofounder of Jiarun Hospital and has many years in the healthcare industry. She has
	been the former General Manager of Ankang Medicine in Hulan district and a Director of Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine Co., Ltd.


	 


	Ms. Sun does not, and has not served as
	an officer or director of any company required to file reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.


	 



	Miss. Xuewei Zhang

	, is our Chief Financial
	Officer and Director.


	 






	•


	Bachelor degree from university of Exeter








	•


	Worked as finance manager of JR hospital since 2009








	•


	Promote to CFO position since January 2012




	 



	Miss. Yanhui Xing

	, is our Director.


	 






	•


	Seven years overseas working and study experiences.








	•


	Master of Banking and Bachelor degree in accounting,








	•


	Three years international accounting firm senior position








	•


	Multiple years in the investment banking industry




	 


	None of our directors are independent as that
	term is defined by the rules of the OTCBB Stock Exchange.


	 


	We have family relationships among our
	executive officers and directors. Xuewei Zhang, the daughter of the Chairman, is an employee of the Company. Lihua Sun, the wife
	of the Chairman, is the Chief Executive Officer of the Company.


	 






	 



	33



	 









	 


	 


	 






	 




	Legal Proceedings Involving Officers
	and Directors




	 


	To our knowledge, during the last ten years,
	none of our directors and executive officers (including those of our subsidiaries) has:


	 







	·




	Had
	a bankruptcy petition filed by or against any business of which such person was a general partner or executive officer either
	at the time of the bankruptcy or within two years prior to that time.





	 




	 



	·




	Been convicted in a criminal proceeding or been subject to a pending criminal proceeding, excluding traffic violations and other minor offenses.





	 




	 



	·




	Been subject to any order, judgment or decree, not subsequently reversed, suspended or vacated, of any court of competent jurisdiction, permanently or temporarily enjoining, barring, suspending or otherwise limiting his involvement in any type of business, securities or banking activities.





	 




	 



	·




	Been found by a court of competent jurisdiction (in a civil action), the SEC, or the Commodities Futures Trading Commission to have violated a federal or state securities or commodities law, and the judgment has not been reversed, suspended or vacated.





	 




	 



	·




	Been the subject to, or a party to, any sanction or order, not subsequently reverse, suspended or vacated, of any self-regulatory organization, any registered entity, or any equivalent exchange, association, entity or organization that has disciplinary authority over its members or persons associated with a member.





	  


	During the fiscal year of 2016, our Board
	of Directors had one meeting, including meetings that were held by means of a conference telephone call, but excluding
	actions taken by unanimous written consent. 


	 




	Board Committees




	 




	Audit Committee




	 


	We have not yet appointed an audit committee. 
	At the present time, we believe that the members of Board of Directors are collectively capable of analyzing and evaluating our
	financial statements and understanding internal controls and procedures for financial reporting.  We do, however, recognize
	the importance of good corporate governance and intend to appoint an audit committee comprised entirely of independent directors,
	including at least one financial expert, in the near future.


	 




	Compensation Committee




	 


	We do not presently have a compensation
	committee. Our Board of Directors currently acts as our compensation committee.


	 




	Nominating Committee




	 


	We do not presently have a nominating
	committee. Our Board of Directors currently acts as our nominating committee.    


	 




	Code of Ethics




	 


	We do not presently have a code of ethics.
	However, we intend to adopt such a code of ethics in the future.


	 




	Board Leadership Structure and Role
	in Risk Oversight




	 


	Junsheng Zhang is our President and Chairman.
	We do not have any independent directors. The Board believes that the Company’s Chairman is best situated to serve as Chairman
	of the Board because he is the director most familiar with our business and industry and the director most capable of identifying
	strategic priorities and executing our business strategy. In addition, having a single leader eliminates the potential for confusion
	and provides clear leadership for the Company. We believe that this leadership structure has served the Company well.


	 


	Our Board of Directors is primarily responsible
	for overseeing our risk management processes.  The Board of Directors receives and reviews periodic reports from management,
	auditors, legal counsel, and others, as considered appropriate regarding the Company’s assessment of risks. The Board of
	Directors focuses on the most significant risks facing us and our general risk management strategy, and also ensures that risks
	undertaken by us are consistent with the Board of Directors’ appetite for risk. While the Board of Directors oversees the
	Company, our management is responsible for day-to-day risk management processes. We believe this division of responsibilities is
	the most effective approach for addressing the risks facing the Company and that our board leadership structure supports this approach.


	 






	 



	34



	 










	 


	 


	 






	 











	Item 11.




	Executive Compensation.





	 





	Executive Compensation



	 


	The following table sets forth information
	with respect to compensation paid by us to our officers from the fiscal years ended 2015 and 2016, respectively.


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Non-Equity


	 


	 


	Non-qualified


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Incentive


	 


	 


	Deferred


	 


	 


	All


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Name and


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Stock


	 


	 


	Option


	 


	 


	Plan


	 


	 


	Comp.


	 


	 


	Other


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Principal


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Salary


	 


	 


	Bonus


	 


	 


	Awards


	 


	 


	Awards


	 


	 


	Comp.


	 


	 


	Earnings


	 


	 


	Comp.


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	Position


	 


	Year


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 


	 


	($)


	 




	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	 


	6,743


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	6,743


	 




	Chairman,


	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	 


	6,321


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	6,321


	 




	Lihua Sun


	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	 


	6,358


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	6,358


	 




	CEO/Director


	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	 


	6,291


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	6,291


	 






	 




	Amounts of compensation for 2016
	and 2015, reported in the table above, represent accrued compensation. The manner and timing of payments of the accrued compensation
	will depend on the future financial conditions of the Company.



	 



	Outstanding Equity Awards



	No individual grants of stock options or
	other equity incentive awards have been made to any executive officer or any director since our inception.


	 



	Employment Contracts, Termination of Employment,
	Change-in-Control Arrangements



	We have not entered into any employment
	or other contracts or arrangements with our executive officers. There are no compensation plans or arrangements, including payments
	to be made by us, with respect to our officers, directors or consultants that would result from the resignation, retirement or
	any other termination of such directors, officers or consultants from us. There are no arrangements for directors, officers, employees
	or consultants that would result from a change-in-control.


	 



	Compensation of Directors



	We have no formal plan for compensating
	our directors for their services in their capacity as directors. Directors are entitled to reimbursement for reasonable travel
	and other out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with attendance at meetings of our Board of Directors. The Board of Directors
	may award special remuneration to any director undertaking any special services on behalf of JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION other
	than services ordinarily required of a director.


	 






	 



	35



	 










	 


	 


	 






	 











	Item 12.




	Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and
	Management and Related Stockholder Matters.





	 


	The following table sets forth certain
	information regarding our shares of common stock beneficially owned as of the date hereof for (i) each stockholder known to be
	the beneficial owner of 5% or more of our outstanding shares of common stock, (ii) each named executive officer and director, and
	(iii) all executive officers and directors as a group. A person is considered to beneficially own any shares: (i) over which such
	person, directly or indirectly, exercises sole or shared voting or investment power, or (ii) of which such person has the right
	to acquire beneficial ownership at any time within 60 days through an exercise of stock options or warrants or otherwise. Unless
	otherwise indicated, voting and investment power relating to the shares shown in the table for our directors and executive officers
	is exercised solely by the beneficial owner or shared by the owner and the owner’s spouse or children.


	 


	For purposes of this table, a person or
	group of persons is deemed to have “beneficial ownership” of any shares of common stock that such person has the right
	to acquire within 60 days as of the date hereof. For purposes of computing the percentage of outstanding shares of our common stock
	held by each person or group of persons named above, any shares that such person or persons has the right to acquire within 60
	days of the Closing Date is deemed to be outstanding, but is not deemed to be outstanding for the purpose of computing the percentage
	ownership of any other person. The inclusion herein of any shares listed as beneficially owned does not constitute an admission
	of beneficial ownership.


	 


	The percentage ownership information shown
	in the table below is calculated based on 13,915,000 shares of our common stock issued and outstanding as of December 31, 2016.
	We do not have any outstanding options, warrants or other securities exercisable for or convertible into shares of our common stock.


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 


	Amount and

	Nature


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Title of


	 


	 


	 


	of Beneficial


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Class


	 


	Name of Beneficial Owner


	 


	Ownership


	 


	 


	Percentage


	 




	Common Stock


	 


	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	11,160,000


	 


	 


	 


	80.20


	%




	 


	 


	President, Chairman of the board.


	 


	 



	Direct



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common Stock


	 


	Sujuan Peng


	 


	 


	252,000


	 


	 


	 


	1.81


	%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 



	Direct



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common Stock


	 


	Yanhua Xing


	 


	 


	588,000


	 


	 


	 


	4.23


	%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 



	Direct



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	All Officers and Directors as a Group


	 


	 


	12,000,000


	 


	 


	 


	86.24


	%





	 


	As a result, our executive officers, directors
	and affiliated persons will have significant influence to:


	 







	·




	Elect
	or defeat the election of our directors;





	 




	 



	·




	Amend or prevent amendment of our articles of incorporation or bylaws;





	 




	 



	·




	Effect or prevent a merger, sale of assets or other corporate transaction; and





	 




	 



	·




	Affect the outcome of any other matter submitted to the stockholders for vote.





	 


	Moreover, because of the significant ownership
	position held by our insiders, new investors will not be able to effect a change in the Company’s business or management,
	and therefore, shareholders would be subject to decisions made by management and the majority shareholders.


	 






	 



	36



	 










	 


	 


	 






	 











	Item 13.




	Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and
	Director Independence.





	 


	Other than the stock transactions discussed
	below, we have not entered into any transaction nor are there any proposed transactions in which any director, executive officer,
	shareholder of the company or any member of the immediate family of any of the foregoing had or is to have a direct or indirect
	material interest.


	 


	On December 20, 2013, we acquired One Hundred
	Percent (100%) of the issued and outstanding capital stock of JRSIS Health Care Limited, a privately held Limited Liability Company
	registered in the British Virgin Islands (“JHCL”) for Twelve Million (12,000,000) shares of our common stock paid to
	the three shareholders of JHCL. Only one of the three shareholders of JHCL is also our officer and director and the shares were
	issued as follows:


	 





	Junsheng Zhang




	11,160,000 shares






	Yanhua Xing




	588,000 shares






	Weiguang Song*




	252,000 shares





	 


	*Note: On November 25, 2015, Weiguang Song
	transferred all 252,000 shares to Sujuan Peng. As of April 01, 2016, Sujuan Peng is holding 252,000 shares.


	 


	The Company has entered into a financial
	leasing agreement for its new hospital buildings with Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd. The Leasing terms consist
	of principal plus interest of 30 payments. The annually rent is approximately 7 million RMB.



	 




	Independent Directors



	 


	None of our Board of Directors is an independent
	director, as such term is defined by the rules of the OTCBB Stock Exchange,




	 












	Item 14.




	Principal Accounting Fees and Services.





	 


	We were billed by our former and current
	independent public accounting firms, Albert Wong & Co. and De Joya Griffith, LLC, for the following professional services they
	performed for us during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 as set forth in the table below.


	 






	 


	 


	Year Ended December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Audit fees


	 


	$


	70,000


	 


	 


	$


	133,000


	 




	Audit-related fees


	 


	$


	-


	 


	 


	$


	—


	 




	Tax fees


	 


	$


	—


	 


	 


	$


	—


	 




	All other fees


	 


	$


	64,559


	 


	 


	$


	67,904


	 





	 


	Our Board of Directors pre-approves all
	audit and non-audit services performed by the Company's auditor and the fees to be paid in connection with such services.


	 






	 



	37



	 











	 


	 


	 






	 







	PART IV



	 











	ITEM 15.




	EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SCHEDULES





	 







	Name



	 



	Exhibit






	3.1



	 



	Articles of Incorporation of Registrant (1)





	 


	 


	 





	3.2



	 



	Bylaws of the Registrant (1)





	 


	 


	 





	3.3



	 



	BVI-Registration Form on November 08, 2013 (1)





	 


	 


	 





	3.4



	 



	Certificate of Incumbency on November 22, 2013 (1)





	 


	 


	 





	3.5



	 



	BVI-Registration Form on January 14, 2014 (1)





	 


	 


	 





	3.6



	 



	Certificate of Incumbency on January 22, 2014 (1)





	 


	 


	 





	3.7



	 



	20131009-COI-China Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (1)





	 


	 


	 





	5.1



	 



	Opinion and Consent of Co-Securities Counsel (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.1



	 



	House Leasing Contract (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.2



	 



	Financial Leasing Contract (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.3



	 



	Supplier Agreement (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.4



	 



	Share Exchange Agreement (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.5



	 



	Agreement on Modification to Contract and Articles of Association (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.6



	 



	Supplementary Description Terms for the Articles of Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.7



	 



	Rent exemption Agreement (1)





	 


	 


	 





	10.8



	 



	The shareholder investment confirmation letter (1)





	 


	 


	 





	23.1



	 



	Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (1)





	 


	 


	 





	31.1



	 



	Certification of the Principal Executive Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. *





	 


	 


	 





	31.2



	 



	Certification of the Principal Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. *





	 


	 


	 





	32.1



	 



	Certification of the Principal
	Executive Officer pursuant to U.S.C. Section 1350 as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. *





	 


	 


	 





	32.2



	 



	Certification of the Principal Financial Officer pursuant to U.S.C. Section 1350 as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. *





	 


	 


	 





	99.1



	 



	Form of Subscription Agreement (1)





	 


	 


	 





	99.2



	 



	Capital Verification Report (1)





	 


	 


	 





	101.INS



	 



	XBRL Instance Document*





	 


	 


	 





	101.SCH



	 



	XBRL Taxonomy Schema*





	 


	 


	 





	101.CAL



	 



	XBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase*





	 


	 


	 





	101.DEF



	 



	XBRL Taxonomy Definition Linkbase*





	 


	 


	 





	101.LAB



	 



	XBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase*





	 


	 


	 





	101.PRE



	 



	XBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase*






	 


	(1) Incorporated by reference to the same
	exhibit filed with our registration statement on Form S1, as amended (File No. 333-194359).


	*Filed herewith.


	 






	 



	38



	 











	 


	 


	 






	 





	SIGNATURES



	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of Section
	13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the
	undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


	 




	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION






	 


	 


	 





	Date: March 29, 2017    




	By:  




	/s/ Lihua Sun





	 



	Lihua Sun





	 



	Chief Executive Officer





	 



	Principal Executive Officer






	 



	 


	 





	 Date: March 29, 2017    




	By:  




	/s/ Xuewei Zhang





	 



	Xuewei Zhang





	 



	Chief Financial Officer





	 



	Principal Financial Officer





	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of Section
	13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the
	Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.


	 





	Signature



	 



	Title



	 



	Date





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Junsheng Zhang



	 



	President, Chairman of the Board and Director



	 



	March 29, 2017    






	Junsheng Zhang



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Lihua Sun



	 



	Chief Executive Officer and Director



	 



	March 29, 2017    






	Lihua Sun



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Xuewei Zhang 



	 



	 Chief Financial Officer and Director



	 



	March 29, 2017    






	Xuewei Zhang



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Yanhui Xing



	 



	Director



	 



	March 29, 2017    






	Yanhui Xing



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 






	 



	39



	 







	 










	 



	EXHIBIT 31.1:
	Rule 13a-14(a) Certification - CEO



	 


	I, Lihua Sun, certify
	that:


	 


	1.  I have
	reviewed this annual report on Form 10-K of JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION;


	 


	2. Based on my
	knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make
	the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period
	covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on my
	knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects
	the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;


	 


	4. The registrant's
	other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined
	in Exchange Act Rules 13a–15(e) and 15d–15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange
	Act Rules 13a–15(f) and 15d–15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	(a) Designed such
	disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to
	ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others
	within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	(b) Designed such
	internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision,
	to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
	external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	(c) Evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant's disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the
	effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and


	 


	(d) Disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant's internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant's most
	recent fiscal quarter (the registrant's fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or
	is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant's internal control over financial reporting; and


	 


	5. The registrant's
	other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting,
	to the registrant's auditors and the audit committee of the registrant's board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent
	functions):


	 


	(a) All significant
	deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably
	likely to adversely affect the registrant's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and


	 


	(b) Any fraud,
	whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant's internal control
	over financial reporting.


	 






	/s/ Lihua Sun





	Date: March 29, 2017   





	Lihua Sun


	Chief Executive Officer


	 



	 



	 








	 



	EXHIBIT 31.2:
	Rule 13a-14(a) Certification - CFO



	 


	I, Xuewei Zhang,
	certify that:


	 


	1.  I have
	reviewed this annual report on Form 10-K of JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION:


	 


	2. Based on my
	knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make
	the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period
	covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on my
	knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects
	the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;


	 


	4. The registrant's
	other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined
	in Exchange Act Rules 13a–15(e) and 15d–15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange
	Act Rules 13a–15(f) and 15d–15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	(a) Designed such
	disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to
	ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others
	within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	(b) Designed such
	internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision,
	to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
	external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	(c) Evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant's disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the
	effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and


	 


	(d) Disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant's internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant's most
	recent fiscal quarter (the registrant's fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or
	is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant's internal control over financial reporting; and


	 


	5. The registrant's
	other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting,
	to the registrant's auditors and the audit committee of the registrant's board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent
	functions):


	 


	(a) All significant
	deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably
	likely to adversely affect the registrant's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and


	 


	(b) Any fraud,
	whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant's internal control
	over financial reporting.


	 






	/s/ Xuewei Zhang





	Date: March 29, 2017    





	Xuewei Zhang


	Chief Financial Officer


	 



	 



	 








	 



	Exhibit 32.1



	 





	CERTIFICATION
	PURSUANT TO 18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT
	TO SECTION 906




	OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY
	ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection
	with the Annual Report of JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION (the “Company”) on Form 10-K for the period ending December
	31, 2016, as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Lihua Sun, Chief
	Executive Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. ss.1350, as adopted pursuant to ss.906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act
	of 2002, that:


	 







	1.




	The
	Report fully complies with the requirements of Sections 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and





	 




	 



	2.




	The information contained in the report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company.





	 






	/s/ Lihua Sun





	Date: March 29, 2017   





	Lihua Sun


	Chief Executive Officer



	 



	 



	 








	 



	Exhibit 32.2



	 





	CERTIFICATION
	PURSUANT TO 18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT
	TO SECTION 906




	OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY
	ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection
	with the Annual Report of JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION (the “Company”) on Form 10-K for the period ending December
	31, 2016, as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Xuewei Zhang,
	Chief Financial Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. ss.1350, as adopted pursuant to ss.906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley
	Act of 2002, that:


	 







	1.




	The
	Report fully complies with the requirements of Sections 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and





	 







	2.




	The
	information contained in the report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations
	of the Company.





	 






	/s/ Xuewei Zhang





	Date: March 29, 2017    





	Xuewei Zhang


	Chief Financial Officer



	 



	 



	 














 ABERDEEN ISRAEL FUND, INC. (Form: 4, Received: 12/30/2013 15:28:11) 
















	FORM 4




	[ ]
	Check this box if no longer subject to Section 16. Form 4 or Form 5 obligations may continue.

	See

	Instruction 1(b).

	        





	UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

	Washington, D.C. 20549







	STATEMENT OF CHANGES IN BENEFICIAL OWNERSHIP OF SECURITIES



	                                                                                  




	OMB APPROVAL



	OMB Number:


	3235-0287



	Estimated average burden

	hours per response...


	0.5





	                      





	Filed pursuant to Section 16(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or Section 30(h) of the Investment Company Act of 1940



	                      














	1. Name and Address of Reporting Person


	*






	RAPPAPORT STEVEN N




	2. Issuer Name

	and

	Ticker or Trading Symbol




	ABERDEEN ISRAEL FUND, INC.
	[
	ISL
	]




	5. Relationship of Reporting Person(s) to Issuer
	(Check all applicable)




	__

	X

	__ Director

	                    

	_____ 10% Owner



	_____ Officer (give title below)

	    

	_____ Other (specify below)












	(Last)

	        

	(First)

	        

	(Middle)





	1735 MARKET ST, 32ND FLOOR




	3. Date of Earliest Transaction

	(MM/DD/YYYY)






	12/26/2013








	(Street)





	PHILADELPHIA, PA 19103



	(City)

	      

	(State)

	      

	(Zip)





	4. If Amendment, Date Original Filed


	(MM/DD/YYYY)





	 





	6. Individual or Joint/Group Filing


	(Check Applicable Line)




	_

	X

	_ Form filed by One Reporting Person

	___ Form filed by More than One Reporting Person















	Table I - Non-Derivative Securities Acquired, Disposed of, or Beneficially Owned







	1.Title of Security

	(Instr. 3)




	2. Trans. Date




	2A. Deemed Execution Date, if any




	3. Trans. Code

	(Instr. 8)




	4. Securities Acquired (A) or Disposed of (D)

	(Instr. 3, 4 and 5)




	5. Amount of Securities Beneficially Owned Following Reported Transaction(s)

	(Instr. 3 and 4)




	6. Ownership Form: Direct (D) or Indirect (I) (Instr. 4)




	7. Nature of Indirect Beneficial Ownership (Instr. 4)






	Code




	V




	Amount




	(A) or (D)




	Price









	Common stock

	 





	12/26/2013

	 




	 





	P






	  







	448.766


	 






	A







	$16.809

	 





	11323.309

	 





	D

	 




	 
















	Table II - Derivative Securities Beneficially Owned (

	e.g.

	, puts, calls, warrants, options, convertible securities)







	1. Title of Derivate Security

	(Instr. 3)




	2. Conversion or Exercise Price of Derivative Security




	3. Trans. Date




	3A. Deemed Execution Date, if any




	4. Trans. Code

	(Instr. 8)




	5. Number of Derivative Securities Acquired (A) or Disposed of (D)

	(Instr. 3, 4 and 5)




	6. Date Exercisable and Expiration Date




	7. Title and Amount of Securities Underlying Derivative Security

	(Instr. 3 and 4)




	8. Price of Derivative Security

	(Instr. 5)




	9. Number of derivative Securities Beneficially Owned Following Reported Transaction(s) (Instr. 4)




	10. Ownership Form of Derivative Security: Direct (D) or Indirect (I) (Instr. 4)




	11. Nature of Indirect Beneficial Ownership (Instr. 4)






	Code




	V




	(A)




	(D)




	Date Exercisable




	Expiration Date




	Title




	Amount or Number of Shares
















	Explanation of Responses:











	Remarks:



	On December 26, 2013, Mr. Rappaport was issued 448.766 shares by the issuer at the price of $16.809 per share.












	Reporting Owners








	Reporting Owner Name / Address





	Relationships






	Director




	10% Owner




	Officer




	Other







	RAPPAPORT STEVEN N

	1735 MARKET ST

	32ND FLOOR

	PHILADELPHIA, PA 19103






	X























	Signatures









	Nicola Espie as attorney-in-fact for Steven Rappaport








	12/30/2013









	**


	Signature of Reporting Person




	Date












	Reminder: Report on a separate line for each class of securities beneficially owned directly or indirectly.








	*






	If the form is filed by more than one reporting person,

	see

	Instruction 4(b)(v).








	**






	Intentional misstatements or omissions of facts constitute Federal Criminal Violations.

	See

	18 U.S.C. 1001 and 15 U.S.C. 78ff(a).






	Note:




	File three copies of this Form, one of which must be manually signed. If space is insufficient,

	see

	Instruction 6 for procedure.






	Persons who respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.








JRSIS Health Care Corp 10-Q May. 15, 2017  8:42 AM | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»JRSIS Health Care Corp (JRSS)FORM 10-Q | Quarterly ReportMay. 15, 2017  8:42 AM|About: JRSIS Health Care Corp (JRSS)View as PDF

 JRSIS HEALTH CARE Corp (Form: 10-Q, Received: 05/15/2017 08:44:31) 










	 









	 





	 




	UNITED STATES




	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION




	WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549



	 



	FORM 10-Q



	 


	(Mark One)


	 







	x




	QUARTERLY REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
	THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934






	 




	For the quarterly
	period ended March 31, 2017




	 




	or



	 







	¨




	TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
	THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934






	 




	For the transition
	period from to



	 



	Commission File
	Number: 

	001-36758




	 






	JRSIS
	HEALTH CARE CORPORATION.



	 





	 




	 


	(Exact name of Registrant as specified in
	its charter)


	 





	Florida



	 



	8099



	 



	46-4562047





	(State or other jurisdiction of


	 


	(Primary Standard Industrial


	 


	(I.R.S. Employer




	incorporation or organization)


	 


	Classification Code Number)


	 


	Identification Number)





	 



	1


	st


	– 7


	th


	Floor, Industrial and Commercial Bank Building,




	Xingfu Street, Hulan Town, Hulan District,
	Harbin City,




	Heilongjiang Province, China 150025

	 




	 






	(Address, including zip code, and telephone
	number, including area code,


	of Registrant’s principal executive
	offices)


	  


	 Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of
	the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Exchange Act) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the
	registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
	90 days.    Yes 

	x

	No 

	¨



	 


	Indicate by
	check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Website, if any, every Interactive
	Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during
	the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such
	files).    Yes 

	x

	No 

	¨



	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated
	filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions
	of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging
	growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.


	 







	Large
	accelerated filer

	¨





	Accelerated
	filer

	¨







	Non-accelerated
	filer


	¨


	    (Do not check if a
	smaller reporting company)




	Smaller
	reporting company


	x







	 



	Emerging
	growth company

	¨







	 


	If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the
	registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards
	provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.

	¨



	 


	Indicate by check
	mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes 

	¨


	 No

	 

	x



	 


	Indicate the number
	of shares outstanding of each of the issuer’s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date.


	 


	As
	of the date of filing of this report, there were outstanding 13,915,000 shares of the issuer’s common stock, par value $0.001
	per share.



	 







	 



	1



	 







	 




	 





	TABLE OF CONTENTS



	 




	 


	 


	Page






	PART I – FINANCIAL INFORMATION




	3




	 


	 


	 




	Item 1



	Consolidated Financial Statements



	F1-17




	 


	 


	 




	Item 2



	Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations



	4




	 


	 


	 




	Item 3



	Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk



	10




	 


	 


	 




	Item 4



	Controls and Procedures



	10




	 


	 


	 






	PART II – OTHER INFORMATION




	11




	 


	 


	 




	Item 1



	Legal Proceedings



	11




	 


	 


	 




	Item 1A



	Risk Factors



	11




	 


	 


	 




	Item 2



	Unregistered Sale of Equity Securities and Use of Proceeds



	11




	 


	 


	 




	Item 3



	Defaults Upon Senior Securities



	11




	 


	 


	 




	Item 4



	Other Information



	11




	 


	 


	 




	Item 5



	Exhibits



	11




	 


	 


	 




	 



	Signatures



	12




	 



	 









	 



	2



	 







	 




	 











	PART I – FINANCIAL
	INFORMATION






	 









	Item 1.    Consolidated
	Financial Statements




	 


	The accompanying
	unaudited consolidated financial statements have been prepared in accordance with the instructions to Form 10-Q and Item Regulation
	S-X, Rule 10-01(c) Interim Financial Statements, and, therefore, do not include all information and footnotes necessary for a complete
	presentation of financial position, results of operations, cash flows, and stockholders' equity in conformity with generally accepted
	accounting principles. In the opinion of management, all adjustments considered necessary for a fair presentation of the results
	of operations and financial position have been included and all such adjustments are of a normal recurring nature. Operating results
	for the three months ended March 31, 2017 are not necessarily indicative of the results that can be expected for the year ended
	December 31, 2017.



	 




	 




	 











	 



	3



	 







	 




	 



	INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 



	Page



	 




	 


	 





	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 





	Consolidated Balance Sheets— March 31, 2017 (Unaudited) and December 31, 2016



	 


	 


	F-2


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Three Months Ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 (Unaudited)



	 


	 


	F-3


	 




	 


	 





	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Three Months Ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 (Unaudited)



	 


	 


	F-4


	 




	 


	 





	Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (Unaudited)



	 


	 


	F5-17


	 




	 


	 


	 



	 





	 








	 


	F-

	1



	 







	 




	 







	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES)




	 





	 


	 


	March 31,


	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Assets:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents


	 


	$


	245,387


	 


	 


	$


	890,662


	 




	Accounts receivable, net


	 


	 


	3,345,358


	 


	 


	 


	3,335,500


	 




	Inventories


	 


	 


	834,788


	 


	 


	 


	801,240


	 




	Other receivables


	 


	 


	3,149


	 


	 


	 


	1,555


	 




	Prepayments


	 


	 


	398,338


	 


	 


	 


	518,722


	 




	Amount due from related parties


	 


	 


	4,408,193


	 


	 


	 


	1,804,987


	 




	Deferred expenses


	 


	 


	65,473


	 


	 


	 


	64,967


	 




	Deposits for capital leases


	 


	 


	262,946


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Total current assets


	 


	 


	9,563,632


	 


	 


	 



	7,417,633



	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Property and equipment, net


	 


	 


	23,962,577


	 


	 


	 


	23,274,180


	 




	Long term deferred expenses


	 


	 


	149,589


	 


	 


	 


	164,676


	 




	Deposits for capital leases


	 


	 


	589,738


	 


	 


	 


	846,101


	 




	Total assets


	 


	$


	34,265,536


	 


	 



	$




	31,702,590



	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Liabilities and shareholders’ equity


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	$


	1,414,502


	 


	 


	$


	743,660


	 




	Short-term bank loan


	 


	 


	420,829


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Deposits received


	 


	 


	5,796


	 


	 


	 


	5,751


	 




	Amount due to related parties


	 


	 


	121,757


	 


	 


	 


	25,329


	 




	Other payable


	 


	 


	23,352


	 


	 


	 


	77,973


	 




	Payroll payable


	 


	 


	57,786


	 


	 


	 


	52,072


	 




	Capital lease obligations - current portion


	 


	 


	2,200,521


	 


	 


	 


	2,313,038


	 




	Total current liabilities


	 


	 


	4,244,543


	 


	 


	 



	3,217,823



	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Capital lease obligations


	 


	 


	16,130,228


	 


	 


	 


	16,222,992


	 




	Other capital lease payable


	 


	 


	569,294


	 


	 


	 


	574,921


	 




	Total liabilities


	 


	$


	20,944,065


	 


	 


	$


	20,015,736


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Shareholders’ equity


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common stock; $0.001 par value, 100,000,000 shares authorized; 13,915,000 and 13,915,000 issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively


	 


	 


	13,915


	 


	 


	 


	13,915


	 




	Additional Paid-in capital


	 


	 


	1,132,423


	 


	 


	 


	1,132,423


	 




	Retained earnings


	 


	 


	7,385,543


	 


	 


	 


	6,274,052


	 




	Other comprehensive income


	 


	 


	(767,642


	)


	 


	 


	(786,055


	)




	Total shareholders’ equity of the Company


	 


	 


	7,764,239


	 


	 


	 


	6,634,335


	 




	Non-controlling interest


	 


	 


	5,557,232


	 


	 


	 


	5,052,519


	 




	Total shareholders’ equity


	 


	 


	13,321,471


	 


	 


	 


	11,686,854


	 




	Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity


	 


	$


	34,265,536


	 


	 


	$


	31,702,590


	 






	 




	See notes to consolidated financial statements



	 






	 


	F-

	2



	 







	 




	 







	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
	AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES) (UNAUDITED)



	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended 

	March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 




	 Revenue:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Medicine


	 


	$


	2,528,075


	 


	 


	$


	1,925,675


	 




	Patient services


	 


	 


	2,982,737


	 


	 


	 


	2,482,956


	 




	Total revenue


	 


	 


	5,510,812


	 


	 


	 


	4,408,631


	 




	Operating costs and expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of medicine sold


	 


	 


	1,650,466


	 


	 


	 


	1,106,181


	 




	Medical consumables


	 


	 


	558,302


	 


	 


	 


	389,760


	 




	Salaries and benefits


	 


	 


	814,366


	 


	 


	 


	682,590


	 




	Office supplies


	 


	 


	119,302


	 


	 


	 


	81,806


	 




	Vehicle expenses


	 


	 


	21,480


	 


	 


	 


	9,571


	 




	Utilities expenses


	 


	 


	147,887


	 


	 


	 


	146,107


	 




	Advertising and promotion expenses


	 


	 


	614


	 


	 


	 


	43,921


	 




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	289,939


	 


	 


	 


	343,818


	 




	Professional fee


	 


	 


	13,762


	 


	 


	 


	4,423


	 




	Depreciation


	 


	 


	303,001


	 


	 


	 


	240,285


	 




	Total operating costs and expenses


	 


	 


	3,919,119


	 


	 


	 


	3,048,462


	 




	Earnings from operations before other income and income taxes


	 


	 


	1,591,693


	 


	 


	 


	1,360,169


	 




	Other income


	 


	 


	(2,930


	)


	 


	 


	1,269


	 




	Earnings from operations before income taxes


	 


	 


	1,588,763


	 


	 


	 


	1,361,438


	 




	Income tax


	 


	 


	919


	 


	 


	 


	864


	 




	Net income


	 


	 


	1,587,844


	 


	 


	 


	1,360,574


	 




	Less: net income attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	476,353


	 


	 


	 


	420,273


	 




	Net income attributable to the Company


	 


	$


	1,111,491


	 


	 


	$


	940,301


	 




	Comprehensive income:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Foreign currency translation adjustment attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	28,360


	 


	 


	 


	21,262


	 




	Foreign currency translation adjustment attributable to the Company


	 


	 


	18,413


	 


	 


	 


	30,496


	 




	Comprehensive income


	 


	$


	1,634,617


	 


	 


	$


	1,412,332


	 




	Less: Comprehensive income attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	504,713


	 


	 


	 


	441,535


	 




	Comprehensive income attributable to the Company


	 


	$


	1,129,904


	 


	 


	$


	970,797


	 




	Basic and diluted earnings per share


	 


	$


	0.0799


	 


	 


	$


	0.0676


	 




	Weighted average number of shares outstanding


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 







	 



	See notes to consolidated financial statements



	 






	 


	F-

	3



	 







	 





	 








	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD, EXCEPT SHARES)



	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 




	Cash Flows From Operating Activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income


	 


	$


	1,587,844


	 


	 


	$


	1,360,574


	 




	Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Depreciation


	 


	 


	303,001


	 


	 


	 


	240,285


	 




	Interest


	 


	 


	289,939


	 


	 


	 


	343,818


	 




	Changes in operating assets and liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts receivable, net


	 


	 


	16,097


	 


	 


	 


	(530,474


	)




	Inventories


	 


	 


	(27,322


	)


	 


	 


	(56,309


	)




	Amount due from related parties


	 


	 


	(2,591,155


	)


	 


	 


	(81,600


	)




	Prepayments and other current assets


	 


	 


	(74,585


	)


	 


	 


	10,793


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	 


	665,253


	 


	 


	 


	123,340


	 




	Amount due to related parties


	 


	 


	108,873


	 


	 


	 


	(83,095


	)




	Deposits received


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	1,155


	 




	Accrued expenses and other current liabilities


	 


	 


	(61,978


	)


	 


	 


	25,675


	 




	Net cash provided by operating activities


	 


	 


	215,967


	 


	 


	 


	1,354,162


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows From Investing Activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Purchases of property and equipment


	 


	 


	(373,129


	)


	 


	 


	(70,573


	)




	Prepayment for property and equipment acquisition


	 


	 


	(218,670


	)


	 


	 


	(1,112,691


	)




	Net cash used in investing activities


	 


	 


	(591,799


	)


	 


	 


	(1,183,264


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows From Financing Activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Payments on capital lease obligation


	 


	 


	(679,359


	)


	 


	 


	(539,082


	)




	Short-term bank loan


	 


	 


	406,934


	 


	 


	 


	437,694


	 




	Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities


	 


	 


	(272,425


	)


	 


	 


	(101,388


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Effect of exchange rate fluctuation on cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	2,982


	 


	 


	 


	(7,620


	)




	Net decrease (increase) in cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	(645,275


	)


	 


	 


	61,890


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period


	 


	 


	890,662


	 


	 


	 


	352,153


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, ending of period


	 


	$


	245,387


	 


	 


	$


	414,043


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental disclosure of cash flow information


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash paid for income taxes


	 


	 


	919


	 


	 


	 


	864


	 




	Cash paid for interest


	 


	 


	289,939


	 


	 


	 


	352,406


	 








	 




	See notes to consolidated financial statements



	 






	 


	F-

	4



	 







	 




	 





	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION






	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 




	NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF BUSINESS AND ORGANIZATION



	 


	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION (the “Company”
	or “JHCC”) was incorporated on November 20, 2013 under the laws of the United States and the State of Florida. The
	general nature of the business shall be to engage in any and all lawful business permitted under the laws of the United States
	and the State of Florida.


	 


	JRSIS HEALTH CARE LIMITED (“JHCL”),
	formally named China Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd, which is a privately held Limited Liability Company registered in British
	Virgin Island (“BVI”) on February 25, 2013. JHCL was authorized to issue 50,000 shares of a single class each with
	par value of $1.00 per share to its sole shareholder Ms. Yanhua Xing. On November 20, 2013, China Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd
	has changed its name to JRSIS HEALTH CARE LIMITED.


	 


	Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”)
	is a privately held limited liability company registered in Hong Kong on September 17, 2012. Runteng was authorized to issue up
	to 10,000 shares with par value of HK$1 per share to its sole shareholder Ms. Yanhua Xing.


	 


	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd (“Jiarun”)
	was a privately held, for-profit hospital, incorporated in Harbin city of Heilongjiang, China in February 2006. Jiarun is a private
	hospital serving patients on a municipal and county level and providing both Western and Chinese medical practices to the residents
	of Harbin. After a series of share exchanges mentioned here after in note 1, Jiarun became a 70% owned subsidiary of the Company.


	 


	JHCC, JHCL, Runteng and Jiarun are collectively
	referred as the “Group”.


	 




	Reorganization





	 



	On December 23, 2012, in accordance with
	the “Foreign Investment Enterprise Law” under the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”), Runteng and
	Jiarun entered into an agreement that Runteng and the original owner of Jiarun should invest a total of RMB50,000,000 ($7,936,508),
	in which Runteng and the original owner should contribute RMB35,000,000 ($5,555,556) or 70% and RMB15,000,000 ($2,380,952) or 30%
	of the total capital, respectively. According to the Article of Association (Joint venture investment agreement) and the amendment
	of Article of Association (Joint venture investment agreement), Runteng has the obligation to pay RMB35,000,000 ($5,555,556) within
	five years after the issuance of the joint venture business license. As of March 31, 2017, Jiarun has received $1,081,000 from
	Runteng.


	 


	On March 7, 2013, JHCL acquired all 100
	issued and outstanding shares of through share exchanges to obtain 100% controlling interests of Runteng. 


	 


	On June 1, 2013, Junsheng Zhang, the owner
	of Jiarun, entered into a supplemental agreement with Runteng for the attribution of accumulated retained earnings of Jiarun. In
	which, the historical accumulated profit of Jiarun up to June 30, 2013 should be 100% attributed to Junsheng Zhang; the profit
	generated from Jiarun after July 1, 2013 should be attributed to Runteng and Junsheng Zhang on the basis of 70% and 30%, respectively.


	 


	On July 29, 2013, the Joint Venture Investment
	Agreement between Runteng and Junsheng Zhang has been approved by the Development and Reform Commission of Hulan District, Harbin
	City and Harbin Investment Promotion Bureau. On the same date, Jiarun has obtained Certificate of Approval for Establishment of
	Enterprises with Investment of Taiwan, Hong Kong, Macao and Overseas Chinese in the People’s Republic of China; the Joint
	Venture Jiarun duration of operation is twenty years.


	 






	 


	F-

	5



	 







	 





	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 




	NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF BUSINESS AND ORGANIZATION (CONTINUED)



	 


	On October 3, 2013, Ms. Yanhua Xing transferred
	23,275 JHCL shares to Mr. Junsheng Zhang, 23,225 JHCL shares to Ms. Chunlan Tang, and 1,050 JHCL shares to Mr. Weiguang Song.


	 


	On November 8, 2013, Ms. Chunlan Tang transferred
	all 23,225 JHCL shares to Mr. Junsheng Zhang, subsequently making Mr. Junsheng Zhang holdings 46,500 JHCL shares.


	  


	On December 20, 2013, a share exchange
	agreement was entered by and among JHCC, JHCL and the shareholders of JHCL, Junsheng Zhang, Yanhua Xing and Weiguang Song. JHCC
	desires to issue a total of 12,000,000 shares of its Common Stock (the “JHCC Shares”) to the Shareholders of JHCC,
	pro rata, in exchange for 100% of the JHCL Shares owned by the Shareholders. At the Closing, the Shareholders shall allot and deliver
	to JHCC a total of 50,000 shares of the ordinary share of JHCL which represents 100% of the issued and outstanding shares of JHCL.
	JHCL shall become a wholly-owned subsidiary of JHCC, and JHCC will effectively acquire all business and an assets of JHCL as now
	or hereafter existing, including all business and assets of any and all subsidiaries of JHCL, including 70% ownership interest
	in Jiarun.


	 


	On July 8, 2014, Jiarun obtained joint
	venture business license. Runteng has already completed cooperation restructuring. Up to completion of the legal structures, Jiarun
	are compliance with the Company Law of People’s Republic of China and all other requirements imposed by PRC authorities.


	   


	Before and after the reorganization mentioned
	above, Junsheng Zhang continued to serve as chairman of Jiarun (the “Operating Subsidiary”), and together with the
	other management of the Company, continued to direct both day-to-day operation and management of the Operating Subsidiary, as well
	as its strategic direction. The reorganization effectively resulted in Junsheng Zhang continuing to bear the residual risks and
	rewards related to the Operating Subsidiary. Because of the reasons described above, the Company is substantively controlled by
	Junsheng Zhang, and the Company continued to consolidate the Operating subsidiary during the reorganization. And the reorganization
	transactions are considered as a series of transactions between the parties under common control and did not establish a new basis
	in the assets and liabilities of the Operating Subsidiary.


	 


	During the reorganization, JHCC, JHCL,
	Runteng and Jiarun were under common control of Junsheng Zhang. Therefore, the reorganization was effectively a legal recapitalization
	accounted for as transactions between entities under common control at the carry over basis, in a manner similar to pooling-of-interests
	accounting. The effect of the reorganization was applied retroactively to the prior years’ consolidated financial statements
	as if the current structure existed since inception.


	 


	30% of Jiarun hospital interest held by
	Junsheng Zhang is subjecting to non-controlling interest (“NCIs”), which was stated under ASC810-10-45, the ownership
	interest in the subsidiary that are held by owners other than the parent is a non-controlling interest. 70% held by Runteng is
	applying to its holding Runteng. According to the supplemental agreement signed between Junsheng Zhang and Runteng on June 1, 2013,
	the comprehensive income from Jiarun would be attributable to retained earnings and non-controlling interest for 70% and 30% respectively,
	from July 1, 2013.


	 



	NOTE 2. SUMMARIES OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES



	 







	A.




	Basis of presentation





	 


	The consolidated financial statements have
	been prepared in accordance with the United States generally accepted accounting principles (“U.S. GAAP”). 


	 







	B.




	Principles of consolidation





	 


	The consolidated financial statements include
	the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All inter-company transactions and balances have been eliminated in consolidation.
	Non-controlling interests represent the equity interest in Jiarun that is not attributable to the Company. Non-controlling interest
	is reported in the consolidated financial position within equity, separately from the Company’s equity and that net income
	or loss and comprehensive income or loss are attributable to the Company’s and the non-controlling interest.


	 






	 


	F-

	6



	 







	 




	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 







	C.




	Use of estimates





	 


	The preparation of unaudited consolidated
	financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported
	amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements,
	and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. Management makes these estimates using the best
	information available at the time the estimates are made; however actual results could differ from those estimates. Significant
	items subject to such estimates and assumptions include valuation allowances for receivables and recoverability of carrying amount
	and the estimated useful lives of long-lived assets. These estimates are often based on complex judgments and assumptions that
	management believes to be reasonable but are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Actual results could differ from these
	estimates.


	 







	D.




	Functional currency and foreign currency translation





	 


	JHCC and JHCL’s functional currency is the United States
	dollar (“US$”). Runteng’s functional currency is the Hong Kong dollar (“HK$”). The functional currency
	of Jiarun is the Renminbi (“RMB”).


	 


	The Company’s reporting currency is US$. Assets and liabilities
	of Runteng and Jiarun are translated at the current exchange rate at the balance sheet dates, revenues and expenses are translated
	at the average exchange rates during the reporting periods, and equity accounts are translated at historical rates. Translation
	adjustments are reported in other comprehensive income.


	 







	E.




	Concentration of Credit Risk





	 


	Financial instruments that potentially
	subject the Company to concentrations of credit risk are cash, accounts receivable and other receivables arising from its normal
	business activities. The Company places its cash in what it believes to be credit-worthy financial institutions. The Company has
	a diversified customer base. The majority of sales are either cash receipt in advance or cash receipt upon delivery. For the three
	months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, no customer accounted for more than 10% of net revenue. As of March 31, 2017 and December
	31, 2016, 3 and 2 customer accounted for more than 10% of net accounts receivable, respectively. For those credit sales, the Company
	routinely assesses the financial strength of its customers and, based upon factors surrounding the credit risk, establishes an
	allowance, if required, for uncollectible accounts and, as a consequence, believes that its accounts receivable credit risk exposure
	beyond such allowance is limited.


	 







	F.




	Cash and cash equivalents





	 


	Cash and cash equivalents include all cash,
	deposits in banks and other liquid investments with initial maturities of three months or less.


	 







	G.




	Accounts receivable





	 


	Accounts receivable are recorded at net
	realizable value consisting of the carrying amount less an allowance for uncollectible accounts as needed. The allowance for doubtful
	accounts is the Company’s best estimate of the amount of probable credit losses in the Company’s existing accounts
	receivable. The Company determines the allowance based on aging data, historical collection experience, customer specific facts
	and economic conditions. Account balances are charged off against the allowance after all means of collection have been exhausted
	and the potential for recovery is considered remote. 


	 







	H.




	Inventories





	 


	Inventories, consisting principally of
	medicines, are stated at the lower of cost or market using the first-in, first-out method (“FIFO”). This policy requires
	the Company to make estimates regarding the market value of inventory, including an assessment of excess or obsolete inventory.
	The Company determines excess or obsolete inventory based on an estimate of the future demand and estimated selling prices for
	its products.


	 







	I.




	Construction in progress





	 


	Construction in progress represents the
	new hospital painting and decoration costs. And all direct costs relating to the polishing and decoration are capitalized as construction
	in progress. No depreciation is provided in respect of construction in progress. 



	 







	 


	F-

	7



	 







	 





	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 







	J.




	Property and equipment





	 


	Property and equipment are stated at cost.
	Expenditures for maintenance and repairs are charged to operations when incurred, while additions and betterments are capitalized.
	Depreciation is recorded on a straight-line basis reflective of the useful lives of the assets. When assets are retired or disposed,
	the asset’s original cost and related accumulated depreciation are eliminated from accounts and any gain or loss is reflected
	in income.


	 

	 





	Buildings and improvement


	10-40 years




	Medical equipment


	5-15 years




	Transportation instrument


	5-10 years






	Office equipment


	5-10 years




	Electronic equipment


	5-10 years




	Software


	5-10 years





	 







	K.




	Leases





	 



	Operating lease



	 


	Leases where substantially all the rewards
	and risks of ownership of assets remain with the lessor are accounted for as operating leases. Minimum lease payments, including
	scheduled rent increases, made under operating leases are charged to the consolidated statements of operations and other comprehensive
	income (loss) on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Contingent rentals are excluded from minimum lease payments, and are
	recognized as expense when the achievement of the specified target is considered probable.


	 



	Capital lease



	 


	Leases which substantially transfer all
	of the benefits and risks inherent in ownership to the lessee are classified as capital leases. In a capital lease, assets and
	liabilities are recorded at the amount of the lesser of (a) the fair value of the leased asset at the inception of the lease or
	(b) the present value of the minimum lease payments (excluding executing costs) over the lease term. Recorded assets are depreciated
	over their estimated useful lives. During the lease term, each minimum lease payment is allocated between a reduction of the obligation
	and interest expense to produce a constant periodic rate of interest on the remaining balance of the obligation. Leasehold improvements
	are depreciated over the depreciable lives of the corresponding fixed asset or the related lease term, whichever is shorter.


	 







	L.




	Fair Value Measurement





	 


	The Company applies the provisions of ASC
	Subtopic 820-10, Fair Value Measurements, for fair value measurements of financial assets and financial liabilities and for fair
	value measurements of nonfinancial items that are recognized or disclosed at fair value in the financial statements. ASC 820 also
	establishes a framework for measuring fair value and expands disclosures about fair value measurements.


	 


	Fair value is defined as the price that
	would be received when selling an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at
	the measurement date. In determining the fair value for the assets and liabilities required or permitted to be recorded, the Company
	considers the principal or most advantageous market in which it would transact and it considers assumptions that market participants
	would use when pricing the asset or liability.


	 


	ASC 820 establishes a fair value hierarchy
	that requires an entity to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs when measuring fair
	value. ASC 820 establishes three levels of inputs that may be used to measure fair value. The hierarchy gives the highest priority
	to unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities (Level 1 measurements) and the lowest priority
	to measurements involving significant unobservable inputs (Level 3 measurements). The three levels of the fair value hierarchy
	are as follows:


	 


	Level 1: Unadjusted quoted prices
	in active markets that are accessible at the measurement date for identical, unrestricted assets or liabilities;


	Level 2: Quoted prices in markets
	that are not active, or inputs that is observable, either directly or indirectly, for substantially the full term of the asset
	or liability;


	Level 3: Prices or valuation
	techniques that require inputs that are both significant to the fair value measurement and unobservable (supported by little or
	no market activity).


	 


	There were no transfers between level 1, level 2 or level 3
	measurements for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016.


	 


	Cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable,
	accounts payable and accrued liabilities are reflected in the accompanying consolidated financial statements at amounts that approximate
	fair value because of the short-term nature of these instruments. The fair value of the Company’s capital lease obligations
	also approximate carrying value as they bear interest at current market rates.


	 







	M.




	Segment and geographic information





	 


	The Company is operating in one segment
	in accordance with the accounting guidance FASB ASC topic 280, “Segment Reporting”. The company’s revenues are
	from customers in People’s Republic of China (“PRC”). All assets of the company are located in PRC.


	 






	 


	F-

	8



	 







	 





	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 







	N.




	Revenue recognition





	 


	The Company recognizes revenue when the
	amount of revenue can be reliably measured, it is probable that economic benefits will flow to the entity and specific criteria
	have been met for each of the Company’s activities as described below.


	 




	Medicine sales




	 


	Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine.


	 


	Given the nature of this revenue source
	of the Company’s business and the applicable rules guiding revenue recognition, the revenue recognition practices for the
	sale of medicine do not contain estimates that materially affect results of operations nor any policy for return of products.



	 





	Patient Services




	 


	In accordance with the medical licenses
	of Jiarun, the approved medical patient service scope of the Company include medical consulting, surgery, obstetrics and gynecology,
	pediatrics, anesthesia, clinic laboratory, medical imaging, and traditional Chinese medicine, etc.


	 


	Patient service revenue is recognized when
	it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has
	been provided to the patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	 


	The Company provides services to both patients
	covered by social insurance and patients who are not covered by social insurance. The Company charges the same rates for patient
	services regardless of the coverage by social insurance.


	 


	Patients who are not covered by social
	insurance are liable for the total cost of medical treatment.


	 




	 


	•


	For out-patient medical services, revenue is recognized when the Company provides medical service to the patient. The Company collects payment when the patient checks out from the hospital, which is the same day the services are provided.




	 




	 


	•


	For in-patient medical services, the Company estimates the approximate fee the patients will spend in the hospital based on patients’ symptom. This is when the patients check in to the hospital. At that time, the Company collects the estimated fees from the patient and records the payment as deposits received.




	 


	During the in-patient services period,
	the Company recognizes revenue when the patient service is provided and deducts the cost of service from the deposit received.
	The Company records these transactions based on daily reports generated by the respective medical department. When medical services
	exceed patient deposits received the Company records revenue and accounts receivable when the patient services are provided.


	 


	When patients check out from the hospital,
	the Company calculates and determines the remaining deposit, if any, and refunds the unused portion of the deposit to the patients.
	In the case where the patients have a balance in accounts receivable during the in-patient period, accounts receivable are required
	to be paid in full at checkout.


	 


	Patients covered by social insurance will
	receive a portion or full medical services reimbursed or paid by the social insurance agencies via prepaid cards or insurance claim
	settlement process.


	 




	Settlement process




	 


	The Company is a registered medical service
	vendor under the state social insurance system for various social insurance agencies; the insurance agencies include “Social
	Medical Insurance funded by PRC and Heilongjiang Province” and “Heilongjiang Province New Rural Cooperative Medical
	Care System”. The Company utilizes an online system maintained by the social insurance agencies for patients’ who are
	covered by social insurance agencies.



	 







	 


	F-

	9



	 







	 





	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 








	N.




	Revenue recognition (continued)





	 




	 


	•




	The Company records patients’ information in the social insurance system at check in. The system determines the covered portion and amounts based on the information input to the system.




	 




	 


	•




	At the time of check out, the Company collects payment for services the patients are liable for and records accounts receivable from the social insurance agencies for the portion of services covered by the social insurances. In the case that the patients have made payment during the in-patient services period, the Company refunds any amount in excess of the portion they are liable for.




	 




	 




	•


	The Company is responsible for submitting supporting documents of patient services provided to the social insurance agencies for their review. The Company also requires reconciling its records with the social insurance agencies once a month. Once the social insurance agencies approve the reconciliation, the insurance agencies will settle the accounts receivable balance in the next month following the approval.




	 







	O.




	Income taxes






	 



	The Company adopts FASB ASC Topic 740,
	“Income Taxes,” which requires the recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences
	of events that have been included in the financial statements or tax returns. Under this method, deferred income taxes are recognized
	for the tax consequences in future years of differences between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and their financial reporting
	amounts at each period end based on enacted tax laws and statutory tax rates applicable to the periods in which the differences
	are expected to affect taxable income. Valuation allowances are established, when necessary, to reduce deferred tax assets to the
	amount expected to be realized.



	 



	In July 2006, the FASB issued FIN 48 (ASC
	740-10), Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes-An Interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109 (ASC 740), which requires income
	tax positions to meet a more-likely-than-not recognition threshold to be recognized in the financial statements. Under FIN 48 (ASC
	740-10), tax positions that previously failed to meet the more-likely-than-not threshold should be recognized in the first subsequent
	financial reporting period in which that threshold is met. Previously recognized tax positions that no longer meet the more-likely-than-not
	threshold should be derecognized in the first subsequent financial reporting period in which that threshold is no longer met.


	 


	The application of tax laws and regulations
	is subject to legal and factual interpretation, judgment and uncertainty. Tax laws and regulations themselves are subject to change
	as a result of changes in fiscal policy, changes in legislation, the evolution of regulations and court rulings. Therefore, the
	actual liability may be materially different from our estimates, which could result in the need to record additional tax liabilities
	or potentially reverse previously recorded tax liabilities or deferred tax asset valuation allowance.


	 


	As a result of the implementation of FIN
	48 (ASC 740-10), the company made a comprehensive review of its portfolio of tax positions in accordance with recognition standards
	established by FIN 48 (ASC 740-10). The Company recognized no material adjustments to liabilities or shareholder’s equity
	as a result of the implementation. The adoption of FIN 48 did not have a material impact on the Company’s unaudited consolidated
	financial statements.


	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC, income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 


	Jiarun’s medical services have been
	exempt from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions, mainly provide medical services, with the “PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations”
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company’s medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income tax of $919 and
	$864 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively to support the local tax bureau’s economical obligations.


	 






	 


	F-

	10



	 







	 




	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 







	P.




	Earnings per share





	 


	Basic earnings per common share is computed
	by using net income divided by the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding for the periods presented. Diluted
	earnings per share is computed by dividing net income by the weighted average number of shares of common stock, common stock equivalents
	and potentially dilutive securities outstanding for the periods presented.


	 







	Q.




	Recently accounting pronouncements






	 

	 


	In February 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-02,
	Leases (Topic 842), aimed at making leasing activities more transparent and comparable. The new standard requires substantially
	all leases be recognized by lessees on their balance sheet as a right-of-use asset and corresponding lease liability, including
	today’s operating leases. For public business entities, the standard is effective for fiscal years beginning after December
	15, 2018, including interim periods within those fiscal years. For all other entities, the standard is effective for fiscal years
	beginning after December 15, 2019, and interim periods within fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2020. Early application
	is permitted for all entities. The Company is currently evaluating the impact of the adoption of this guidance on its consolidated
	financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.


	 


	In March 2016, the FASB issued ASU No.
	2016-08, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Principal versus Agent Considerations (Reporting Revenue Gross versus
	Net). The amendment in this update affect entities with transactions included within the scope of Topic 606, The scope of that
	Topic includes entities that enter into contracts with customers to transfer goods or services (that are an output of the entity’s
	ordinary activities) in exchange for consideration. The amendments are intended to improve the operability and understandability
	of the implementation guidance on principal versus agent considerations. In April 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-10, The amendments
	in ASU 2016-10 provide more detailed guidance, including additional implementation guidance and examples in the following key areas:
	1) identifying performance obligations and 2) licenses of intellectual property. In May 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-12 a
	proposed Update, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Narrow-Scope Improvements and Practical Expedients, on September
	30, 2015. The amendments do not change the core principles of the standard, but clarify the guidance on assessing collectability,
	presenting sales taxes, measuring noncash consideration and certain transition matters. This update becomes effective concurrently
	with ASU No. 2014-09. The Company is currently evaluating the effect of this new standard, including the transition method, to
	determine the impact on the Company's consolidated financial position, results of operations, cash flows, or related disclosures.


	 


	In October 2016, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Update No. 2016-16, Income Taxes – Intra-Entity Transfers of Assets Other Than Inventory (ASU 2016-16). The standard
	is intended to address diversity in practice and complexity in financial reporting, particularly for intra-entity transfers of
	intellectual property. ASU 2016-16 will be effective for the Company beginning with the interim periods of fiscal 2018 and requires
	the modified retrospective method of adoption. Early adoption is permitted. The Company is in the process of determining timing
	of adoption and assessing the impact of ASU 2016-16 on its consolidated financial statements.


	 


	In November 2016, the FASB issued ASU No.
	2016-18, Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230): Restricted Cash (“ASU No. 2016-18”). ASU No. 2016-18 requires that a
	statement of cash flows explain the change during the period in the total of cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted
	cash equivalents. Therefore, amounts generally described as restricted cash should be included with cash and cash equivalents when
	reconciling the beginning of period and end of period total amounts shown on the statement of cash flows. ASU No. 2016-18 is effective
	for annual periods beginning after December 15, 2017, including interim periods within those fiscal years. The Company elected
	to early adopt ASU No. 2016-18 for the reporting period ending December 31, 2016 and was applied retrospectively. As a result of
	adoption of ASU No. 2016-18, the Company no longer presents the changes within restricted cash in the consolidated statements of
	cash flows.


	 


	In January 2017, the FASB issued Accounting
	Standards Board Update No. 2017-01: Business Combinations (Topic 805) - Clarifying the Definition of a Business (“ASU 2017-01”).
	The ASU clarifies the definition of business with the objective of adding guidance to assist entities with evaluating whether transactions
	should be accounted for as acquisitions (or disposals) of assets or businesses. ASU 2017-01 will be effective for the Company’s
	fiscal year beginning January 1, 2018 and subsequent interim periods with prospective application with impacts on the Company’s
	consolidated financial statements that may vary depending on each specific acquisition. Early adoption is conditionally permitted.


	 


	In March 2017, the FASB issued ASU No.
	2017-08, Receivables – Nonrefundable Fees and Other Costs (Subtopic 310-20), Premium Amortization on Purchased Callable Debt
	Securities. Under current GAAP, entities normally amortize the premium as an adjustment of yield over the contractual life of the
	instrument. This guidance shortens the amortization period for certain callable debt securities held at a premium to the earliest
	call date. This update is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years, beginning after December 15,
	2018. The adoption of ASU No. 2017-08 is not expected to have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.


	 


	We do not believe other recently issued but not yet effective
	accounting standards, if currently adopted, would have a material effect on the consolidated financial position, statements of
	operations and cash flows.


	 






	 


	F-

	11



	 







	 




	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 






	NOTE 3. Accounts Receivable, Net




	 





	 


	 


	March 31


	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 



	(Unaudited)



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts receivable


	 


	$


	3,369,665


	 


	 


	$


	3,359,619


	 




	Less: allowance for doubtful debts


	 


	 


	24,307


	 


	 


	 


	24,119


	 




	 


	 


	$


	3,345,358


	 


	 


	$


	3,335,500


	 





	 


	The Company experienced nil bad debts during three months ended
	March 31, 2017 and 2016.


	 





	NOTE 4. Inventories




	 



	At March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, inventories consist
	of the following:



	 





	 


	 


	March 31


	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Western medicine


	 


	$


	527,107


	 


	 


	$


	548,724


	 




	Chinese herbal medicine


	 


	 


	9,905


	 


	 


	 


	9,113


	 




	Medical material


	 


	 


	295,545


	 


	 


	 


	241,630


	 




	Other material


	 


	 


	2,231


	 


	 


	 


	1,773


	 




	 


	 


	$


	834,788


	 


	 


	$


	801,240


	 






	 






	NOTE 5. Prepayment




	 



	At March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016 prepayment consists
	of the following:


	 




	 


	 


	March 31


	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Deposits on medical equipment


	 


	$


	346,469


	 


	 


	$


	221,083


	 




	Heating fees


	 


	 


	12,455


	 


	 


	 


	86,515


	 




	Others


	 


	 


	39,414


	 


	 


	 


	211,124


	 




	 


	 


	$


	398,338


	 


	 


	$


	518,722


	 






	 






	NOTE 6. Property and Equipment



	 


	At March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, property and equipment,
	at cost, consist of:


	 




	 


	 


	March 31,


	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Transportation equipment


	 


	$


	721,214


	 


	 


	$


	715,646


	 




	Medical equipment


	 


	 


	9,698,466


	 


	 


	 


	9,282,026


	 




	Electrical equipment


	 


	 


	1,342,080


	 


	 


	 


	1,310,927


	 




	Office equipment and others


	 


	 


	98,586


	 


	 


	 


	93,283


	 




	Buildings


	 


	 


	14,532,184


	 


	 


	 


	13,982,919


	 




	Software


	 


	 


	138,094


	 


	 


	 


	137,028


	 




	Total fixed assets at cost


	 


	 


	26,530,624


	 


	 


	 


	25,521,829


	 




	Accumulated depreciation


	 


	 


	(2,568,047


	)


	 


	 


	(2,247,649


	)




	Total fixed assets, net


	 


	$


	23,962,577


	 


	 


	$


	23,274,180


	 






	 



	The Company recorded depreciation expense of $303,001 and $240,285
	for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.


	 






	 


	F-

	12



	 







	 




	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)




	 




	NOTE 7. Long term deferred expenses




	 



	On May 7, 2015, July 3, 2015 and October
	16, 2015, Jiarun entered into three lease agreements to lease medical equipment from Hair Finance Leasing (China) Co., Ltd. (“Hair”),
	a third party, for a five-year period, in which Jiarun is required to pay consulting fee to Hair for the services provided over
	the five years. The consulting fee paid but attributable to the current and subsequent accounting periods was accounted for as
	deferred expenses and long term deferred expenses. The current portion of the prepaid consulting fee was recorded as deferred expenses
	$65,473 and $64,967 as of March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016. The long-term deferred expenses were $149,589 and $164,676 as of
	March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016.


	 


	The Company recorded consulting fee of
	$16,373 and $17,246 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.



	 




	NOTE 8. Capital Lease Obligations and Deposit for Capital
	Leases



	 


	On June 5, 2013, Jiarun entered into a
	lease agreement to lease hospital building from Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd, which is owned by Junsheng Zhang,
	a related party. The Leasing terms consist of principal plus 30 payments. Each payments will be made on an annual basis when RMB7,000,000
	per payment will be paid upfront for each leasing period. The first payment was made on September, 2014. At the end of the leasing
	period, a final payment will be made to settle the total leasing amount. Both parties agreed for Jiarun to pay RMB3,000,000 as
	deposit at the execution of the Leasing agreement, which will be deducted from the final rental settlement. The lending interest
	rate was calculated at 6.55%, which is the benchmark interest rate announced from The People’s Bank of China. After the completion
	of all payments, the ownership of the lease item will be transferred to Jiarun.


	 


	The leasing agreement for our hospital
	building contains the following provisions:


	 




	 


	•


	Rental payments of RMB7,000,000 (equivalent to $1,144,913) per year, payable at the beginning of September.




	 




	 


	•


	An option allowing the lessor to extend the lease for thirty years beyond the last renewal option exercised by the company.




	 




	 


	•


	A guarantee by the company that the lessor will realize $nil, from selling the asset at the expiration of the lease This lease is a capital lease because its term (30 years) exceeds 75% of the building’s estimated economic life. In addition, the present value ($15,185,032) of the minimum lease payments exceeds 90% of the fair value of the building ($15,721,295).




	 




	 


	•


	Accumulated annual amounts resulting from applying an interesting rate 6.55% to the balance of the lease obligation at the beginning of each year. The lease obligation is increased by the amount of the prior year’s interest, the amount of the net rental payment at the beginning of each year; and this amount represents the guaranteed residual value at the end of the lease term.




	 


	On September 1, 2014, October 22, 2014,
	March 26, 2015, May 7, 2015, July 3, 2015 and October 16, 2015, May 10, 2016, July 5, 2016, December 16, 2016 Jiarun entered into
	several lease agreements to lease medical equipment and elevator from three lease finance companies, which are all third parties,
	for three to five year periods, in which Jiarun is required to make monthly or quarterly payments toward the leases. The Company
	was also required to pay deposits up front, which deposits will later be used to offset against the last quarterly payment. The
	medical equipment and elevator will be transferred to Jiarun upon the completion of the agreement.


	 


	These leases have been classified as capital
	leases. The cost of the medical equipment included in these leases is included in the consolidated balance sheets as property and
	equipment and construction in progress.


	 






	 


	F-

	13



	 







	 





	 




	JRSIS
	HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 





	NOTE 8. Capital Lease Obligations and Deposit for Capital
	Leases (Continued)



	 


	The future minimum lease payments for annual
	capital lease obligation as of March 31, 2017 are as follows:


	 




	Year


	 


	Amounts

	(Unaudited)


	 




	2017


	 


	$


	1,981,538


	 




	2018


	 


	 


	1,679,089


	 




	2019


	 


	 


	1,485,427


	 




	Thereafter


	 


	 


	13,184,695


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	18,330,749


	 





	 


	The Company recorded finance lease fees of $325,817 and $343,479
	for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.



	 






	NOTE 9. Short-term Bank Loan



	 




	 


	 


	March 31


	 


	 


	December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Short- term bank loan


	 


	$


	420,829


	 


	 


	$


	-


	 





	 


	As of March 31, 2017, the above bank loan
	was for working capital and capital expenditure purposes. The loan was primarily obtained from Harbin Bank with interest rate of
	6.09% per annum, the contract was signed from January 19, 2017 to January 18, 2018, and the loan was received on January 24, 2017.
	The interest expenses were $3,917 and $5,701 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.


	 



	NOTE 10. Non-controlling Interests



	 


	Jiarun is the Company’s majority-owned
	subsidiary which is consolidated in the Company’s financial statements with a non-controlling interest recognized. The Company
	holds 70% interest of Jiarun as of March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016.


	 


	As of March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016,
	NCI in the consolidated balance sheet was $5,557,232 and $5,052,519, respectively. For the three months ended March 31, 2017, the
	comprehensive income attributable to shareholders’ equity and NCI is $1,129,904 and $504,713 respectively. For the three
	months ended March 31, 2016, the comprehensive income attributable to shareholders’ equity and NCIs is $970,797 and $441,535,
	respectively.


	 





	NOTE 11. Revenue



	 


	The Company’s revenue consists of medicine sales and patient
	care revenue.


	 




	 


	 


	Three Months Ended March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 




	Medicine:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Western medicine


	 


	$


	2,013,797


	 


	 


	$


	1,468,236


	 




	Chinese medicine


	 


	 


	427,059


	 


	 


	 


	387,467


	 




	Herbal medicine


	 


	 


	87,219


	 


	 


	 


	69,972


	 




	Total medicine


	 


	$


	2,528,075


	 


	 


	$


	1,925,675


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Patient services:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Medical consulting


	 


	$


	1,605,924


	 


	 


	$


	1,324,109


	 




	Medical treatment


	 


	 


	1,370,479


	 


	 


	 


	1,152,292


	 




	Others


	 


	 


	6,334


	 


	 


	 


	6,555


	 




	Total patient services


	 


	$


	2,982,737


	 


	 


	$


	2,482,956


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	$


	5,510,812


	 


	 


	$


	4,408,631


	 






	 







	 


	F-

	14



	 







	 





	 




	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 



	NOTE 12. Income Tax Expense



	 


	The Company uses the asset-liability method
	of accounting for income taxes prescribed by ASC 740 Income Taxes. The Company and its subsidiaries each files their taxes individually.


	 



	United States



	 


	JHCC is subject to the United States of
	America Tax law at tax rate of 34%. No provision for the US federal income taxes has been made as the Company had no US taxable
	income for the periods presented, and its earnings are permanently invested in PRC.


	 



	BVI



	 


	JHCL was incorporated in the BVI and, under
	the current laws of the BVI, it is not subject to income tax.


	 



	Hong Kong



	 


	Runteng was incorporated in Hong Kong
	and is subject to Hong Kong profits tax. Runteng is subject to Hong Kong taxation on its activities conducted in Hong Kong and
	income arising in or derived from Hong Kong. The applicable statutory tax rate is 16.5%.


	 



	PRC



	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt
	from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions, mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income tax of $919 and
	$864 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively to support the local tax bureau's economical obligations.


	 



	NOTE 13. Related Party Transactions



	 


	The following is the list of the related
	parties to which the Group has transactions with:


	 


	(a) Junsheng Zhang, the Chairman of the
	Company


	(b) Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development
	Co., Ltd (“Baiyi”), owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(c) Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine Wholesale
	Co., Ltd owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(d) Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy Co., Limited
	owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(e) Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical
	Equipment Company Limited owned by Junsheng Zhang


	(f) Jiarun Super Market Co., Ltd. owned
	by Junsheng Zhang


	(g) Harbin Qi-run pharmacy limited owned
	by Junsheng Zhang


	(h) Yanhua Xing and Weiguang Song, the
	former shareholder of JHCL



	 





	Amount due from related parties





	 



	Amount due from related parties consisted
	of the following as of the periods indicated: 


	 






	 


	 


	March 31,


	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	Name of related parties


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd,


	 


	$


	4,358,193


	 


	 


	$


	1,754,987


	 




	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	46,500


	 


	 


	 


	46,500


	 




	Yanhua Xing


	 


	 


	2,450


	 


	 


	 


	2,450


	 




	Weiguang Song


	 


	 


	1,050


	 


	 


	 


	1,050


	 




	 


	 


	$


	4,408,193


	 


	 


	$


	1,804,987


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 











	 


	F-

	15



	 







	 




	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 



	NOTE 13. Related Party Transactions
	(Continued)



	 


	Amount due from Baiyi was mainly represented
	the deposit for the new outpatient building which was constructed by Baiyi. The Company signed a purchase agreement with Baiyi
	to acquire the first to eighth floor of a building which is under construction by Baiyi. The total amount for the purchased property
	is approximately RMB63,900,000 ($9,579,894). The Company had paid a deposit of RMB10,000,000 ($1,451,136) was paid in 2016, and
	paid a prepayment approximately RMB10,000,000($1,451,136) for decoration for the new outpatient building, and paid a prepayment
	approximately RMB7,000,000($1,015,795) for rental payments of 2017.


	 


	Amount due from Junsheng Zhang, Yanhua
	Xing and Weiguang Song, who are the prior shareholders of JHCL, was mainly for the paid-in capital to be paid.


	 




	Amount due to related parties




	 


	Amount due to related parties consisted
	of the following as of the periods indicated: 


	 






	 


	 


	March 31,


	 


	 


	December 31,


	 




	Name of related parties


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	$


	57,005


	 


	 


	$


	-


	 




	Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical Equipment Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	14,752


	 


	 


	 


	18,382


	 




	Harbin Qi-run pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	6,947


	 




	Junsheng Zhang


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	$


	121,757


	 


	 


	$


	25,329


	 





	 


	Amount due to Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy
	Co., Ltd., Harbin Qi-run pharmacy Co., Ltd and Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical Equipment Company Limited were mainly for the
	balance for purchase of medicine and medical material from these four companies.


	  


	Amounts due to Junsheng Zhang represented
	the balance paid by Mr. Zhang for the daily operation of the Company.


	 




	Related parties’ transactions




	 


	Purchase of medicine and medical material
	from related parties consisted of the following for the periods indicated:


	 






	 


	 



	For three months ended March 31,



	 





	Name of related parties



	 



	2017



	 


	 



	2016



	 




	Heilongjiang Dahua Medicine Wholesale Co., Ltd


	 


	$


	 


	 


	 


	$


	425,928


	 




	Harbin Jiarun Pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	57,022


	 


	 


	 


	40,985


	 




	Heilongjiang Province Runjia Medical Equipment Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	32,498


	 




	Harbin Qi-run pharmacy Co., Ltd


	 


	 


	12,887


	 


	 


	 


	2,637


	 





	 


	 



	$




	69,909



	 


	 



	$




	502,048



	 




	 




	Deposits for
	capital leases and Capital lease obligations




	 


	On June 5, 2013, Jiarun entered into a
	Lease Agreement to lease a new hospital building from Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd, which is owned by Junsheng
	Zhang, a related party. As of March 31, 2017, the company has balance of deposits for capital leases and capital lease obligations
	of $435,341 and $13,197,472 respectively. As of December 31, 2016, the Company has balance of deposits for capital leases and capital
	lease obligations of $431,980 and $13,896,989 respectively.


	 






	 


	F-

	16



	 







	 




	 



	JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION




	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	(AMOUNTS IN USD)



	 



	NOTE 14.  Basic and Diluted Earnings Per Share



	 


	Basic net income per share is computed
	using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the period. Diluted net income per share is computed using
	the weighted average number of common shares and, if dilutive, potential common shares outstanding during the period. Potential
	common shares comprise shares issuable upon the exercise of share based awards, using the treasury stock method. The reconciliation
	of the numerators and denominators of the basic and diluted earnings per share computations for income from continuing operations
	is shown as follows: 


	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 


	 


	(Unaudited)


	 




	Numerator:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income available to common stockholders


	 


	$


	1,111,491


	 


	 


	$


	940,301


	 




	Denominator:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and diluted weighted-average number of shares outstanding


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 


	 


	 


	13,915,000


	 




	Net income per share:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and diluted


	 


	$


	0.0799


	 


	 


	$


	0.0676


	 





	 



	NOTE 15. Contingencies and Commitment



	  


	There was no contingency as of March 31,
	2017 and December 31, 2016.


	 





	NOTE 16. Subsequent Events



	 


	The Management of the Company determined that there were no
	reportable subsequent events to be disclosed.


	 






	 


	F-

	17



	 










	 




	 









	ITEM 2. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION
	AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS



	 


	The following discussion and analysis of
	our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our consolidated financial statements and the notes thereto included
	elsewhere in this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted
	in the United States. The preparation of such financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the
	reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. On an ongoing basis, we evaluate these estimates, including those
	related to useful lives of real estate assets, bad debts, impairment, contingencies and litigation. We base our estimates on historical
	experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form
	the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources.
	There can be no assurance that actual results will not differ from those estimates. The analysis set forth below is provided pursuant
	to applicable SEC regulations and is not intended to serve as a basis for projections of future events. See “Cautionary Statement
	Regarding Forward Looking Statements” above.


	 



	Overview



	 


	Harbin Jiarun Hospital Company Limited
	(“Jiarun”) was established in Harbin in the Province of Heilongjiang of the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
	by the owner Junsheng Zhang on February 17, 2006.


	 


	Jiarun is a private hospital serving patients
	on a municipal and county level and providing both Western and Chinese medical practices to the residents of Harbin. Jiarun specializes
	in the areas of Pediatrics, Dermatology, ENT, Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM), Ophthalmology, Internal Medicine Dentistry, General
	Surgery, Rehabilitation Science, Gynecology, General Medical Services, etc.


	 


	On November 20, 2013, Junsheng Zhang, the
	officer of Jiarun Hospital established JRSIS Health Care Corporation, a Florida corporation (“JHCC” or the “Company”).
	On February 25, 2013, the officer of Jiarun Hospital established JRSIS Health Care Limited ("JHCL"), a wholly owned subsidiary
	of the Company, and On September 17, 2012, the officer of Jiarun Hospital established Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”),
	a wholly owned subsidiary of JHCL. Runteng, a Hong Kong registered Investment Company, holds a 70% ownership interest in Harbin
	Jiarun Hospital Company Ltd, a Heilongjiang registered company.


	 


	On December 20, 2013, the Company acquired
	100% of the issued and outstanding capital stock of JRSIS Health Care Limited, a privately held Limited Liability Company registered
	in the British Virgin Islands for 12,000,000 shares of our common stock. JHCL, through its wholly owned subsidiary, Runteng Medical
	Group Co., Ltd, holds majority ownership in Jiarun, a company duly incorporated, organized and validly existing under the laws
	of China. As the parent company, JHCC rely on Jiarun to conduct 100% of our businesses and operations.


	 


	We have two sources of patient revenues:
	in-patient service revenues and out-patient service revenues. In addition to provide services to our patients, we also sell pharmaceutical
	medicines to our patients. Revenues from such sales are included in either our in-patient service revenues or our out-patient service
	revenues. Our revenues come from individuals as well as third-party payers, including PRC government programs and insurance providers,
	under which the hospital is paid based upon local government established charges. Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine. Patient service revenue is recognized when it is both earned and
	realized. The Company’s policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has been provided to the
	patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	 



	Plan of Operation



	 


	Over the next twelve months, we will concentrate on the following
	two areas to grow our operations:


	 




	 


	●


	Capital and Funding – Seek to obtain capital from all available sources to complete our hospital expansion and acquisition targets.




	 




	 


	●


	Advertising and Marketing – Work with several marketing companies to develop brand identity, marketing materials, and update our web site. Utilize all available marketing venues and public relations opportunities to promote the Company and its medicine and services. In April, 2014, we also bought a mobile clinic to provide free health examinations in the hospital area. Management believes this free service will bring us much higher brand reputation and potential customers locally.




	 








	 



	4



	 







	 






	 



	Critical Accounting Policies and Management
	Estimates



	 


	Our discussion and analysis of our financial
	condition and results of operations relates to our consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with
	the United States generally accepted accounting principles ("U.S. GAAP"). The consolidated financial statements include
	the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All significant inter-company accounts and transactions have been eliminated
	in consolidation.


	 



	Principles of consolidation




	 



	The consolidated financial statements include
	the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All significant inter-company accounts and transactions have been eliminated
	in consolidation.


	  



	Use of estimates



	 


	The preparation of unaudited consolidated
	financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported
	amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and
	the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. Management makes these estimates using the best information
	available at the time the estimates are made; however actual results could differ from those estimates. Significant items subject
	to such estimates and assumptions include valuation allowances for receivables and recoverability of carrying amount and the estimated
	useful lives of long-lived assets. These estimates are often based on complex judgments and assumptions that management believes
	to be reasonable but are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Actual results could differ from these estimates.


	 



	Revenue Recognition




	 



	The Company recognizes revenue when the
	amount of revenue can be reliably measured, it is probable that economic benefits will flow to the entity and specific criteria
	have been met for each of the Company's activities as described below.


	 


	Medicine sales


	 


	Revenue from the sale of medicine is recognized
	when it is both earned and realized. The Company's policy is to recognize the sale of medicine when the title of the medicine,
	ownership and risk of loss have transferred to the purchasers, and collection of the sales proceeds is reasonably assured, all
	of which generally occur when the patient receives the medicine.


	 


	Given the nature of this revenue source
	of the Company's business and the applicable rules guiding revenue recognition, the revenue recognition practices for the sale
	of medicine do not contain estimates that materially affect results of operations nor any policy for return of products.


	 


	Patient Services


	 


	In accordance with the medical licenses
	of Jiarun, the approved medical patient service scope of the Company includes medical consulting, surgery, obstetrics and gynecology,
	pediatrics, anesthesia, clinic laboratory, medical imaging, and traditional Chinese medicine, etc.


	 


	Patient service revenue is recognized when
	it is both earned and realized. The Company's policy is to recognize patient service revenue when the medical service has been
	provided to the patient and collection of the revenue is reasonably assured.


	 


	The Company provides services to both patients
	covered by social insurance and patients who are not covered by social insurance. The Company charges the same rates for patient
	services regardless of the coverage by social insurance.


	 


	Patients who are not covered by social
	insurance are liable for the total cost of medical treatment.


	 




	 



	l



	For out-patient medical services, revenue is recognized when the Company provides medical service to the patient. The Company collects payment when the patient checks out from the hospital, which is the same day the services are provided




	 




	 



	l



	For in-patient medical services, the Company estimates the approximate fee the patients will spend in the hospital based on patients' symptom. This is when the patients check in to the hospital. At that time, the Company collects the estimated fees from the patient and records the payment as deposits received.




	 


	During the in-patient services period,
	the Company recognizes revenue when the patient service is provided and deducts the cost of service from the deposit received.
	The Company records these transactions based on daily reports generated by the respective medical department. When medical services
	exceed patient deposits received the Company records revenue and accounts receivable when the patient services are provided.


	 


	When patients check out from the hospital,
	the Company calculates and determines the remaining deposit, if any, and refunds the unused portion of the deposit to the patients.
	In the case where the patients have a balance in accounts receivable during the in-patient period, accounts receivable are required
	to be paid in full at checkout.


	 








	 



	5



	 







	 






	 


	Patients covered by social insurance will
	receive a portion or full medical services reimbursed or paid by the social insurance agencies via prepaid cards or insurance claim
	settlement process.



	 





	Settlement process




	 


	The Company is a registered medical service
	vendor under the state social insurance system for various social insurance agencies; the insurance agencies include “Social
	Medical Insurance funded by PRC and Heilongjiang Province” and “Heilongjiang Province New Rural Cooperative Medical
	Care System”. The Company utilizes an online system maintained by the social insurance agencies for patients’ who are
	covered by social insurance agencies.


	 




	 



	l



	The Company records patients’ information in the social insurance system at check in. The system determines the covered portion and amounts based on the information input to the system.




	 




	 



	l



	At the time of check out, the Company collects payment for services the patients are liable for and records accounts receivable from the social insurance agencies for the portion of services covered by the social insurances. In the case that the patients have made payment during the in-patient services period, the Company refunds any amount in excess of the portion they are liable for.




	 




	 



	l



	The Company is responsible for submitting supporting documents of patient services provided to the social insurance agencies for their review. The Company also requires reconciling its records with the social insurance agencies once a month. Once the social insurance agencies approve the reconciliation, the insurance agencies will settle the accounts receivable balance in the next month following the approval.




	 



	Income Taxes and Uncertain Tax Positions



	 


	The Company adopts FASB ASC Topic 740,
	"Income Taxes," which requires the recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences
	of events that have been included in the financial statements or tax returns. Under this method, deferred income taxes are recognized
	for the tax consequences in future years of differences between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and their financial reporting
	amounts at each period end based on enacted tax laws and statutory tax rates applicable to the periods in which the differences
	are expected to affect taxable income. Valuation allowances are established, when necessary, to reduce deferred tax assets to the
	amount expected to be realized.


	 


	In July 2006, the FASB issued FIN 48(ASC
	740-10), Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes-An Interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109 (ASC 740), which requires income
	tax positions to meet a more-likely-than-not recognition threshold to be recognized in the financial statements. Under FIN 48(ASC
	740-10), tax positions that previously failed to meet the more-likely-than-not threshold should be recognized in the first subsequent
	financial reporting period in which that threshold is met. Previously recognized tax positions that no longer meet the more-likely-than-not
	threshold should be derecognized in the first subsequent financial reporting period in which that threshold is no longer met.


	 


	The application of tax laws and regulations
	is subject to legal and factual interpretation, judgment and uncertainty. Tax laws and regulations themselves are subject to change
	as a result of changes in fiscal policy, changes in legislation, the evolution of regulations and court rulings. Therefore, the
	actual liability may be materially different from our estimates, which could result in the need to record additional tax liabilities
	or potentially reverse previously recorded tax liabilities or deferred tax asset valuation allowance.


	 


	As a result of the implementation of FIN
	48 (ASC 740-10), the company made a comprehensive review of its portfolio of tax positions in accordance with recognition standards
	established by FIN 48 (ASC 740-10). The Company recognized no material adjustments to liabilities or shareholder's equity as a
	result of the implementation. The adoption of FIN 48 did not have a material impact on the Company's unaudited consolidated financial
	statements.


	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC, income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt
	from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions, mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.


	 


	In considering the achievement of the hospital,
	it could not have been done without the support of local authorities, Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income tax of $919 and
	$864 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively to support the local tax bureau's economical obligations.


	 








	 



	6



	 







	 




	 



	Accounts Receivable



	 


	Accounts receivable are recorded at net
	realizable value consisting of the carrying amount less an allowance for uncollectible accounts as needed. The allowance for doubtful
	accounts is the Company's best estimate of the amount of probable credit losses in the Company's existing accounts receivable.
	The Company determines the allowance based on aging data, historical collection experience, customer specific facts and economic
	conditions. Account balances are charged off against the allowance after all means of collection have been exhausted and the potential
	for recovery is considered remote


	 



	Property and equipment



	 


	Property and equipment are stated at cost.
	Expenditures for maintenance and repairs are charged to operations when incurred, while additions and betterments are capitalized.
	Depreciation is recorded on a straight-line basis reflective of the useful lives of the assets. When assets are retired or disposed,
	the asset's original cost and related accumulated depreciation are eliminated from accounts and any gain or loss is reflected in
	income.


	 






	Buildings and improvement


	 


	10-40 years




	Medical equipment


	 


	5-15 years




	Transportation instrument


	 


	5-10 years




	Office equipment


	 


	5-10 years




	Electronic equipment


	 


	5-10 years




	Software


	 


	5-10 years





	 



	Foreign currency transactions and translations



	 


	JHCC and JHCL’s functional currency
	is the United States dollar ("US$"). Runteng's functional currency is the Hong Kong dollar ("HK$"). The functional
	currency of Jiarun is the Renminbi ("RMB").


	 


	The Company’s reporting currency
	is US$. Assets and liabilities of Runteng and Jiarun are translated at the current exchange rate at the balance sheet dates, revenues
	and expenses are translated at the average exchange rates during the reporting periods, and equity accounts are translated at historical
	rates. Translation adjustments are reported in other comprehensive income.


	 





	Results of Operations for Three Months
	Ended March 31, 2017 and 2016  



	 


	The following table shows key components of the results of operations during three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016: 


	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended 

	March 31,


	 


	 


	Change


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	$


	 


	 


	%


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 Revenue:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Medicine


	 


	$


	2,528,075


	 


	 


	$


	1,925,675


	 


	 


	$


	602,400


	 


	 


	 


	31


	%




	Patient services


	 


	 


	2,982,737


	 


	 


	 


	2,482,956


	 


	 


	 


	499,781


	 


	 


	 


	20


	%




	Total revenue


	 


	 


	5,510,812


	 


	 


	 


	4,408,631


	 


	 


	 


	1,102,181


	 


	 


	 


	25


	%




	Operating costs and expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of medicine sold


	 


	 


	1,650,466


	 


	 


	 


	1,106,181


	 


	 


	 


	544,285


	 


	 


	 


	49


	%




	Medical consumables


	 


	 


	558,302


	 


	 


	 


	389,760


	 


	 


	 


	168,542


	 


	 


	 


	43


	%




	Salaries and benefits


	 


	 


	814,366


	 


	 


	 


	682,590


	 


	 


	 


	131,776


	 


	 


	 


	19


	%




	Office supplies


	 


	 


	119,302


	 


	 


	 


	81,806


	 


	 


	 


	37,496


	 


	 


	 


	46


	%




	Vehicle expenses


	 


	 


	21,480


	 


	 


	 


	9,571


	 


	 


	 


	11,909


	 


	 


	 


	124


	%




	Utilities expenses


	 


	 


	147,887


	 


	 


	 


	146,107


	 


	 


	 


	1,780


	 


	 


	 


	1


	%




	Advertising and promotion expenses


	 


	 


	614


	 


	 


	 


	43,921


	 


	 


	 


	(43,307


	)


	 


	 


	(99


	%)




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	289,939


	 


	 


	 


	343,818


	 


	 


	 


	(53,879


	)


	 


	 


	(16


	%)




	Professional fee


	 


	 


	13,762


	 


	 


	 


	4,423


	 


	 


	 


	9,339


	 


	 


	 


	211


	%




	Depreciation


	 


	 


	303,001


	 


	 


	 


	240,285


	 


	 


	 


	62,716


	 


	 


	 


	26


	%




	Total operating costs and expenses


	 


	 


	3,919,119


	 


	 


	 


	3,048,462


	 


	 


	 


	870,657


	 


	 


	 


	29


	%




	Earnings from operations before other income and income taxes


	 


	 


	1,591,693


	 


	 


	 


	1,360,169


	 


	 


	 


	231,524


	 


	 


	 


	17


	%




	Other (expenses) income


	 


	 


	(2,930


	)


	 


	 


	1,269


	 


	 


	 


	4,199


	 


	 


	 


	(331


	%)




	Earnings from operations before income taxes


	 


	 


	1,588,763


	 


	 


	 


	1,361,438


	 


	 


	 


	227,325


	 


	 


	 


	17


	%




	Income tax


	 


	 


	919


	 


	 


	 


	864


	 


	 


	 


	55


	 


	 


	 


	6


	%




	Net income


	 


	 


	1,587,844


	 


	 


	 


	1,360,574


	 


	 


	 


	227,270


	 


	 


	 


	17


	%




	Less: net income attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	476,353


	 


	 


	 


	420,273


	 


	 


	 


	56,080


	 


	 


	 


	13


	%




	Net income attributable to the Company


	 


	$


	1,111,491


	 


	 


	$


	940,301


	 


	 


	$


	171,190


	 


	 


	 


	18


	%




	Comprehensive income:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Foreign currency translation adjustment attributable to non-controlling interests


	 


	 


	28,360


	 


	 


	 


	21,262


	 


	 


	 


	7,098


	 


	 


	 


	33


	%




	Foreign currency translation adjustment attributable to the Company


	 


	 


	18,413


	 


	 


	 


	30,496


	 


	 


	 


	(12,083


	)


	 


	 


	(40


	%)




	Comprehensive income


	 


	$


	1,634,617


	 


	 


	$


	1,412,332


	 


	 


	$


	222,285


	 


	 


	 


	16


	%







	 


	 






	 



	7



	 







	 









	 




	Revenue



	 


	Operating revenue for the three months
	ended March 31, 2017, which resulted primarily from medicine revenue and patient services revenue, was $5,510,812, an increase
	of 25% as compared with the operating revenue of $4,408,631 for the three months ended March 31, 2016. The increase was primarily
	a result of the number of treated inpatients growing to 4,398 patients, about 644 more than the 3,754 patients treated in three
	months ended March 31, 2016.


	 



	Costs and Expenses



	 


	Total costs and expenses were $3,919,119
	for the three months ended March 31, 2017, an increase of $870,657 or 29% as compared to $3,048,462 for the same period of 2016.
	This increase was primarily due to significant increase of cost of medicine sold of $544,285, office supplies of $37,496, medical
	consumables of $168,542, salaries and benefits of $131,776 and depreciation of $62,716.


	 



	Cost of medicine sold




	 



	Cost of medicine sold mainly consists of cost
	of Western medicine, Chinese medicine and herbal medicine. Total cost of medicine sold was $1,650,466 for the three months ended
	March 31, 2017, an increase of $544,285 or 49% as compared to $1,106,181 for the same period of 2016.This increase was primarily
	due to significant increases in sales of Western medicine and Chinese medicine. For the three months ended March 31, 2017, the
	cost of Western medicine and Chinese medicine were $1,608,322, as compared to $1,075,215 for the same period of 2016.


	 



	Medical consumables




	 



	Medical consumables mainly consist of materials
	expenses, medical film expenses and test reagent. Total medical consumables were $558,302 for the three months ended March 31,
	2017, an increase of $168,542 or 43% as compared to $389,760 for the same period of 2016.The increase was mainly a result of increase
	in materials expenses of $103,689.



	 




	Salaries and benefits




	 



	Salaries and benefits mainly consist of
	salary expenses, and social insurance expenses. Total salaries and benefits were $814,366 for the three months ended March 31,
	2017, an increase of $131,776 or 19% as compared to $682,590 for the same period of 2016. The increase was mainly a result of increase
	in salary expenses of $116,820 and increase in social insurance expenses of $14,969. The number of employees was 557, an increase
	of 89 as compared to 468 for the same period of 2016.


	 



	Income Taxes



	 


	Enterprise income tax is defined under
	the Provisional Regulations of PRC Concerning Income Tax on Enterprises promulgated by the PRC. Income tax is payable by enterprises
	at a rate of 25% of their taxable income.


	 


	Jiarun's medical services have been exempt
	from enterprise income tax since March 1, 2006, which has been approved by the Local Taxation Bureau.


	 


	Jiarun was incorporated in accordance with
	the law of medical and health institutions to mainly provide medical services, with the "PRC Business Tax Tentative Regulations"
	Article 8 (3) medical service income tax-free provisions (hospital, clinics and other medical institutions to provide medical services
	shall be exempt from business tax). The Company's medical services have been exempted from business tax since March 1, 2006.  


	 


	In considering the achievements of the
	hospital, they could not have been reached without the support of local authorities. Jiarun hospital has voluntarily paid income
	tax of $919 and $864 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively to support the local tax bureau's economical
	obligations.


	 



	Income from Operations and Net income



	 


	Income from Operations was $1,591,693 for the three months ended March 31, 2017, as compared with operating
	income of $1,360,169 for the three months ended March 31, 2016.The Company’s net income for the three months ended March
	31, 2017 was $1,587,844 representing an increase of $227,270 or 17 %, over $1,360,574 for the three months ended March 31, 2016.
	The increases in income from operations and net income for the three months ended March 31, 2017 were primarily due to aforementioned
	changes in operating revenue and operating expenses




	 








	 



	8



	 







	 




	 



	Liquidity and Capital Resources



	 


	The accompanying financial statements have
	been prepared for the company to continue as a going concern which contemplates, among other things, the realization of assets
	and satisfaction of liabilities in the ordinary course of business.


	 


	As of March 31, 2017, the Company had $245,387
	of cash and cash equivalents. 


	  


	We are presently able to meet our obligations
	as they come due. As of March 31, 2017, we had non-controlling interest of $5,557,232 and shareholders’ equity of $7,764,239.


	 


	We anticipate that our future liquidity
	requirements will arise from the need to fund our growth, pay current obligations and future capital expenditures. The primary
	sources of funding for such requirements are expected to be cash generated from operations and raising additional funds from the
	public offering and/or debt financing. However, we can provide no assurances that we will be able to generate sufficient cash flow
	from operations and/or obtain additional financing on terms satisfactory to us, if at all, to remain a going concern.


	 


	 





	Cash Flows and Capital Resources

	 


	 


	We believe that we will generate cash flow
	from our business, which, along with our available cash, will provide sufficient liquidity and financial flexibility. Our cash
	flows are summarized below: 




	 


	 



	Three Months Ended March 31,



	 




	 


	 



	2017



	 


	 



	2016



	 




	Net cash provided by operating activities


	 


	 


	215,967


	 


	 


	 


	1,354,162


	 




	Net cash used in investing activities


	 


	 


	(591,799)


	 


	 


	 


	(1,183,264)


	 




	Net cash used in (provided by) financing activities


	 


	 


	(272,425)


	 


	 


	 


	(101,388)


	 




	Effect of exchange rate fluctuation on cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	2,982


	 


	 


	 


	(7,620)


	 




	Net (increase) decrease in cash and cash equivalents


	 


	 


	(645,275)


	 


	 


	 


	61,890


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period


	 


	 


	890,662


	 


	 


	 


	352,153


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents, ending of period


	 


	$


	245,387


	 


	 


	$


	414,043


	 





	  



	Net Cash provided by Operating Activities



	 


	For the three months ended March 31, 2017,
	we had positive cash flow from operating activities of $215,967, a decrease of $1,138,195 from the same period of 2016, during
	which we had cash flow from operating activities of $1,354,162. The net income for the three months ended March 31, 2017 increased
	by $227,270 as compared to the three months ended March 31, 2016. The decrease in net cash used in operating activities was mainly
	as a result of the increase of amounts due from related parties items totaling $2,509,555, which was due to the increase in the
	deposit and the prepayment for decoration for the new outpatient building.


	 


	 

	Net Cash Used in Investing Activities




	 



	Net cash used in investing activities for
	the three months ended March 31, 2017 was $591,799, compared to net cash used in investing activities of $1,183,264 for the three
	months ended March 31, 2016. The cash used in investing activities for the three months ended March 31, 2017 was mainly used for
	the purchase of medical equipment.


	 



	Net Cash Provided by Financing Activities




	 



	Net cash used in financing activities for
	the three months ended March 31, 2017 was $272,425, as compared to net cash used in financing activities of $101,388 for the three
	months ended March 31, 2016. The cash used in financing activities for the three months ended March 31, 2017 was mainly provided
	by proceeds from a short-term bank loan of $406,934 and used in payments on capital lease obligation of $679,359.


	 








	 



	9



	 







	 






	  



	Trends, Events and Uncertainties



	 


	The China Ministry of Health, as well as
	other related agencies, may change the prices we can charge for medical services, drugs and medications. We cannot predict the
	impact of these proposed changes since the changes are not fully defined and we do not know whether such changes will ever be implemented
	or when they may take effect.


	 


	In December 2014, our operations moved
	into the new building. We have finished most of the decoration of the new building, and part of the expansion of medical facilities
	and purchases of new medical equipment. The hospital will need more medical facilities to update the medical equipment and acquire
	one pharmaceuticals wholesale and one medicine retail company. The new hospital building is being constructed by Harbin Baiyi Real
	Estate Development Co., Ltd, which is owned by Junsheng Zhang, a related party. The building was leased from the related party
	by financial leasing. The price of the Leasing Agreement referred to the local market price and audited by the auditor. The Leasing
	Agreement terms consist of 30 payments. Each payment will be made on an annual basis when 7 million RMB per payment will be paid
	upfront for each leasing period. The first payment was made on September 1

	st

	, 2014. At the end of the leasing period,
	a final payment will be made to settle the total leasing amount. Both parties agreed for the leasee to pay 3 million RMB as deposit
	at the execution of the Leasing Agreement, which will be deducted from the final rental settlement. The lending interest rate was
	calculated at 6.55%, which is the benchmark interest rate announced from The People’s Bank of China. After the completion
	of all payments, the ownership of the lease item will be transferred to the Jiarun.


	 


	We plan to acquire other hospitals and
	companies involved in the healthcare industry in the PRC using cash and shares of our common stock. Substantial capital may be
	needed for these acquisitions and we may need to raise additional funds through the sale of our common stock, debt financing or
	other arrangements. We do not have any commitments or arrangements from any person to provide us with any additional capital. Additional
	capital may not be available to us, or if available, on acceptable terms, in which case we would not be able to acquire other hospitals
	or businesses in the healthcare industry.


	 


	Other than the factors listed above we
	do not know of any trends, events or uncertainties that have had or are reasonably expected to have a material impact on our net
	sales or revenues or income from continuing operations. Our business is not seasonal in nature.


	 



	Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements



	 


	We do not have any off-balance sheet items reasonably likely
	to have a material effect on our financial condition.


	 



	Recent Accounting
	Pronouncements



	 


	Recent accounting pronouncements issued by the FASB, the AICPA
	and the SEC did not, or are not believed by management to, have a material effect on the Company’s present or future
	consolidated financial statements.



	 

	 












	ITEM 3.




	QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET
	RISK





	 


	As a “smaller reporting company”,
	we are not required to provide the information required by this Item.



	 











	ITEM 4.




	CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES





	 




	Evaluations of Disclosure Controls and Procedures




	 


	Under the supervision and with the participation
	of our management team, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, we conducted an evaluation of our disclosure
	controls and procedures, as such term is defined under Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) promulgated under the Securities Exchange
	Act of 1934, as amended, as of December 31, 2004. Based on this evaluation, we concluded that our disclosure controls and
	procedures are effective in timely alerting them to material information required to be included in our periodic reports.


	 




	Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting




	 


	During the period covered by this report, there has been no
	change in our internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected or is reasonably likely to materially affect
	our internal control over financial reporting.


	 








	 



	10



	 









	 




	  







	PART II – OTHER INFORMATION



	 











	ITEM 1.




	LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.





	 


	The Company has no knowledge of existing
	or pending legal proceedings against the Company, nor is the Company involved as a plaintiff in any proceeding or pending litigation.
	There are no proceedings in which any of the Company’s directors, officers or any of their respective affiliates, or any
	beneficial stockholder, is an adverse party or has a material interest adverse to our interest.



	 











	ITEM 1A.




	RISK FACTORS





	 


	As a “smaller reporting company”,
	we are not required to provide the information required by this Item.



	 











	ITEM 2.




	UNREGISTERED SALE OF EQUITY SECURITIES AND USE OF
	PROCEEDS





	 


	We did not sell or issue any shares of
	unregistered securities during the three month period ended March 31, 2017.




	 












	ITEM 3.




	DEFAULTS UPON SENIOR SECURITIES





	 


	Not applicable



	 













	ITEM 4.




	OTHER INFORMATION






	 



	Not applicable


	 









	ITEM 5.




	EXHIBITS







	 




	 

	INDEX
	TO EXHIBITS



	 







	Exhibit



	 



	Description





	31.1


	 


	Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Securities Exchange Act Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a), as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002




	31.2


	 


	Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Securities Exchange Act Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a), as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002




	32.1


	 


	Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002




	32.2


	 


	Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002




	101.INS


	 


	XBRL Instance Document




	101.SCH


	 


	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document




	101.CAL


	 


	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document




	101.DEF


	 


	XBRL Definition Linkbase Document




	101.LAB


	 


	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document




	101.PRE


	 


	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document





	 


	 






	 



	11



	 








	 







	 








	SIGNATURES



	 


	In accordance
	with Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, the registrant caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned,
	thereunto duly authorized.


	 



	JRSIS HEALTH
	CARE CORPORATION. (Registrant)



	 




	Signature


	 


	Title


	 


	Date




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	/s/ Lihua. Sun


	 



	Chief Executive Officer





	 


	May 15, 2017




	 Lihua. Sun


	 


	(Principal Executive Officer)


	 


	 





	 





	 


	 


	 


	 




	/s/ Xuewei. Zhang


	 



	Chief Financial Officer





	 


	May 15, 2017




	 Xuewei. Zhang


	 


	(Principal Financial Officer)


	 


	 




	 






	 



	12



	 


















	EXHIBIT 31.1



	 





	Certification
	of Principal Executive Officer




	Section 302
	Certification



	 


	I,
	Lihua.Sun, certify that:


	 


	1.           I
	have reviewed this quarterly report on Form 10-Q for JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION.


	 


	2.           Based
	on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary
	to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to
	the period covered by this report;


	 


	3.           Based
	on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material
	respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented
	in this report;


	 


	4.           The
	registrant’s other certifying officer and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures
	(as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and the internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange
	Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	(a)           Designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision,
	to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	(b)           Designed
	such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our
	supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	(c)           Evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about
	the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and


	 


	(d)           Disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s
	most recent fiscal quarter (the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected,
	or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and


	 


	5.           The
	registrant’s other certifying officer and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over
	financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (or
	persons performing the equivalent functions):


	 


	(a)           All
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which
	are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information;
	and


	 


	(b)           Any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s
	internal control over financial reporting.


	 


	 




	Date:


	May 15, 2017


	 


	/s/ Lihua. Sun




	 


	 


	 



	Lihua. Sun, Chief Executive Officer


	(Principal Executive Officer)






	 




	 















	EXHIBIT 31.2



	 





	Certification
	of Principal Financial Officer




	Section 302
	Certification



	 


	I,
	Xuewei. Zhang, certify that:


	 


	1.           I
	have reviewed this quarterly report on Form 10-Q of JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORPORATION;


	 


	2.           Based
	on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary
	to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to
	the period covered by this report;


	 


	3.           Based
	on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material
	respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented
	in this report;


	 


	4.           The
	registrant’s other certifying officer and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures
	(as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and the internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange
	Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	(a)           Designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision,
	to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	(b)           Designed
	such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our
	supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	 (c)           Evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about
	the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and


	 


	(d)           Disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s
	most recent fiscal quarter (the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected,
	or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and


	 


	5.           The
	registrant’s other certifying officer and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over
	financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (or
	persons performing the equivalent functions):


	 


	(a)           All
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which
	are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information;
	and


	 


	(b)           Any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s
	internal control over financial reporting.


	 


	 




	Date:


	May 15, 2017


	 


	/s/ Xuewei. Zhang




	 


	 


	 



	Xuewei. Zhang, Chief Executive Officer


	(Principal Financial Officer)






	 


	 




	 















	EXHIBIT 32.1



	 





	CERTIFICATIONS
	PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906
	OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection with the Quarterly Report of JRSIS HEALTH CARE
	CORPORATION. (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, as filed with the Securities and Exchange
	Commission on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Lihua. Sun, as Chief Executive Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant
	to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that:


	 




	 


	1.


	The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and




	 




	 


	2.


	The information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and result of operations of the Company.




	 




	 


	 




	By:


	/s/ Lihua. Sun


	Dated:  


	May 15, 2017




	 


	Lihua. Sun


	 


	 




	Title:



	Chief Executive Officer


	(Principal Executive Officer)





	 


	 


	This
	certification is being furnished to the SEC as an exhibit to the Report pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act
	of 2002 and shall not, except to the extent required by the of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, be deemed filed by the Company for
	purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.


	 


	A
	signed copy of this written statement required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 has been provided by the Company
	and will be retained by the Company and furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission or its staff upon request.



	 


	 




	 




	 











	EXHIBIT 32.2



	 





	CERTIFICATIONS
	PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906
	OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection with the Quarterly Report of JRSIS HEALTH CARE
	CORPORATION. (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, as filed with the Securities and Exchange
	Commission on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Xuewei. Zhang, as Chief Financial Officer of the Company, certify,
	pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that:


	 




	 


	1.


	The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and




	 




	 


	2.


	The information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and result of operations of the Company.




	 




	 


	 




	By:


	/s/ Xuewei. Zhang


	Dated:  


	May 15, 2017




	 


	Xuewei. Zhang


	 


	 




	Title:



	Chief Financial Officer


	(Principal Financial Officer)





	 


	 


	This
	certification is being furnished to the SEC as an exhibit to the Report pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act
	of 2002 and shall not, except to the extent required by the of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, be deemed filed by the Company for
	purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.


	 


	A
	signed copy of this written statement required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 has been provided by the Company
	and will be retained by the Company and furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission or its staff upon request.



	 


	 






	 














  JRSS:OTC US Stock Quote - Jrsis Health Care Corp - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Jrsis Health Care Corp   JRSS:US   OTC US        1.73USD   0.00   0.00%     As of 8:10 PM EDT 7/19/2017     Volume   600    Previous Close   1.73    52Wk Range   0.70 - 1.90                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   600    Previous Close   1.73    52Wk Range   0.70 - 1.90    YTD Return   103.53%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   6.19    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   0.28    Market Cap (m USD)   24.073    Shares Outstanding  (m)   13.915    Price/Sales (TTM)   1.25    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -                Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Jrsis Health Care Corporation provides medical services. The Company offers both Western and Chinese medical practices, including pediatrics, dermatology, traditional Chinese medicine, internal medicine dentistry, general surgery, rehabilitation science, and gynecology. Jrsis Health Care serves patients in China.    Address  Xingfu Street, 1st-7th FloorInd & Comm Bank Bldg, Hulan ToHarbin City, 150025China   Phone  86-135-1001-6379   Website   www.jhcc.cn     Executives Board Members    Junsheng Zhang  Chairman/President    Lihua Sun  Chief Executive Officer    Xuewei Zhang  Chief Financial Officer     Show More         


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














JRSIS Healthcare







phone：86-135.1001.6379. 
contact us
IR team
for investors
中文版|English











About JRSIS


Hospitals


Health Plans


For Physicians


For Employees


History


News









JHCC Announces the fiscal year of 2016 Resultsa.4/23/2016 at the JHCCb.JHCC Announces the fiscal year of 2015 Resultsc.Roadshow Meeting in New Yorkd.JHCC Introductione.JHCC Presentation EN&#8205;&#8205;&#8205;f.JHCC Presentation CNg.JHCC HandbookThe year of 2016 result, at: 10-K, The year of 2015 result, at: 10-K









                            Contact our
                        
                        Investor Relationship Team






                            About our
                        
                        Medical team

                    






                            Read the
                        
                        Latest JRSIS News








                        About our


                        Jiarun Hospital


Jiarun Hospital Established in February 2006, Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd is a privately held, for-profit hospital established in Harbin city of Heilongjiang, China. Jiarun is serving patients on a municipal and county level and providing Read On〉〉





                        About our

                        Health Plan


China’s status as one of the world’s largest market rests mainly on the size of its population, rather than its maturity.The percentage of healthcare expenditure in GDP is estimated to be of below five percent  Read on〉〉








                JRSIS Health Care Corporation |  ©2014 JRSIS Healthcare All rights reserved | mary20116688@163.com
   









    JRSS Options Chain - JRSIS Health Care Corp. Options Chain - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































JRSIS Health Care Corp.

                  OTC: JRSS
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

JRSIS Health Care Corp.



Market closed
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 19, 2017, 5:20 p.m.


JRSS

/quotes/zigman/72068512/delayed


$
1.73




Change

+0.68
+64.76%

Volume
Volume 600
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/72068512/delayed
Previous close

$
			1.05
		


$
				1.73
			
Change

+0.68
+64.76%





Day low
Day high
$1.73
$1.73










52 week low
52 week high

            $0.70
        

            $1.90
        





















No Option Chain found









Related Links

Options Center


Options Screener


Options Expiration Calendar







Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




3:43 AM EDT
July 29, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:34aBREAKINGElon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
12:21aTesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15























































Oral Health - Trusted Health Resources
              


 Live Help

  
Order NowMy CartMy AccountTHP Rewards Club




1 Year Money-Back Guarantee
Order 24/7 1-888-423-7500
International 01-859-277-0000



Oral Health

Bad Breath  Definition Of HalitosisHalitosis is the clinical term for the condition otherwise known as bad breath. Bad breath can cause someone to become self-conscious, inhibit their personal relationships in social and professional settings, or be a sign of an underlying health condition. Bad breath may be evident first thing in the morning or more persistent and ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleBleeding Gums  DefinitionBleeding gums are a signal from your body to let you know that something is wrong. Gums in an unhealthy mouth will typically bleed when brushed along the margin of the gums or during flossing. In some cases gums will also bleed when you’re smiling or doing nothing at all
Bleeding gums are a symptom of ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleCanker Sores  DefinitionWhat are canker sores? Also called aphthous ulcers, canker sores are round or oval sores that
occur in the mouth, usually inside the lip, cheeks, floor of the mouth or on the tongue. They may appear white or red, raw and very tender. Canker sores are different from cold sores as cold sores are due to ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleDenture Pain  DefinitionDenture pain is usually associated with raw, red tissues or yeast infections in the mouth. It may also be due to an improperly fitting denture or a denture that is not worn properly on a regular basis.Causes
Most denture pain is caused by bacteria being present in the mouth, on the denture, and against the roof ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleDry Mouth
DefinitionDry mouth occurs when there is not enough saliva production in the mouth. Salivary production can decrease due to medications, cancer or other pathology, alcohol-containing mouth rinses, medical conditions, illegal drugs or medical treatments – such as radiation therapy. Not only is dry mouth uncomfortable, it can also make teeth more susceptible to decay due ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleGingivitis
What Is Gingivitis?Gingivitis is the inflammation of the gums, thus reflecting the meaning of its name. The root words come from “gingiv” = gingiva (gums) and “itis” = inflammation of.
Gingivitis usually occurs in areas where plaque biofilm has not been adequately removed. Poor or inadequate oral hygiene allows bacteria to congregate at the gumlines, triggering ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleGum Boils
Definition of Gum BoilsGum boils are a generic term that refers to various types of swelling or tissue overgrowth that occurs in the mouth. Gum boils may be fluid filled or made of solid fibrous gum tissue. Color may appear normal or the gum boil area can appear red and raw. 
 Types of Gum Boils
What causes ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleGum Disease   Definition Of Gum DiseaseGum disease is the generic term used to describe the presence of inflammation, infection, change of color and active disease conditions in the gums that surround the teeth. This condition is due to the body’s immune response to plaque biofilm and bacteria in areas that have not been efficiently cleaned on a ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleGum Infection
DefinitionGum infections range from conditions such as mild gingivitis to gum disease and periapical abscesses – around the root of the tooth. Initial infection can begin as slight sensitivity while severe forms of infection may also involve clear or cloudy white drainage from the area of infection. Gum infections are typically due to poor oral ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleLoose Teeth
DefinitionLoose teeth are the result of chronic gum disease, gum recession and bone loss. As plaque and bacteria invade the area around the teeth, it destroys the attachment between the teeth and the surrounding support structures. Once gum disease becomes active and remains untreated, teeth become mobile. If mobility is severe enough it ultimately results ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleOral Thrush
DefinitionWhat is oral thrush? Thrush is a fairly common infection of the mouth due to a yeast infection. Typically the infection lasts for about two weeks and appears as a white velvety patch, or sometimes red, raw skin.
 
 
Causes
What causes oral thrush and yeast infections? Thrush is due to an imbalance in the natural oral flora ... Click Here to Read Full ArticlePeriodontitis  DefinitionWhat is periodontitis? Periodontitis is also known as periodontal disease or an advanced stage of gum disease. The meaning of the name describes the condition: Perio = “around”, dont = “tooth”, itis = “inflammation of.” So periodontitis is the inflammation and infection of the area surrounding the root of the tooth. It is a severe ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleReceding GumsThere is a lot to discuss about receding gums, if you wish to jump to a particular section you may use the links above.
Definition
What are receding gums? Receding gums are gums that have pulled away from the surface of the tooth and crept away, exposing the root of the tooth. There are several different ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleSore Gums
DefinitionSore gums can occur in one area of your mouth or throughout the entire mouth, and have a various number of causes. Your gums may be sore when you brush and floss them, or they may be sore throughout the day, causing chronic pain. The soreness is related to infection, swelling and inflammation of the ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleSwollen Gums   
DefinitionSwollen gums are due to an inflammatory response to disease or bacteria around the teeth. The presence of gum inflammation is used to indicate the severity of conditions such as gingivitis, periodontitis and periodontal disease. When left untreated, mildly swollen gums can progress into severe forms of gum disease resulting in tooth loss.
 
 
Causes
Bacteria, Gingivitis, And ... Click Here to Read Full ArticleTonsil Stones – Also Known As Tonsilloliths
DefinitionWhat is a tonsil stone? Tonsil stones are also called tonsilloliths, and are a buildup of hardened or calcified material in the tonsils or crevices around the tonsils. Made up of extremely odorous material, tonsil stones often cause severely bad breath. (1) The tonsillolith comes from bacteria or dead cells that have built up in ... Click Here to Read Full Article
Leave a Reply Cancel replyYou must be logged in to post a comment.



        

Jrsis Health Care Corp: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback
















jrsis health care corp
Public Company









Company Profile
Sector: Health Care
Industry: Health Care Facilities & Svcs
Sub-Industry: Health Care Facilities
Jrsis Health Care Corporation provides medical services. The Company offers both Western and Chinese medical practices, including pediatrics, dermatology, traditional Chinese medicine, internal medicine dentistry, general surgery, rehabilitation science, and gynecology. Jrsis Health Care serves patients in China.




Corporate Information
Address:

Xingfu Street, 1st-7th Floor
Ind & Comm Bank Bldg, Hulan To
Harbin City, 150025
China


Phone:
86-135-1001-6379


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.jhcc.cn





Board Members




Chairman/President
Company


Junsheng Zhang
Jrsis Health Care Corp








Chief Executive Officer
Company


Lihua Sun
Jrsis Health Care Corp








Chief Financial Officer
Company


Xuewei Zhang
Jrsis Health Care Corp








Board Members
Company




























From The Web











Key Executives


Junsheng Zhang


Chairman/President




Lihua Sun


Chief Executive Officer




Xuewei Zhang


Chief Financial Officer







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data




































JRsis Health Care Corp (JRSS.PK)  Quote| Reuters.com




























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















JRsis Health Care Corp (JRSS.PK)










Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataHealthcareHealthcare Facilities & Services












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        










				JRSS.PK on OTC Markets Group


				1.73USD
--





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    --


					            (--)
					        






Prev Close

$1.73


Open

--




Day's High

--


Day's Low

--




Volume

--


Avg. Vol

487




52-wk High

$1.90


52-wk Low

$0.70










JRSS.PK








					About


		JRSIS HEALTH CARE Corp located in China is a provider of healthcare services. Their products include Pediatrics,Dermatology, ENT,Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM), Ophthalmology, Internal Medicine Dentistry, General Surgery, Rehabilitation Science, Gynecology, General Medical Services etc. The company is equipped with four... (more)





					Buy/Sell



No analyst recommendations are available for JRSS.PK.

» Analyst Consensus





					Overall





Beta:
--


Market Cap(Mil.):
$24.07


Shares Outstanding(Mil.):
13.91


Dividend:
--


Yield (%):
--








					Financials





 
JRSS.PK
Industry
Sector


P/E (TTM):

				6.61

				29.89

				16.47


EPS (TTM):

				0.26

				--

				--


ROI:

				22.38

				7.14

				-8.42


ROE:

				58.65

				11.44

				-8.02












					Latest News about JRSS.PK




» More JRSS.PK News











 Earnings vs.  Estimates


		No consensus analysis data available.

















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataHealthcareHealthcare Facilities & Services
























    JRSS Key Statistics - JRSIS Health Care Corp. Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































JRSIS Health Care Corp.

                  OTC: JRSS
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

JRSIS Health Care Corp.



Market closed
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 19, 2017, 5:20 p.m.


JRSS

/quotes/zigman/72068512/delayed


$
1.73




Change

+0.68
+64.76%

Volume
Volume 600
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/72068512/delayed
Previous close

$
			1.05
		


$
				1.73
			
Change

+0.68
+64.76%





Day low
Day high
$1.73
$1.73










52 week low
52 week high

            $0.70
        

            $1.90
        

















			Company Description 


			JRSIS Health Care Corp. engages in providing medical services. Its services include pediatrics, dermatology, ear, nose and throat, traditional Chinese medicine, ophthalmology, internal medicine dentistry, general surgery, rehabilitation science, gynecology, and general medical services. The company ...
		


                JRSIS Health Care Corp. engages in providing medical services. Its services include pediatrics, dermatology, ear, nose and throat, traditional Chinese medicine, ophthalmology, internal medicine dentistry, general surgery, rehabilitation science, gynecology, and general medical services. The company was founded on November 20, 2013 and is headquartered in Harbin, China.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
4.91


P/E Ratio (with extraordinary items)
4.68


P/E Ratio (without extraordinary items)
3.07


Price to Sales Ratio
0.59


Price to Book Ratio
1.60


Price to Cash Flow Ratio
2.13


Enterprise Value to EBITDA
4.11


Enterprise Value to Sales
1.60


Total Debt to Enterprise Value
0.56

Efficiency

Revenue/Employee
36,310.00


Income Per Employee
6,958.00


Receivables Turnover
4.40


Total Asset Turnover
0.61

Liquidity

Current Ratio
2.28


Quick Ratio
2.04


Cash Ratio
0.28



Profitability

Gross Margin
41.64


Operating Margin
35.37


Pretax Margin
27.73


Net Margin
19.16


Return on Assets
11.68


Return on Equity
67.27


Return on Total Capital
14.12


Return on Invested Capital
15.44

Capital Structure

Total Debt to Total Equity
288.06


Total Debt to Total Capital
74.23


Total Debt to Total Assets
60.28


Long-Term Debt to Equity
253.20


Long-Term Debt to Total Capital
65.25





      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title







Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}



/news/latest/company/us/jrss

      MarketWatch News on JRSS
    
No News currently available for JRSS





/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/jrss

      Other News on JRSS
    




 10-Q: JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
8:45 a.m. May 15, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-K: JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
7:49 a.m. March 29, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
7:27 a.m. Nov. 14, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
9:35 a.m. Aug. 15, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)














At a Glance

JRSIS Health Care Corp.
1st–7th Floor
Industrial & Commercial Bank Bldg
Xingfu Street, Hulan Town
Harbin, Heilongjiang 150025




Phone
 8645156888933


Industry
Healthcare Provision


Sector
Health Care/Life Sciences


Fiscal Year-end
12/2017


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$18.12M


Net Income
$3.47M


2016 Sales Growth 
52.6%


Employees

        499.00


Annual Report for JRSS











/news/pressrelease/company/us/jrss

      Press Releases on JRSS
    
No News currently available for JRSS














Log In




3:43 AM EDT
July 29, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:34aBREAKINGElon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
12:21aTesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15




























































OraMD Packages and Bundles for Original and Extra Strength OraMD





























































































Live Help



















JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                








FREE SHIPPING ON ORDERS OVER $50






My Account
My Cart
Log In







Search:












 
                







		   0		
$0.00




				    You have no items in your shopping cart.				













Trusted Health Products Webstore







Menu

ProductsOral CareOraMD OriginalSingle and Combo PacksSpecial PacksAutoship - SubscriptionOraMD Extra StrengthSingle and Combo PacksSpecial PacksAutoship - SubscriptionOraMD Breath SprayOraMD - Dr. Bass ToothbrushSkin Care for WomenNourishing Face MoisturizerNourishing Body MoisturizerThe ManThe Man BodyBody and Foot CareReVigorate Body CareReVigorate Foot CareAbout UsContact UsSpecial Offers 




1 Year Money-Back Guarantee

 						   Order 24/7 1-888-423-7500
						   International 01-859-277-0000













Home



Products



OraMD Packages























OraMD Packages





Sort By :



			Position		    







			    Position			

			    Name			

			    Price			

			    Choose a Strength			





Show :



                            12			







			    12			

			    15			

			    30			

			    All			


per page


View as :






                                    Items 1 to 12 of 15 total                            



1
2






















OraMD Original - Free Toothbrush, Free Shipping!


$22.97 






231 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Single Bottle


$22.97 






1 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart






 







OraMD Original Strength - Three Pack Special


As low as:
$45.94 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart






 







OraMD Original Strength - Supersaver Special


As low as:
$99.00 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart














OraMD Extra Strength - Single Bottle


$39.97 






1 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart






 







OraMD Extra Strength - Three Pack Special


As low as:
$74.94 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart






 







OraMD Extra Strength - SuperSaver Special


As low as:
$154.89 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart






 







OraMD Breath Spray - Single Bottle


$8.95 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart














OraMD Breath Spray - Three Pack


As low as:
$24.95 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Sample Pack


As low as:
$22.97 






231 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Starter Pack


As low as:
$45.94 






231 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Super Pack


As low as:
$99.00 






232 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart








Sort By :



			Position		    







			    Position			

			    Name			

			    Price			

			    Choose a Strength			





Show :



                            12			







			    12			

			    15			

			    30			

			    All			


per page


View as :






                                    Items 1 to 12 of 15 total                            



1
2




















 
Products


OraMD Original Strength
OraMD Extra Strength
OraMD Breath Spray
Amazingly Beautiful
The Man
ReliefMD
The Runner's Choice





 
Health Resources


Oral Health
Skin Care
Nutrition





 
Customer Service


My Account
Rewards
FAQ
Contact Us
Privacy Policy
Store Policies





 
About Us


Pure Manufacturing
Our Mission
Our Story
Our Founder
Press
Sitemap





 
Partner with Us


Dentist Program
Professional Program
Affiliates
BBB












Search Terms
Advanced Search
Orders and Returns
Contact Us
RSS
Site Map


© 2015 Trusted Health Products, Inc.. All Rights Reserved.







 





















Dentist Testimonials - OraMD














































 














Live Help











OraMD Blog
Natural Health News
 











 




1 Year Money-Back Guarantee

					Order 24/7 1-888-423-7500
					International 01-859-277-0000













Dentist Testimonials



OraMD is Offered and Endorsed by Dentists and Dental Hygienists in the USA and Abroad
 







“I highly recommend OraMD”
  “I highly recommend OraMD to anyone looking for a natural toothpaste, mouthwash and breath- freshener. This unique, 3 in 1 oral health care product is anti-bacterial and can help reduce the overall bacterial levels in the mouth – without harmful or toxic side effects. Whether you use it as a liquid toothpaste, mouthwash or breath freshener, what you will get is a very refreshing feeling.”




– Dr. Paul Rubin, Seattle, WA










“My patients love it.”
 “Because I’m concerned with every aspect of my patients’ oral health I recommend natural and healthy oral health care products. I recently discovered OraMD and not only do I personally feel it is a great 3 in 1 natural product (liquid tooth paste, mouthwash, and breath freshener) but my patients love it.”




– Dr. Euan Mackie, West Vancouver, British Columbia, CAN










“This is a welcomed and much needed product.”
 “I wanted to thank you for such a wonderful product in OraMD. You have provided for a healthy alternative for me to dispense to my patients. They love it and so do I. Not one patient that has tried it doesn’t use and like it but when they return give it an astounding ‘I love it’. As we know that is half the battle in oral health care…getting patients to use the product. With the positive research, great compliance, taste, and healthy alternative to unhealthy, abrasive, toxic over the counter dentifrices – this is a welcomed and much needed product. Thanks again!”




– Dr. Nina Foley, Franklin, TN










“I am ecstatic with the results”
 “I have used ORA MD’s liquid drops for the past two years. I am ecstatic with the results, and pleased to recommend it to my friends, as well as to patients.”




– Joyce, Dental Hygienist, Nevada








Leave a Reply Cancel replyYou must be logged in to post a comment. 




 Recent Posts 

WHAT ARE THE EARLY SIGNS OF GUM DISEASE?


IDENTIFYING GUM DISEASE SIGNS


Chronic Gum Disease and the Warning Signs


GUM DISEASE AND DENTIST TREATMENTS TO CURE THEM


IS GUM DISEASE CURABLE AND REVERSIBLE?


 Recent CommentsArchives 
September 2012
December 2009

Categories 
Testimonials

Uncategorized


Meta 
Log in
Entries RSS
Comments RSS
WordPress.org 








 



























OraMD - The All Natural Oral Care for Gum Disease Treatment

































































































Live Help



















JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                








FREE SHIPPING ON ORDERS OVER $50






My Account
My Cart
Log In







Search:












 
                







		   0		
$0.00




				    You have no items in your shopping cart.				













Trusted Health Products Webstore







Menu

ProductsOral CareOraMD OriginalSingle and Combo PacksSpecial PacksAutoship - SubscriptionOraMD Extra StrengthSingle and Combo PacksSpecial PacksAutoship - SubscriptionOraMD Breath SprayOraMD - Dr. Bass ToothbrushSkin Care for WomenNourishing Face MoisturizerNourishing Body MoisturizerThe ManThe Man BodyBody and Foot CareReVigorate Body CareReVigorate Foot CareAbout UsContact UsSpecial Offers 




1 Year Money-Back Guarantee

 						   Order 24/7 1-888-423-7500
						   International 01-859-277-0000













Home



Products



Oral Care























Oral Care


OraMD is a specific blend of pure botanical and essential sweet almond kernel, spearmint, and peppermint leaf oils.  Oils are processed to produce 1000’s of different profiles (properties, characteristics, actions, compatibilities).  OraMD is a unique customized profile with specific values of menthol, terpenes, ketones, esters, aldehydes and other components giving the best possible result. OraMD oils are insecticide, herbicide and fungicide free.OraMD Extra Strength is the most powerful formula of OraMD that provides faster results because it is more aggresive at killing periodontal bacteria making it the best for the more serious oral conditions and advanced gum disease (periodontitis).
 
  




Sort By :



			Position		    







			    Position			

			    Name			

			    Price			

			    Choose a Strength			





Show :



                            12			







			    12			

			    15			

			    30			

			    All			


per page


View as :






12 Item(s)








 







OraMD® Original Strength
Price:

$22.97 






263 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart






 







OraMD® Original - Autoship
Price:

$19.97 






231 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD® Extra Strength
Price:

$39.97 






23 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD® Extra Strength - Autoship
Price:

$29.97 






17 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD® Breath Spray
Price:

$8.95 






45 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart






 







OraMD® Dr. Bass Toothbrush


$1.95 







0 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review



Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Sample Pack


As low as:
$22.97 






231 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Starter Pack


As low as:
$45.94 






231 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Original Strength - Super Pack


As low as:
$99.00 






232 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Extra Strength - Sample Pack


As low as:
$39.97 






17 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Extra Strength - Starter Pack


As low as:
$79.94 






17 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart














OraMD Extra Strength - Super Pack


As low as:
$159.89 






18 Review(s)
|
Add Your Review


Add to Cart








Sort By :



			Position		    







			    Position			

			    Name			

			    Price			

			    Choose a Strength			





Show :



                            12			







			    12			

			    15			

			    30			

			    All			


per page


View as :






12 Item(s)














 
Products


OraMD Original Strength
OraMD Extra Strength
OraMD Breath Spray
Amazingly Beautiful
The Man
ReliefMD
The Runner's Choice





 
Health Resources


Oral Health
Skin Care
Nutrition





 
Customer Service


My Account
Rewards
FAQ
Contact Us
Privacy Policy
Store Policies





 
About Us


Pure Manufacturing
Our Mission
Our Story
Our Founder
Press
Sitemap





 
Partner with Us


Dentist Program
Professional Program
Affiliates
BBB












Search Terms
Advanced Search
Orders and Returns
Contact Us
RSS
Site Map


© 2015 Trusted Health Products, Inc.. All Rights Reserved.







 























JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP IPO - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP


Company Address
ST-7TH FLOOR, INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIALXINGFU STREET, HULAN TOWN, HULAN DISTRICHARBIN CITY 150025


Company Phone
86 13510016379


Company Website
www.jhcc.cn


CEO
Lihua Sun


Employees  (as of 10/30/2014) 
5


State of Inc
FL


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Filed (3/6/2014)


Proposed Symbol
 -- 


Exchange
OTCBB


Share Price
$0.57


Shares Offered
6,411,000


Offer Amount
$3,670,297.50


Total Expenses
$116,404.90


Shares Over Alloted
 -- 


Shareholder Shares Offered
 -- 


Shares Outstanding
6,411,000


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001597892




The principal purposes of this offering are to increase our capitalization and 
financial flexibility, and to increase our visibility in the marketplace. As of 
the date of this prospectus, we cannot specify with certainty all of the 
particular uses for the net proceeds to us from this offering.

However, we currently intend to use the net proceeds to us from this offering 
primarily for the expansion of the hospital including decoration of the new 
building, expansion of medical facilities and purchases of new medical 
equipment. We intend to purchase advanced medical facilities, including 1.5T 
MRI (Magnetic Resonance Imaging), Ultrasound, Mammography, LightSpeed VCT, 
Disinfection and sterilization Systems and so on. Although we have no present 
commitments or agreements to enter into any of the suppliers, we will have 
broad discretion over the uses of the net proceeds from this offering.

We estimate that we will receive approximately $3,553,892.60 in net proceeds 
from the sale of 6,411,000 shares of common stock in this offering, based on 
an assumed public offering price of $0.5725 per share and after deducting 
estimated offering expenses of $116,404.90.

13,589,000 shares of common stock are issued and outstanding before the 
offering and 6,411,000 shares will be outstanding after the offering, assuming 
all shares are sold. However, there is no assurance that we will be able to 
raise the entire price from the sale of stock by the Company under this 
Offering. Therefore, the following details how we will use the proceeds if we 
raise only 75%, 50%, or 25% of this offering respectively, there will be 
18,397,250, 16,794,500 or 15,191,750 shares outstanding, respectively.

Offering Proceeds $3,670,297.5 assuming 100% of the shares being sold. However, 
if only 75%, 50%, or 25% of the shares being offered are sold, the proceeds 
will be $2,752,723.13, $1,835,148.75, or $917,574.38, respectively. We estimate 
our total offering registration costs to be $116,404.90.

If 75% of this Offering is sold, we estimate that this would provide sufficient 
capital to our growth operations and develop our business plan. It may however 
place potential restraints on our ability to handle unforeseen expenses 
attributable to Working Capital and may require us to seek additional funding.

If only 50% of this Offering is sold, we estimate that this would provide 
sufficient capital to commence expand operations and development of the 
business plan, but we would have no too much money to spend on medical 
equipment purchasing. Under this scenario, we estimate that we would be able 
to generate enough revenues to sustain our business. Should we be unable to 
generate sufficient revenues to sustain our business, we will have to find 
other sources of financing.

If we raise less than 50% we will have difficulty in implementing our business 
plan. Our expenses would be prioritized in order of importance and would affect 
how we allocate funds for developing the business. If less than 50% is raised, 
we would not be able to allocate any funds for expansion of medical facilities 
and purchases of new medical equipment.

If only 25% of the Offering is sold, we would still incur expected offering 
expenses of $116,404.9, which will have to be paid to maintain reporting status 
during the next 12 months. We will not be able to apply funds to any other 
areas of developing our business, such as expansion of medical facilities. We 
will depend on other funding to complete the project, such as loans from our
officers or shareholders or from investors, to pay 10% interests, it will 
influence our next profit.

Our current estimate of the use of the net proceeds from this offering is as 
follows:

                    Approximate Allocation of Net Proceeds

% and amount of the                                                                                                                              
securities                                                                                                                                       
offered by the company are                                                                                                                       
sold.                              25 %   $ 801,169.48         50 %   $ 1,718,743.85         75 %   $ 2,636,318.23        100 %   $ 3,553,892.60  
Decoration of new building                  801,169.48                  1,718,743.85                  2,000,000.00                  2,000,000.00  
                                                                                                                                                  
Expansion of medical                                                                                                                             
facilities & purchases of                                                                                                                        
new medical equipment                                                                                   636,318.23                  1,553,892.60  
                                                                                                                                                  
Total                                     $ 801,169.48                $ 1,718,743.85                $ 2,636,318.23                $ 3,553,892.60

Currently, we do not have any commitment for alternative funding. Alternative
sources of capital such as bank or private loan may increase our financial
expense and may decrease our net profit margin of 8% (based on bank average
interest rate in China).


The Chinese Private Healthcare sector has become a major attraction for
international investment target since 2007. For example, International Finance
Corporation (IFC) has a US$35m Joint Venture (JV) investment with Chindex and JP
Morgan’s US$50m JV investments in 2 Class 2 hospitals in Beijing and Shenzhen.

Chinese government had Medical service reform policy from 2009, but as
researcher’s findings, with unequal government policies from tax, financial and
expenditure aspects, private hospitals are still facing difficulties to expand.
As such a reason, private hospitals in China still appears small and highly
fragmented. However, the biggest news on October 14, 2013 was New Health service
policy-to promote health service industry development. Private hospital owners
are anticipating equal pricing, expenditure, tax, recruitment polices, plus much
more government incentives to private hospitals.

We are in direct competition with two government-owned hospitals in the Hulan
district of Harbin city.

China has a relatively underdeveloped healthcare infrastructure, which results
in significant unmet demand for healthcare services in China. Due to the rapidly
rising demand for healthcare services and the underdevelopment of public medical
services, as well as favorable government policies encouraging private capital
to invest in the healthcare services industry, the number of privately-owned
medical institutions in China has experienced rapid growth in recent years.

Key advantages to compete with two government hospitals are as follows:

. Compared with a public hospital at a single location, we are able to offer a   
  more comprehensive medical serves at competitive prices, and provide an        
  affordable “one-stop” service to our corporate customers who contract us to    
  provide healthcare services to their employees and clients. We are also able to
  provide our customers with satisfying experiences by providing customized      
  services, streamlined processes, access to advanced equipment, a comfortable   
  environment, customer services-oriented staff and greater privacy,             
  characteristics which are highly valued by our corporate and individual        
  customers.

. Leading position in a fast growing market

We were one of the earliest entrants into Hulan’s private hospital market. We
were the largest provider of private medical services by revenue in Hulan. Our
operating history coupled with our established reputation provides us with
advantages in retaining our leading market share, Compared with a public
hospital at a single location, we are the largest provider of private hospital
by revenue in Hulan.

. The private hospital market in China is expected to grow in the next three to  
  five years due to the following factors:

. Rising demand for customer-centric professional services with broader and      
  easily accessible locations, attracting customers from the medical serves of   
  public hospitals to private hospital;

. Private hospital providers’ strong sales and marketing efforts;

. Physician’s ability to practice in multiple locations. Under China’s healthcare
  reform plan announced by the PRC State Council in 2013, physicians completely  
  be allowed to practice, on either a full-time or part-time basis, at different 
  medical institutions, including hospitals and clinics, which provides          
  sufficient supply of highly-qualified physicians to the private medical        
  institutions.

Like any system, of course, there are disadvantages:

. Inequality, which means that not every patient can benefit of private medical  
  services. Therefore, taxes are paid by private insurance companies, if you need
  care after an accident or illness. All individuals who have a healthcare       
  insurance policy as a result of their work agreements are receiving care in a  
  private hospital, according to company policies.

. Increased cost, not every patient can afford to be treated in a private        
  hospital, especially students and older people.

A disadvantage can be the ignorance of people in terms of positive outcomes if
people get better treatment in either public or private hospital. These are
characterized by a better system care, which may contribute to a successful
economy, if people are treated effectively and quickly, can lead to an
improvement of work productivity.

In conclusion, we believe the negatives of the private medical services are
offset by the positive sides of it and anyone who needs care and better medical
attention, it is advisable to go for a private hospital. Difference and
convenience compared to public hospitals can have a real impact on health and
recovery time.


Company Description
On December 20, 2013, we acquired One Hundred Percent (100%) of the issued and
outstanding capital stock of JRSIS Health Care Limited, a privately held Limited
Liability Company registered in the British Virgin Islands (“JHCL”) for Twelve
Million (12,000,000) shares of our common stock. JHCL,


 through its wholly owned
subsidiary, Runteng Medical Group Co., Ltd (“Runteng”), holds majority ownership
in Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd, a company duly incorporated, organized and
validly existing under the laws of China (“Jiarun”). We provide full scale
medical services in the Heilongjiang region in China. As the parent company, we
rely on Jiarun to conduct One Hundred Percent (100%) of our businesses and
operations.

Established in February 2006, Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd is a privately
held, full medical service hospital established in Harbin City of Heilongjiang,
China. Jiarun is serving in a municipal and county level and providing both
Western and Chinese medical practices to the citizens of Harbin. Strategically
located in the heart of Harbin, the Hospital is operating in over 3,200 square
meters of space spread out over 7 stories for residential and walk-in clinic
patients, emergency treatments, radiology and day to day management. With over
150 open medical beds and 185 medical staffers (consisting of 68 licensed
doctors and 19 surgeons, 15 drug management, 81 nurses, 2 dentists) and
supported by 40 non-medical employees, the Hospital is capable of serving as
much as 4,315 inpatients and 263 thousand outpatients on an annual basis. Beds
are provided to hospitalized patients, who usually have more serious health
condition, may also need surgery, the treatment cycle will generally be days,
weeks, or even months. On average, the hospital normally intakes much higher
number of outpatients (patient who stays within the hospital for medical and/or
healthcare services for less than 24 hours) than of inpatients (patient whose
stays exceed 24 hours) on an annual basis. For the fiscal year ended December
31, 2013, the Hospital has serviced 249,540 outpatients while only servicing
total of 4,100 inpatients for the same fiscal year. For the fiscal year 2012,
the hospital has serviced 150,670 outpatients and 3,620 inpatients in total.
While outpatients do stay far less time within the facility, they do however,
require medical beddings to allow for various medical procedures to be performed
on them from time to time, thus consuming some of the available beds.

On November 10, 2013, Jiarun Hospital entered into a Rental Agreement to lease
current hospital building from Junsheng Zhang, the owner of Jiarun hospital, the
renting agreement for the current hospital building contains the following
provisions:

. Rental payments of RMB85, 000 per month.

. The renting period is from January 1, 2014 to September 30, 2014

. Jiarun Hospital is responsible for paying and undertaking all expenses incurred
  during the rental period, expenses are include: water charge, electricity      
  charge, gas fee, telephone costs, cleaning, heating fee and property management
  fee, as well as other taxes and expenses.

. The building is to be used solely for Harbin Jiarun Hospital Co., Ltd.’s       
  operations.

. During the rental period, the building maintenance costs will be beared by     
  Jiarun Hospital.

We intend to terminate the existing rental agreement with the present owner of
Jiarun hospital building when the new facility is completed and immediately to
conduct our operations solely from the new facility, as the new facility is
considerably larger than current hospital.

The current hospital building has over 3,200m 2 in space spread out in 7
stories. It is working close to its maximum capacity. Current organic growth is
limited by operation capacity. The hospital is expanding operation capacity
through the cash generated from operations and through current owner
contributions. To date Harbin Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd, (which is
the same owner of Jiarun Hospital), has already completed construction of the
new building. The management has entered into a leasing agreement with Harbin
Baiyi Real Estate Development Co., Ltd. for the new medical facility which has
over 24,000 m 2 (increase from 3,200m 2) in space spread out in 26 floors in the
heart of Harbin City that will contain over 500 open beds and 10-15 operating
rooms. Therefore, JRSIS anticipates the sales rate will increase around 64%
(compare to the year 2013) in the first year after to use the new medical
facility.

Harbin is the capital city of province of Heilongjiang, China's most
North-easterly province. The province has a population of 39 million and
Harbin's population is registered to be 10 million. We are located in Hulan
district of Harbin, which has a population of 800,000 people
[http://www.hulan.gov.cn/hlgk/].

We are competing with two government-owned hospitals in the Hulan district of
Harbin city. One is operating in over 8300 m 2 of space, contain about 200 open
beds and about 370 employees; The other one is operating in over 21,000m 2 of
space, contain about 300 open beds and about 580 employees.

By offering services that are based on its competitive advantages. Here’s what
our employees and customers said the hospital does the best:

. Provides the one high-quality emergency, primary care, and retail pharmacy 
  within its service area

. Staffs the hospital with personnel who have superior knowledge to support  
  efficient operations

. Offers the best care possible by maintaining its full staff of             
  highly-experienced nurses

. Providing advanced medical facilities and comfortable environments

. Maintaining the highest level of professional healthcare

. Maintaining competitive prices for medical treatment and drugs and         
  medications

The hospital industry today constantly face pressure from all sides to provide
the highest quality healthcare services while implementing strict cost controls
and meeting increasing regulatory requirements. In order to solve this difficult
problems, Jiarun has created hospital-wide labour union empowered to analyze
problems and to develop, implement, and sustain solutions designed jointly by
the labour union and the top management group aiming to improve productivity and
service quality throughout the hospital.

Equipped with over 93 pieces of the latest medical equipment, the Hospital
provides well rounded medical services to all of its patients. From less
complicated services such as Dentistry to highly sophisticated operations such
as General Surgery, the Hospital’s staff are prepared to provide immediate
medical treatment services throughout all 24 hours of the day. For the year
2013, the Hospital has conducted about 4,100 inpatients, representing
approximately 91% of the hospital’s maximum medical capacity.

The Hospital is currently run by a staff of 185 medically trained personnel and
supported by 40non- medical staff for day to day office work. In the year 2013,
the Hospital had served 4,100 inpatients while providing clinical services to as
much as 250 thousand outpatients. Of the many services provided by the Hospital,
Internal Medicine and Surgery Performance account for as much as 57.37% of
Jiarun’s revenue source.
---

JRSIS Health Care Corporation was incorporated in the State of Florida on
November 20, 2013. Our corporate address is 1 st – 7 th Floor, Industrial and
Commercial Bank Building, Xingfu Street, Hulan Town, Hulan District, Harbin
City, Heilongjiang Province, China 150025. Our telephone number is
0086-451-56888933. Our website: www.jhcc.cn.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
$3,066,374


Net Income
$567,040


Total Assets
$20,343,704






Total Liabilities
$15,744,993


Stockholders' Equity
$1,740,302




Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 8 Total: 8
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
10/30/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
10/15/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
9/23/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
8/5/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
7/9/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
6/6/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1/A
5/1/2014
Filing



JRSIS HEALTH CARE CORP
S-1
3/6/2014
Filing







Experts


Auditor
De Joya Griffith, LLC


Company Counsel
South Milhausen, P.A. and William D. O’Neal, Esq.


Transfer Agent
VStock Transfer, LLC


Underwriter
 -- 


Underwriter
Self-underwritten






                                There are no news stories for this IPO at this time.
                            












Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Sprint proposes merger with Charter Communications - WSJ
                        



	                     7:53PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX





































